Florida, session 2026, SB554.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 1044 1045 Section 1.âSection 617.01011, Florida Statutes, is amended 1046 to read: 1047 617.01011âShort title.âThis chapter act may be cited as the 1048 âFlorida Nonprofit Not For Profit Corporation Act.â 1049 Section 2.âSubsections (1), (2), (3), (7), and (8) of 1050 section 617.01201, Florida Statutes, are amended, subsection 1051 (10) is added to that section, and subsection (9) of that 1052 section is reenacted, to read: 1053 617.01201âFiling requirements.â 1054 (1)âA document must satisfy the requirements of this 1055 section and of any other section that adds to or varies these 1056 requirements to be entitled to filing by the department of 1057 State. 1058 (2)âThis chapter act must require or permit filing the 1059 document in the office of the department of State. 1060 (3)âThe document must contain the information required by 1061 this chapter act. It may contain other information as well. 1062 (7)âThe person executing the document shall sign it and 1063 state beneath or opposite such personâs his or her signature 1064 such personâs his or her name and the capacity in which such 1065 person he or she signs. The document may, but need not, contain 1066 the corporate seal, an attestation, an acknowledgment, or a 1067 verification: 1068 (a)âThe corporate seal, 1069 (b)âAn attestation by the secretary or an assistant 1070 secretary, 1071 (c)âAn acknowledgment, verification, or proof. 1072 (8)âIf the department of State has prescribed a mandatory 1073 form for the document under s. 617.0121, the document must be in 1074 or on the prescribed form. 1075 (9)âThe document must be delivered to the department for 1076 filing. Delivery may be made by electronic transmission if and 1077 to the extent allowed by the department. If the document is 1078 filed in typewritten or printed form and not transmitted 1079 electronically, the department may require that one exact or 1080 conformed copy be delivered with the document, except as 1081 provided in s. 617.1508. The document must be accompanied by the 1082 correct filing fee and any other tax or penalty required by law. 1083 (10)âWhenever this chapter allows any of the terms of a 1084 plan or a filed document to be dependent upon facts objectively 1085 ascertainable outside the plan or filed document, the following 1086 apply: 1087 (a)âThe plan or filed document must set forth the manner in 1088 which the facts will operate upon the terms of the plan or filed 1089 document. 1090 (b)âThe facts may include, but are not limited to: 1091 1.âAny of the following which are available in a nationally 1092 recognized news or information medium either in print or 1093 electronically: 1094 a.âStatistical or market indices; 1095 b.âMarket prices of any security or group of securities; 1096 c.âInterest rates; 1097 d.âCurrency exchange rates; and 1098 e.âSimilar economic or financial data; 1099 2.âA determination or action by any person or body, 1100 including the corporation or any other party to a plan or filed 1101 document; or 1102 3.âThe terms of, or actions taken under, an agreement to 1103 which the corporation is a party, or any other agreement or 1104 document. 1105 (c)âThe following provisions of a plan or filed document 1106 may not be made dependent upon facts outside the plan or filed 1107 document: 1108 1.âThe name and address of any person required in a filed 1109 document; 1110 2.âThe registered office of any entity required in a filed 1111 document; 1112 3.âThe registered agent of any entity required in a filed 1113 document; 1114 4.âThe effective date of a filed document; and 1115 5.âAny required statement in a filed document of the date 1116 on which the underlying transaction was approved or the manner 1117 in which that approval was given. 1118 (d)âIf a provision of a filed document is made dependent 1119 upon a fact ascertainable outside of the filed document, and 1120 that fact is not ascertainable by reference to a source 1121 described in subparagraph (b)1. or a document that is a matter 1122 of public record, and the affected members have not received 1123 notice of the fact from the corporation, the corporation must 1124 file with the department articles of amendment to the filed 1125 document setting forth the fact promptly after the time when the 1126 fact referred to is first ascertainable or thereafter changes. 1127 Articles of amendment under this section are deemed to be 1128 authorized by the authorization of the original filed document 1129 to which they relate and may be filed by the corporation without 1130 further action by the board of directors or the members. 1131 (e)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 1132 1.ââFiled documentâ means a document filed with the 1133 department pursuant to this chapter, except for a document filed 1134 pursuant to ss. 617.1501â617.1532. 1135 2.ââPlanâ means a plan of merger, a plan of conversion, or 1136 a plan of domestication. 1137 Section 3.âSection 617.0123, Florida Statutes, is amended 1138 to read: 1139 617.0123âEffective time and date of document.â 1140 (1)âExcept as provided in subsection (1) (2) and in s. 1141 617.0124(3), a document accepted for filing under this chapter 1142 may specify an is effective at the time and a delayed effective 1143 date. In the case of the initial articles of incorporation, a 1144 prior effective date may be specified in the articles of 1145 incorporation if such date is within 5 business days before the 1146 date of filing of filing on the date it is filed, as evidenced 1147 by the Department of Stateâs date and time endorsement on the 1148 original document. 1149 (1)âSubject to s. 617.0124(3), a document accepted for 1150 filing is effective under any of the following conditions: 1151 (a)âIf the record filed does not specify an effective time 1152 and does not specify a prior or a delayed effective date, on the 1153 date and at the time the record is accepted, as evidenced by the 1154 departmentâs endorsement of the date and time on the filing. 1155 (b)âIf the record filed specifies an effective time, but 1156 not a prior or delayed effective date, on the date the record is 1157 accepted, as evidenced by the departmentâs endorsement, and at 1158 the time specified in the filing. 1159 (c)âIf the record filed specifies a delayed effective date, 1160 but not an effective time, at 12:01 a.m. on the earlier of: 1161 1.âThe specified date; or 1162 2.âThe 90th day after the date the record is filed. 1163 (d)âIf the record filed specifies a delayed effective date 1164 and an effective time, at the specified time on the earlier of: 1165 1.âThe specified date; or 1166 2.âThe 90th day after the date the record is filed. 1167 (e)âIf the record filed is of initial articles of 1168 incorporation and specifies an effective date before the date of 1169 the filing, but no effective time, at 12:01 a.m. on the later 1170 of: 1171 1.âThe specified date; or 1172 2.âThe 5th business day before the date the record is 1173 filed. 1174 (f)âIf the record filed is of initial articles of 1175 incorporation and specifies an effective time and an effective 1176 date before the date of the filing, at the specified time on the 1177 later of: 1178 1.âThe specified date; or 1179 2.âThe 5th business day before the date the record is 1180 filed. 1181 (2)âIf the record filed does not specify the time zone or 1182 place at which the date or time, or both, is to be determined, 1183 the date or time, or both, at which it becomes effective will be 1184 those prevailing at the place of filing in this state A document 1185 may specify a delayed effective date, and if it does the 1186 document shall become effective on the date specified. Unless 1187 otherwise permitted by this act, a delayed effective date for a 1188 document may not be later than the 90th day after the date on 1189 which it is filed. 1190 (3)âIf a document is determined by the department of State 1191 to be incomplete and inappropriate for filing, the department of 1192 State may return the document to the person or corporation 1193 filing it, together with a brief written explanation of the 1194 reason for the refusal to file, in accordance with s. 1195 617.0125(3). If the applicant returns the document with 1196 corrections in accordance with the rules of the department 1197 within 60 days after it was mailed to the applicant by the 1198 department, and if at the time of return the applicant so 1199 requests in writing, the filing date of the document will be the 1200 filing date that would have been applied had the original 1201 document not been deficient, except as to persons who relied on 1202 the record before correction and were adversely affected 1203 thereby. 1204 (4)âCorporate existence may predate the filing date, 1205 pursuant to s. 617.0203(1). 1206 Section 4.âSection 617.0124, Florida Statutes, is amended 1207 to read: 1208 617.0124âCorrecting filed document; withdrawal of filed 1209 record before effectiveness.â 1210 (1)âA domestic or foreign corporation may correct a 1211 document filed by the department within 30 days after filing if: 1212 (a)âThe document contains an inaccuracy incorrect 1213 statement; 1214 (b)âThe document contains false, misleading, or fraudulent 1215 information; 1216 (c)âThe document was defectively executed, attested, 1217 sealed, verified, or acknowledged; or 1218 (d)âThe electronic transmission of the document to the 1219 department was defective. 1220 (2)âA document is corrected: 1221 (a)âBy preparing articles of correction that: 1222 1.âDescribe the document, including its filing date, or 1223 attach a copy of the document to the articles of correction; 1224 2.âSpecify the inaccuracy or defect incorrect statement and 1225 the reason it is incorrect or the manner in which the execution 1226 was defective; and 1227 3.âCorrect the inaccuracy or defect incorrect statement or 1228 defective execution; and 1229 (b)âBy delivering the executed articles of correction to 1230 the department for filing. 1231 (3)âArticles of correction are effective on the effective 1232 date of the document they correct except as to persons relying 1233 on the uncorrected document and who are adversely affected by 1234 the correction. As to those persons, articles of correction are 1235 effective when filed. 1236 (4)âArticles of correction may not contain a delayed 1237 effective date for the correction. 1238 (5)âUnless otherwise provided for in s. 617.1103(3) or s. 1239 617.1809(8), a filing delivered to the department may be 1240 withdrawn before it takes effect by delivering a withdrawal 1241 statement to the department for filing. 1242 (a)âA withdrawal statement must: 1243 1.âBe signed by each person who signed the filing being 1244 withdrawn, except as otherwise agreed to by such persons; 1245 2.âIdentify the filing to be withdrawn; and 1246 3.âIf not signed by all persons who signed the filing being 1247 withdrawn, state that the filing is withdrawn in accordance with 1248 the agreement of all persons who signed the filing. 1249 (b)âUpon the filing by the department of a withdrawal 1250 statement, the action or transaction evidenced by the original 1251 filing does not take effect. 1252 (6)âArticles of correction that are filed to correct false, 1253 misleading, or fraudulent information are not subject to a fee 1254 of the department if the articles of correction are delivered to 1255 the department within 15 days after the notification of filing 1256 sent pursuant to s. 617.0125(2). 1257 Section 5.âSection 617.0126, Florida Statutes, is amended 1258 to read: 1259 617.0126âAppeal from departmentâs Department of Stateâs 1260 refusal to file document.âIf the department of State refuses to 1261 file a document delivered to its office for filing, within 30 1262 days after return of the document by the department by mail, as 1263 evidenced by the postmark, the domestic or foreign corporation 1264 may: 1265 (1)âAppeal the refusal pursuant to s. 120.68; or 1266 (2)âPetition the Circuit Court of Leon County to compel 1267 filing of the document. Appeal the refusal to the circuit court 1268 of the county where the corporationâs principal office (or, if 1269 none in this state, its registered office) is or will be 1270 located. The appeal is commenced by petitioning the court to 1271 compel filing the document and by attaching to the petition The 1272 document and the departmentâs department of Stateâs explanation 1273 of its refusal to file must be attached to the petition. The 1274 matter shall promptly be tried de novo by the court without a 1275 jury. The court may decide the matter in a summary proceeding, 1276 and the court may summarily order the department of State to 1277 file the document or take other action the court considers 1278 appropriate. The courtâs final decision may be appealed as in 1279 other civil proceedings. 1280 Section 6.âSection 617.0127, Florida Statutes, is amended 1281 to read: 1282 617.0127âCertificates to be received in evidence; 1283 evidentiary effect of certified copy of filed document.âAll 1284 certificates issued by the department pursuant to this chapter 1285 must be taken and received in all courts, public offices, and 1286 official bodies as prima facie evidence of the facts stated 1287 therein. A certificate attached to a copy of a document filed by 1288 the department of State, bearing the signature of the Secretary 1289 of State, (which may be in facsimile,) and the seal of this 1290 state, is conclusive evidence that the original document is on 1291 file with the department. 1292 Section 7.âSubsection (1) of section 617.0128, Florida 1293 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (2) of that section is 1294 reenacted, to read: 1295 617.0128âCertificate of status.â 1296 (1)âAnyone may apply to The department, upon request, shall 1297 issue of State to furnish a certificate of status for a domestic 1298 corporation or a certificate of authorization for a foreign 1299 corporation. 1300 (2)âA certificate of status or authorization sets forth: 1301 (a)âThe domestic corporationâs corporate name or the 1302 foreign corporationâs corporate name used in this state; 1303 (b)1.âThat the domestic corporation is duly incorporated 1304 under the law of this state and the date of its incorporation, 1305 or 1306 2.âThat the foreign corporation is authorized to conduct 1307 its affairs in this state; 1308 (c)âThat all fees and penalties owed to the department have 1309 been paid, if: 1310 1.âPayment is reflected in the records of the department, 1311 and 1312 2.âNonpayment affects the existence or authorization of the 1313 domestic or foreign corporation; 1314 (d)âThat its most recent annual report required by s. 1315 617.1622 has been delivered to the department; and 1316 (e)âThat articles of dissolution have not been filed. 1317 Section 8.âSection 617.01301, Florida Statutes, is amended 1318 to read: 1319 617.01301âPowers of department of State.â 1320 (1)âThe department of State may propound to any corporation 1321 subject to the provisions of this chapter act, and to any 1322 officer or director thereof, such interrogatories as may be 1323 reasonably necessary and proper to enable it to ascertain 1324 whether the corporation has complied with all applicable filing 1325 provisions of this chapter act. Such interrogatories must be 1326 answered within 30 days after mailing or within such additional 1327 time as fixed by the department. Answers to interrogatories must 1328 be full and complete, in writing, and under oath. 1329 Interrogatories directed to an individual must be answered by 1330 that individual him or her, and interrogatories directed to a 1331 corporation must be answered by an authorized officer or 1332 director of the corporation, by a member if there are no 1333 officers or directors of the corporation, or by a fiduciary if 1334 the corporation is in the hands of a receiver, trustee, or other 1335 court-appointed fiduciary the president, vice president, 1336 secretary, or assistant secretary. 1337 (2)âThe department of State is not required to file any 1338 document: 1339 (a)âTo which interrogatories, as propounded pursuant to 1340 subsection (1) relate, until the interrogatories are answered in 1341 full; 1342 (b)âWhen interrogatories or other relevant evidence 1343 discloses that such document is not in conformity with the 1344 provisions of this chapter act; or 1345 (c)âWhen the department has determined that the parties to 1346 such document have not paid all fees, taxes, and penalties due 1347 and owing this state. 1348 (3)âThe department of State may, based upon its findings 1349 hereunder or as provided in s. 213.053(15), bring an action in 1350 circuit court to collect any penalties, fees, or taxes 1351 determined to be due and owing the state and to compel any 1352 filing, qualification, or registration required by law. In 1353 connection with such proceeding the department may, without 1354 prior approval by the court, file a lis pendens against any 1355 property owned by the corporation and may further certify any 1356 findings to the Department of Legal Affairs for the initiation 1357 of any action permitted pursuant to s. 617.0503 which the 1358 Department of Legal Affairs may deem appropriate. 1359 (4)âThe department has of State shall have the power and 1360 authority reasonably necessary to enable it to administer this 1361 chapter act efficiently, to perform the duties herein imposed 1362 upon it, and to adopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 1363 120.54 to implement this chapter the provisions of this act 1364 conferring duties upon it. 1365 Section 9.âSection 617.01401, Florida Statutes, is amended 1366 to read: 1367 617.01401âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 1368 (1)ââApplicable countyâ means the county in this state in 1369 which a corporationâs principal office is located or was located 1370 when an action is or was commenced. If the corporation has, or 1371 at the time of such action had, no principal office in this 1372 state, the applicable county is the county in which the 1373 corporation has, or at the time of such action had, an office in 1374 this state. If the corporation does not have an office in this 1375 state, the applicable county is the county in which the 1376 corporationâs registered office is or was last located. 1377 (2)ââArticles of incorporationâ includes original, amended, 1378 and restated articles of incorporation, articles of 1379 consolidation, and articles of merger, and all amendments 1380 thereto, including documents designated by the laws of this 1381 state as charters, and, in the case of a foreign corporation, 1382 documents equivalent to articles of incorporation in the 1383 jurisdiction of incorporation. 1384 (3)ââAuthorized entityâ means any of the following: 1385 (a)âA corporation for profit. 1386 (b)âA limited liability company. 1387 (c)âA limited liability partnership. 1388 (d)âA limited partnership, including a limited liability 1389 limited partnership. 1390 (4)(2)ââBoard of directorsâ means the group of persons 1391 vested with the management of the affairs of the corporation 1392 irrespective of the name by which such group is designated, 1393 including, but not limited to, managers or trustees. 1394 (5)(3)ââBylawsâ means the code or codes of rules adopted 1395 for the regulation or management of the affairs of the 1396 corporation irrespective of the name or names by which such 1397 rules are designated. 1398 (6)ââCharitable assetâ means property that is given, 1399 received, or held for a charitable purpose. 1400 (7)ââCharitable purposeâ means a purpose that: 1401 (a)âWould make a corporation organized and operated 1402 exclusively for that purpose eligible to be exempt from taxation 1403 under s. 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as 1404 amended, or 1405 (b)âIs considered charitable under the law of this state 1406 other than as set forth in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as 1407 amended. 1408 (8)(4)ââCorporationâ or âdomestic corporationâ means a 1409 nonprofit corporation not for profit, subject to the provisions 1410 of this chapter, except a foreign corporation. 1411 (5)ââCorporation not for profitâ means a corporation no 1412 part of the income or profit of which is distributable to its 1413 members, directors, or officers, except as otherwise provided 1414 under this chapter. 1415 (9)(6)ââDepartmentâ means the Florida Department of State. 1416 (7)ââDistributionâ means the payment of a dividend or any 1417 part of the income or profit of a corporation to its members, 1418 directors, or officers. 1419 (a)âA donation or transfer of corporate assets or income to 1420 or from another not-for-profit corporation qualified as tax 1421 exempt under s. 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code or a 1422 governmental organization exempt from federal and state income 1423 taxes, if such corporation or governmental organization is a 1424 member of the corporation making such donation or transfer, is 1425 not a distribution for purposes of this chapter. 1426 (b)âA dividend or distribution by a not-for-profit 1427 insurance company subsidiary to its mutual insurance holding 1428 company organized under part III of chapter 628, directly or 1429 indirectly through one or more intermediate holding companies 1430 authorized under that part, is not a distribution for the 1431 purposes of this chapter. 1432 (10)(8)ââElectronic transmissionâ means any form of 1433 communication, not directly involving the physical transmission 1434 or transfer of paper, which creates a record that may be 1435 retained, retrieved, and reviewed by a recipient and which may 1436 be directly reproduced in a comprehensible and legible paper 1437 form by such recipient through an automated process. Examples of 1438 electronic transmission include, but are not limited to, 1439 electronic mail, telegrams, facsimile, and transmissions through 1440 the Internet transmissions of images, and text that is sent via 1441 electronic mail between computers. 1442 (11)(a)ââEligible entityâ means a domestic or foreign: 1443 1.âCorporation or corporation for profit; 1444 2.âGeneral partnership, including a limited liability 1445 partnership; 1446 3.âLimited partnership, including a limited liability 1447 limited partnership; 1448 4.âLimited liability company; or 1449 5.âOther unincorporated entity. 1450 (b)âThe term does not include: 1451 1.âAn individual; 1452 2.âAn association or relationship that is not a partnership 1453 solely by reason of s. 620.8202(2) or a similar provision of the 1454 law of another jurisdiction; 1455 3.âA decedentâs estate; or 1456 4.âA government or a governmental subdivision, agency, or 1457 instrumentality. 1458 (12)ââEligible interestâ means: 1459 (a)âA share; 1460 (b)âA membership; or 1461 (c)âEither or both of the following rights under the 1462 organic rules governing the entity: 1463 1.âThe right to receive distributions from the entity 1464 either in the ordinary course of business or upon liquidation. 1465 2.âThe right to receive notice or vote on issues involving 1466 its internal affairs, other than as an agent, assignee, proxy, 1467 or person responsible for managing its business, activities, or 1468 affairs. 1469 (13)ââEntityâ includes corporations and foreign 1470 corporations; unincorporated associations; business trusts, 1471 estates, limited liability companies, partnerships, trusts, and 1472 two or more persons having a joint or common economic interest; 1473 any state, the United States, or any foreign government. 1474 (14)(9)ââForeign corporationâ means a nonprofit corporation 1475 not for profit organized under laws other than the laws of this 1476 state. 1477 (15)(10)ââInsolventâ means the inability of a corporation 1478 to pay its debts as they become due in the usual course of its 1479 affairs. 1480 (16)ââInterest holderâ means any of the following persons: 1481 (a)âA shareholder of a corporation for profit. 1482 (b)âA member of a nonprofit corporation. 1483 (c)âA general partner of a general partnership. 1484 (d)âA general partner of a limited partnership. 1485 (e)âA limited partner of a limited partnership. 1486 (f)âA member of a limited liability company. 1487 (g)âA shareholder or beneficial owner of a real estate 1488 investment trust. 1489 (h)âA beneficiary or beneficial owner of a statutory trust, 1490 business trust, or common law business trust. 1491 (i)âAnother direct holder of an interest. 1492 (17)ââInterest holder liabilityâ means: 1493 (a)âPersonal liability for a liability of an entity which 1494 arises, except as otherwise provided in the organic rules of the 1495 entity, when the entity incurs the liability and which is 1496 imposed on a person: 1497 1.âSolely by reason of the status of the person as an 1498 interest holder; or 1499 2.âBy the organic rules of the entity which make one or 1500 more specified interest holders or categories of interest 1501 holders liable in their capacity as interest holders for all or 1502 specified liabilities of the entity; or 1503 (b)âAn obligation of an interest holder under the organic 1504 rules of an entity to contribute to the entity. 1505 (18)(11)ââMailâ means the United States mail, facsimile 1506 transmissions, and private mail carriers handling nationwide 1507 mail services. 1508 (19)(12)ââMemberâ means one having membership rights in a 1509 corporation in accordance with the provisions of its articles of 1510 incorporation or bylaws or the provisions of this chapter. 1511 (13)ââMutual benefit corporationâ means a domestic 1512 corporation that is not organized primarily or exclusively for 1513 religious purposes; is not recognized as exempt under s. 1514 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; and is not organized for 1515 a public or charitable purpose that is required upon its 1516 dissolution to distribute its assets to the United States, a 1517 state, a local subdivision thereof, or a person that is 1518 recognized as exempt under s. 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue 1519 Code. The term does not include an association organized under 1520 chapter 718, chapter 719, chapter 720, or chapter 721, or any 1521 corporation where membership in the corporation is required 1522 pursuant to a document recorded in county property records. 1523 (20)ââNonprofit corporationâ means a corporation no part of 1524 the income or profit of which is distributable to its members, 1525 directors, or officers, except as otherwise provided under this 1526 chapter. 1527 (21)ââOrganic rulesâ means the public organic record and 1528 private organic rules of an entity. 1529 (22)(14)ââPersonâ includes an individual and entity. 1530 (23)ââPrivate organic rulesâ means the rules, regardless of 1531 whether in a record, which govern the internal affairs of an 1532 entity, are binding on all its interest holders, and are not 1533 part of its public organic record, if any. If the private 1534 organic rules are amended or restated, the term means the 1535 private organic rules as last amended or restated. The term 1536 includes any of the following: 1537 (a)âThe bylaws of a corporation for profit. 1538 (b)âThe bylaws of a nonprofit corporation. 1539 (c)âThe partnership agreement of a general partnership. 1540 (d)âThe partnership agreement of a limited partnership. 1541 (e)âThe operating agreement, limited liability company 1542 agreement, or similar agreement of a limited liability company. 1543 (f)âThe bylaws, trust instrument, or similar rules of a 1544 real estate investment trust. 1545 (g)âThe trust instrument of a statutory trust or similar 1546 rules of a business trust or common law business trust. 1547 (24)ââProtected agreementâ means any of the following: 1548 (a)âA document evidencing indebtedness of a domestic 1549 corporation or eligible entity and any related agreement in 1550 effect immediately before July 1, 2026. 1551 (b)âAn agreement that is binding on a domestic corporation 1552 or eligible entity immediately before July 1, 2026. 1553 (c)âThe articles of incorporation or bylaws of a domestic 1554 corporation or the organic rules of a domestic eligible entity, 1555 in each case in effect immediately before July 1, 2026. 1556 (d)âAn agreement that is binding on any of the interest 1557 holders, directors, or other governors of a domestic corporation 1558 or eligible entity, in their capacities as such, immediately 1559 before July 1, 2026. 1560 (25)ââPublic organic recordâ means a record, the filing of 1561 which by a governmental body is required to form an entity, and 1562 an amendment to or restatement of such record. When a public 1563 organic record has been amended or restated, the term means the 1564 public organic record as last amended or restated. The term 1565 includes any of the following: 1566 (a)âThe articles of incorporation of a corporation for 1567 profit. 1568 (b)âThe articles of incorporation of a nonprofit 1569 corporation. 1570 (c)âThe certificate of limited partnership of a limited 1571 partnership. 1572 (d)âThe articles of organization, certificate of 1573 organization, or certificate of formation of a limited liability 1574 company. 1575 (e)âThe articles of incorporation of a general cooperative 1576 association or a limited cooperative association. 1577 (f)âThe certificate of trust of a statutory trust or 1578 similar record of a business trust. 1579 (g)âThe articles of incorporation of a real estate 1580 investment trust. 1581 (26)(15)ââSuccessor entityâ means any trust, receivership, 1582 or other legal entity that is governed by the laws of this state 1583 to which the remaining assets of the and liabilities of a 1584 dissolved corporation are transferred, subject to its 1585 liabilities, for purposes of liquidation and that exists solely 1586 for the purposes of prosecuting and defending suits by or 1587 against the dissolved corporation and enabling the dissolved 1588 corporation to settle and close the business of the dissolved 1589 corporation, to dispose of and convey the property of the 1590 dissolved corporation, to discharge the liabilities of the 1591 dissolved corporation, and to distribute to the dissolved 1592 corporationâs members any remaining assets, but not for the 1593 purpose of continuing the business for which the dissolved 1594 corporation was organized. 1595 (27)(16)ââVoting powerâ means the total number of votes 1596 entitled to be cast for the election of directors at the time 1597 the determination of voting power is made, excluding a vote that 1598 is contingent upon the happening of a condition or event that 1599 has not yet occurred. If the corporationâs directors are not 1600 elected by the members, voting power must, unless otherwise 1601 provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, be on a 1602 one-member, one-vote basis. If the members of a class are 1603 entitled to vote as a class to elect directors, the 1604 determination of the voting power of the class is based on the 1605 percentage of the number of directors the class is entitled to 1606 elect relative to the total number of authorized directors. If 1607 the corporationâs directors are not elected by the members, 1608 voting power shall, unless otherwise provided in the articles of 1609 incorporation or bylaws, be on a one-member, one-vote basis. 1610 Section 10.âSubsections (1) through (6), (8), and (9) of 1611 section 617.0141, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1612 617.0141âNotice.â 1613 (1)âNotice under this chapter act must be in writing, 1614 unless oral notice is: 1615 (a)âExpressly authorized by the articles of incorporation 1616 or the bylaws; and 1617 (b)âReasonable under the circumstances. 1618 (2)âWritten notice may be communicated by mail, electronic 1619 mail, facsimile in person; by telephone (where oral notice is 1620 permitted), telegraph, teletype, or other form of electronic 1621 transmission; or by mail. When oral notice is permitted, notice 1622 may be communicated in person, by telephone, or other electronic 1623 transmission by means of which all persons participating can 1624 hear each other. 1625 (3)âWritten notice by a domestic or foreign corporation 1626 authorized to conduct its affairs in this state to its member, 1627 if in a comprehensible form, is effective under any of the 1628 following circumstances: 1629 (a)âWhen mailed, if mailed postpaid and correctly addressed 1630 to the memberâs address shown in the domestic or foreign 1631 corporationâs current record of members.; 1632 (b)âWhen actually transmitted by facsimile 1633 telecommunication, if correctly directed to a telephone number 1634 at which the member has consented to receive notice.; 1635 (c)âWhen actually transmitted by electronic mail, if 1636 correctly directed to an electronic mail address at which the 1637 member has consented to receive notice.; 1638 (d)âWhen posted on an electronic network that the member 1639 has consented to consult, upon the later of: 1640 1.âSuch correct posting; or 1641 2.âThe giving of a separate notice to the member of the 1642 fact of such specific posting.; or 1643 (e)âWhen correctly transmitted to the member, if by any 1644 other form of electronic transmission consented to by the member 1645 to whom notice is given. 1646 (4)âConsent by a member to receive notice by electronic 1647 transmission is shall be revocable by the member by written 1648 notice to the domestic or foreign corporation. Any such consent 1649 is shall be deemed revoked if: 1650 (a)âThe domestic or foreign corporation is unable to 1651 deliver by electronic transmission two consecutive notices given 1652 by the domestic or foreign corporation in accordance with such 1653 consent; and 1654 (b)âSuch inability becomes known to the secretary or an 1655 assistant secretary of the domestic or foreign corporation, or 1656 other authorized person responsible for the giving of notice. 1657 However, the inadvertent failure to treat such inability as a 1658 revocation does not invalidate any meeting or other action. 1659 (5)âWritten notice to a domestic or foreign corporation 1660 authorized to conduct its affairs in this state may be addressed 1661 to its registered agent at its registered office. Written notice 1662 may also be delivered or to the domestic or foreign corporation 1663 or its secretary at its principal office shown in its most 1664 recent annual report or, in the case of a domestic or foreign 1665 corporation that has not yet delivered an annual report, in a 1666 domestic corporationâs articles of incorporation or in a foreign 1667 corporationâs application for certificate of authority. 1668 (6)âExcept as provided in subsection (3) or elsewhere in 1669 this chapter act, written notice, if in a comprehensible form, 1670 is effective at the earliest date of any of the following: 1671 (a)âWhen received.; 1672 (b)âFive days after its deposit in the United States mail, 1673 as evidenced by the postmark, if mailed postpaid and correctly 1674 addressed.; or 1675 (c)âOn the date shown on the return receipt, if sent by 1676 registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, and the 1677 receipt is signed by or on behalf of the addressee. 1678 (8)âAn affidavit of the secretary, an assistant secretary, 1679 the transfer agent, or other authorized agent of the domestic or 1680 foreign corporation that the notice has been given by a form of 1681 electronic transmission is, in the absence of fraud, prima facie 1682 evidence of the facts stated in the notice. 1683 (9)âIf this chapter act prescribes notice requirements for 1684 particular circumstances, those requirements govern. If articles 1685 of incorporation or bylaws prescribe notice requirements not 1686 less stringent than the requirements of this section or other 1687 provisions of this chapter act, those requirements govern. 1688 Section 11.âSection 617.0143, Florida Statutes, is created 1689 to read: 1690 617.0143âQualified director.â 1691 (1)âFor purposes of this chapter, the term: 1692 (a)ââMaterial interestâ means an actual or potential 1693 benefit or detriment, other than one which would devolve on the 1694 corporation or the members generally, which would reasonably be 1695 expected to impair the objectivity of the directorâs judgment 1696 when participating in the action to be taken. For a corporation 1697 that is regulated by chapter 718, chapter 719, chapter 720, 1698 chapter 721, or chapter 723, or a corporation when membership in 1699 such corporation is required pursuant to a document recorded in 1700 the county property records, a âmaterial interestâ is limited to 1701 familial, financial, professional, or employment interests. 1702 (b)ââMaterial relationshipâ means a familial, financial, 1703 professional, employment, or other relationship that would 1704 reasonably be expected to impair the objectivity of the 1705 directorâs judgment when participating in the action to be 1706 taken. 1707 (c)ââQualified directorâ is a director who, at the time 1708 action is to be taken under: 1709 1.âSection 617.0744, and who does not have an interest in 1710 the outcome of the proceeding or has a material relationship 1711 with a person who has an interest in the outcome of the 1712 proceeding; 1713 2.âSection 617.0832, and who is not a director as to whom 1714 the transaction is a directorâs conflict of interest 1715 transaction, or who has a material relationship with another 1716 director as to whom the transaction is a directorâs conflict of 1717 interest transaction; or 1718 3.âSection 617.0831, with respect to the application of ss. 1719 607.0850-607.0859, and who: 1720 a.âIs not a party to the proceeding; 1721 b.âIs not a director as to whom a transaction is a 1722 directorâs conflict of interest transaction, which transaction 1723 is challenged in the proceeding; and 1724 c.âDoes not have a material relationship with a director 1725 who is disqualified by virtue of not meeting the requirements of 1726 sub-subparagraph a. or sub-subparagraph b. 1727 (2)âA director is not automatically prevented from being a 1728 qualified director if any of the following is present: 1729 (a)âThe nomination or election of the director to the 1730 current board of directors by any director who is not a 1731 qualified director with respect to the matter, or by any person 1732 who has a material relationship with that director, acting alone 1733 or participating with others. 1734 (b)âService as a director of another corporation of which a 1735 director who is not a qualified director with respect to the 1736 matter, or any individual who has a material relationship with 1737 that director is or was also a director. 1738 (c)âWith respect to actions pursuant to s. 617.0744, status 1739 as a named defendant, as a director against whom action is 1740 demanded, or as a director who approved the conduct being 1741 challenged. 1742 Section 12.âSubsections (1) and (2) of section 617.0202, 1743 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1744 617.0202âArticles of incorporation; content.â 1745 (1)âThe articles of incorporation must set forth: 1746 (a)âA corporate name for the corporation that satisfies the 1747 requirements of s. 617.0401;. 1748 (b)âThe street address of the initial principal office and, 1749 if different, the mailing address of the corporation; 1750 (c)âThe purpose or purposes for which the corporation is 1751 organized; 1752 (d)âA statement of the manner in which the directors are to 1753 be elected or appointed. In lieu thereof, the articles of 1754 incorporation may provide that the method of election of 1755 directors be stated in the bylaws; 1756 (e)âAny provision that lawfully limits the corporate powers 1757 authorized under this chapter, not inconsistent with this act or 1758 with any other law, which limits in any manner the corporate 1759 powers authorized under this act; 1760 (f)âThe street address of the corporationâs initial 1761 registered office and the name of its initial registered agent 1762 at that address together with a written acceptance of 1763 appointment as a registered agent as required by s. 617.0501; 1764 and 1765 (g)âThe name and address of each incorporator. 1766 (2)âThe articles of incorporation may set forth: 1767 (a)âThe names and addresses of the individuals who are to 1768 serve as the initial directors; 1769 (b)âAny provision not inconsistent with law, regarding the 1770 regulation of the internal affairs of the corporation, 1771 including, without limitation, any provision with respect to the 1772 relative rights or interests of the members as among themselves 1773 or in the property of the corporation; 1774 (c)âThe manner of termination of membership in the 1775 corporation; 1776 (d)âThe rights, upon termination of membership, of the 1777 corporation, the terminated members, and the remaining members; 1778 (e)âThe transferability or nontransferability of membership 1779 to the extent consistent with s. 617.0605; 1780 (f)âThe distribution of assets upon dissolution or final 1781 liquidation or, if otherwise permitted by law, upon partial 1782 liquidation; 1783 (g)âIf the corporation is to have one or more classes of 1784 members, any provision designating the class or classes of 1785 members and stating the qualifications and rights of the members 1786 of each class; 1787 (h)âThe names of any persons or the designations of any 1788 groups of persons who are to be the initial members; 1789 (i)âA provision to the effect that the corporation will be 1790 subordinate to and subject to the authority of any head or 1791 national association, lodge, order, beneficial association, 1792 fraternal or beneficial society, foundation, federation, or 1793 other corporation, society, organization, or nonprofit 1794 association not for profit; and 1795 (j)âAny provision that under this chapter act is required 1796 or permitted to be set forth in the bylaws. Any such provision 1797 set forth in the articles of incorporation need not be set forth 1798 in the bylaws. 1799 Section 13.âSection 617.0204, Florida Statutes, is amended 1800 to read: 1801 617.0204âLiability for preincorporation transactions.âAll 1802 persons purporting to act as or on behalf of a corporation, 1803 knowing having actual knowledge that there was no incorporation 1804 under this chapter act, are jointly and severally liable for all 1805 liabilities created while so acting except for any liability to 1806 any person who also had actual knowledge that there was no 1807 incorporation. 1808 Section 14.âSection 617.0206, Florida Statutes, is amended 1809 to read: 1810 617.0206âBylaws.âThe initial bylaws of a corporation shall 1811 be adopted by its board of directors unless that power is 1812 reserved to the members by the articles of incorporation. The 1813 power to alter, amend, or repeal the bylaws or adopt new bylaws 1814 is shall be vested in the board of directors unless otherwise 1815 provided in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. The 1816 bylaws may contain any provision for the regulation and 1817 management of the affairs of the corporation not inconsistent 1818 with law or the articles of incorporation. 1819 Section 15.âSubsections (1), (3), (6), (8), (12), (14), and 1820 (16) of section 617.0302, Florida Statutes, are amended, and a 1821 new subsection (16) is added to that section, to read: 1822 617.0302âCorporate powers.âEvery nonprofit corporation not 1823 for profit organized under this chapter, unless otherwise 1824 provided in its articles of incorporation or bylaws, shall have 1825 power to: 1826 (1)âHave succession by its corporate name for the period 1827 set forth in its articles of incorporation. 1828 (2)(3)âAdopt, use, and alter a common corporate seal. 1829 However, such seal must always contain the words âcorporation 1830 not for profitâ or ânonprofit corporation.â 1831 (5)(6)âIncrease or decrease, by a vote of its members cast 1832 as the bylaws may direct, the number of its directors, subject 1833 to any minimum number of directors required under s. 617.0803 so 1834 that the number shall not be less than three but may be any 1835 number in excess thereof. 1836 (7)(8)âConduct its affairs, carry on its operations, and 1837 have offices and exercise the powers granted by this chapter act 1838 in any state, territory, district, or possession of the United 1839 States or any foreign country. 1840 (11)(12)âPurchase, take, receive, subscribe for, or 1841 otherwise acquire, own, hold, vote, use, employ, sell, mortgage, 1842 lend, pledge, or otherwise dispose of and otherwise use and deal 1843 in and with, shares and other interests in, or obligations of, 1844 other entities domestic or foreign corporations, whether for 1845 profit or not for profit, associations, partnerships, or 1846 individuals, or direct or indirect obligations of the United 1847 States, or of any other government, state, territory, 1848 governmental district, municipality, or of any instrumentality 1849 thereof. 1850 (13)(14)âMake donations for the public welfare or for 1851 religious, charitable, scientific, literary, educational, or 1852 other similar purposes. 1853 (15)(16)âMerge with other corporations or other eligible 1854 entities identified in s. 607.1101, both for profit and 1855 nonprofit not for profit, domestic and foreign, in accordance 1856 with the merger provisions of this chapter if the surviving 1857 corporation or other surviving eligible entity is a corporation 1858 not for profit or other eligible entity that has been organized 1859 as a not-for-profit entity under a governing statute or other 1860 applicable law that permits such a merger. 1861 (16)âBe a promoter, incorporator, partner, member, 1862 associate, or manager of any corporation, joint venture, or 1863 other entity. 1864 Section 16.âSection 617.0304, Florida Statutes, is amended 1865 to read: 1866 617.0304âLack of power to act Ultra vires.â 1867 (1)âExcept as provided in subsection (2), the validity of 1868 corporate action, including, but not limited to, any conveyance, 1869 transfer, or encumbrance of real or personal property to or by a 1870 corporation, may not be challenged on the ground that the 1871 corporation lacks or lacked power to act. 1872 (2)âA corporationâs power to act may be challenged: 1873 (a)âIn a proceeding by a member against the corporation to 1874 enjoin the act; 1875 (b)âIn a proceeding by the corporation, directly, 1876 derivatively, or through a receiver, trustee, or other legal 1877 representative, or through members in a representative suit, 1878 against an incumbent or former officer, employee, or agent of 1879 the corporation; or 1880 (c)âIn a proceeding by the Attorney General, as provided in 1881 this chapter act, to dissolve the corporation or in a proceeding 1882 by the Attorney General to enjoin the corporation from the 1883 transaction of unauthorized business. 1884 (3)âIn a memberâs proceeding under paragraph (2)(a) to 1885 enjoin an unauthorized corporate act, the court may enjoin or 1886 set aside the act, if equitable and if all affected persons are 1887 parties to the proceeding, and may award damages for loss (other 1888 than anticipated profits) suffered by the corporation or another 1889 party because of enjoining the unauthorized act, except the 1890 court may not award damages for anticipated profits. 1891 Section 17.âSubsections (3), (4), and (5) are added to 1892 section 617.0401, Florida Statutes, to read: 1893 617.0401âCorporate name.â 1894 (3)âNotwithstanding subsection (2), a corporation may 1895 register under a name that is not otherwise distinguishable on 1896 the records of the department if: 1897 (a)âThe other entity consents to the use and submits an 1898 undertaking in form satisfactory to the secretary of state to 1899 change its name to a name that is distinguishable upon the 1900 records of the department from the name of the applying 1901 corporation; or 1902 (b)âThe applicant delivers to the department a certified 1903 copy of a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction 1904 establishing the applicantâs right to use the name applied for 1905 in the state. 1906 (4)âA corporate name as filed with the department is for 1907 public notice only and does not alone create any presumption of 1908 ownership of such name. 1909 (5)âThis section does not apply to the use of fictitious 1910 names. 1911 Section 18.âSubsections (1), (2), (5), and (6) of section 1912 617.0403, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1913 617.0403âRegistered name; application; renewal; 1914 revocation.â 1915 (1)âA foreign corporation may register its corporate name, 1916 or its corporate name with any addition required by s. 617.1506, 1917 if the name is distinguishable upon the records of the 1918 department of State from the corporate names that are not 1919 available under s. 617.0401(1)(e). 1920 (2)âA foreign corporation registers its corporate name, or 1921 its corporate name with any addition required by s. 617.1506, by 1922 delivering to the department of State for filing an application: 1923 (a)âSetting forth its corporate name, or its corporate name 1924 with any addition required by s. 617.1506, the state or country 1925 and date of its incorporation, and a brief description of the 1926 nature of its purposes and the affairs in which it is engaged; 1927 and 1928 (b)âAccompanied by a certificate of existence, or a 1929 certificate setting forth that such corporation is in good 1930 standing under the laws of the state or country wherein it is 1931 organized, (or a document of similar import), from the state or 1932 country of incorporation. 1933 (5)âA foreign corporation that has so registered its name 1934 the registration of which is effective may thereafter qualify to 1935 conduct its affairs in this state as a foreign corporation under 1936 the registered name or consent in writing to the use of that 1937 name by a corporation thereafter incorporated under this chapter 1938 act or by another foreign corporation thereafter authorized to 1939 conduct its affairs in this state. The registration terminates 1940 when the domestic corporation is incorporated or the foreign 1941 corporation qualifies or consents to the qualification of 1942 another foreign corporation under the registered name. 1943 (6)âThe department of State may revoke any registration if, 1944 after a hearing, it finds that the application therefor or any 1945 renewal thereof was not made in good faith. 1946 Section 19.âPresent subsections (4) and (5) of section 1947 617.0501, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (5) 1948 and (6), respectively, a new subsection (4) is added to that 1949 section, and subsections (1) and (3) and present subsection (5) 1950 and subsection (6) of that section are amended, to read: 1951 617.0501âRegistered office and registered agent.â 1952 (1)âEach corporation shall have and continuously maintain 1953 in this state: 1954 (a)âA registered office which may be the same as its 1955 principal office; and 1956 (b)âA registered agent, who may be either: 1957 1.âAn individual who resides in this state whose business 1958 office is identical to with such registered office; or 1959 2.a.âAnother domestic entity that is an authorized entity 1960 whose business address is identical to the address of the 1961 registered office; or 1962 3.b.âA foreign entity authorized to transact business in 1963 this state that is an authorized entity and whose business 1964 address is identical to the address of the registered office. 1965 (3)âEach initial A registered agent, and each appointed 1966 pursuant to this section or a successor registered agent that is 1967 appointed, pursuant to s. 617.0502 on whom process may be served 1968 shall each file a statement in writing with the department of 1969 State, in the such form and manner as shall be prescribed by the 1970 department, accepting the appointment as a registered agent 1971 while simultaneously with his or her being designated as the 1972 registered agent. The Such statement of acceptance must provide 1973 shall state that the registered agent is familiar with, and 1974 accepts, the obligations of that position. 1975 (4)âThe duties of a registered agent are: 1976 (a)âTo forward to the corporation, at the address most 1977 recently supplied to the registered agent by the corporation, a 1978 process, notice, or demand pertaining to the corporation which 1979 is served on or received by the registered agent; and 1980 (b)âIf the registered agent resigns, to provide the notice 1981 required under s. 617.0502 to the corporation at the address 1982 most recently supplied to the registered agent by the 1983 corporation. 1984 (6)(5)âA corporation may not prosecute or maintain any 1985 action in a court in this state until the corporation complies 1986 with this section or s. 617.1508, as applicable; pays to the 1987 department of State any amounts required under this chapter; 1988 and, to the extent ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction, 1989 pays to the department of State a penalty of $5 for each day it 1990 has failed to so comply or $500, whichever is less. A court may 1991 stay a proceeding commenced by a corporation until the 1992 corporation complies with this section. 1993 (6)âFor the purposes of this section, the term âauthorized 1994 entityâ means: 1995 (a)âA corporation for profit; 1996 (b)âA limited liability company; 1997 (c)âA limited liability partnership; or 1998 (d)âA limited partnership, including a limited liability 1999 limited partnership. 2000 Section 20.âSection 617.0502, Florida Statutes, is amended 2001 to read: 2002 617.0502âChange of registered office or registered agent; 2003 resignation of registered agent.â 2004 (1)âA corporation may change its registered office or its 2005 registered agent upon filing with the department of State a 2006 statement of change setting forth: 2007 (a)âThe name of the corporation; 2008 (b)âThe name street address of its current registered agent 2009 office; 2010 (c)âIf the current registered agent office is to be 2011 changed, the name street address of the new registered agent 2012 office; 2013 (d)âThe street address name of its current registered 2014 office for its current registered agent; 2015 (e)âIf the street address of the current registered office 2016 is to be changed, the new street address of the registered 2017 office in this state. 2018 (2)âIf the its current registered agent is to be changed, 2019 the written acceptance name of the successor new registered 2020 agent as described in s. 617.0501(3) must be provided to the 2021 department and the new agentâs written consent (either on the 2022 statement or attached to it) to the appointment; 2023 (f)âThat the street address of its registered office and 2024 the street address of the business office of its registered 2025 agent, as changed, will be identical; and 2026 (g)âThat such change was authorized by resolution duly 2027 adopted by its board of directors or by an officer of the 2028 corporation so authorized by the board of directors. 2029 (2)(a)âAny registered agent may resign his or her agency 2030 appointment by signing and delivering for filing with the 2031 Department of State a statement of resignation and mailing a 2032 copy of such statement to the corporation at its mailing address 2033 of the respective corporation that then appears in the records 2034 of the Department of State; provided, however, that if a 2035 composite statement of resignation is being filed pursuant to 2036 paragraph (b), the registered agent must promptly mail a copy of 2037 either the composite statement of resignation or a separate 2038 notice of resignation for each respective corporation, in each 2039 case using the respective mailing address of the respective 2040 corporation that then appears in the records of the Department 2041 of State. The statement of resignation shall state that a copy 2042 of such statement of resignation or, if applicable, notice of 2043 resignation, has been mailed to the corporation at the address 2044 so stated. The agency is terminated as of the 31st day after the 2045 date on which the statement was filed and unless otherwise 2046 provided in the statement, termination of the agency acts as a 2047 termination of the registered office. 2048 (b)âIf a registered agent is resigning as registered agent 2049 from one or more corporations that each have been dissolved, 2050 either voluntarily, administratively, or by court action, for a 2051 continuous period of 10 years or longer, the registered agent 2052 may elect to file the statement of resignation separately for 2053 each such corporation or may elect to file a single composite 2054 statement of resignation covering two or more corporations. Any 2055 such composite statement of resignation must set forth, for each 2056 such corporation covered by the statement of resignation, the 2057 name of the respective corporation and the date that dissolution 2058 became effective for the respective corporation. This subsection 2059 is applicable only to resignations by registered agents from 2060 domestic corporations. 2061 (3)âIf a registered agent changes his or her business name 2062 or business address, he or she may change such name or address 2063 and the address of the registered office of any corporation for 2064 which he or she is the registered agent by: 2065 (a)âNotifying all such corporations in writing of the 2066 change; 2067 (b)âSigning (either manually or in facsimile) and 2068 delivering to the Department of State for filing a statement 2069 that substantially complies with the requirements of paragraphs 2070 (1)(a)-(f), setting forth the names of all such corporations 2071 represented by the registered agent; and 2072 (c)âReciting that each corporation has been notified of the 2073 change. 2074 (4)âChanges of the registered office or registered agent 2075 may be made by a change on the corporationâs annual report form 2076 filed with the Department of State. 2077 (5)âThe Department of State shall collect a fee pursuant to 2078 s. 15.09(2) for filings authorized by this section. 2079 Section 21.âSection 617.05021, Florida Statutes, is created 2080 to read: 2081 617.05021âResignation of a registered agent.â 2082 (1)(a)âA registered agent may resign as agent for a 2083 corporation by delivering to the department a signed statement 2084 of resignation and mailing a copy of such statement to the 2085 corporation at its mailing address of the respective corporation 2086 that then appears in the records of the department; provided, 2087 however, that if a composite statement of resignation is being 2088 filed pursuant to paragraph (b), the registered agent must 2089 promptly mail a copy of either the composite statement of 2090 resignation or a separate notice of resignation for each 2091 respective corporation, in each case using the respective 2092 mailing address of the respective corporation that then appears 2093 in the records of the department. 2094 (b)âIf a registered agent is resigning as registered agent 2095 from one or more corporations that each have been dissolved, 2096 either voluntarily, administratively, or by court action, for a 2097 continuous period of 10 years or longer, the registered agent 2098 may elect to file the statement of resignation separately for 2099 each such corporation or may elect to file a single composite 2100 statement of resignation covering two or more corporations. Any 2101 such composite statement of resignation must set forth, for each 2102 such corporation covered by the statement of resignation, the 2103 name of the respective corporation and the date that dissolution 2104 became effective for the respective corporation. This paragraph 2105 is applicable only to resignations by registered agents from 2106 domestic corporations. 2107 (2)âA registered agent is terminated upon the earlier of: 2108 (a)âThe 31st day after the department files the statement 2109 of resignation; or 2110 (b)âWhen a statement of change or other record designating 2111 a new registered agent is filed by the department. 2112 (3)âWhen a statement of resignation takes effect, the 2113 registered agent ceases to have responsibility for a matter 2114 thereafter tendered to it as agent for the corporation. The 2115 resignation does not affect contractual rights that the 2116 corporation has against the agent or that the agent has against 2117 the corporation. 2118 (4)âA registered agent may resign from a corporation 2119 regardless of whether the corporation has active status. 2120 Section 22.âSection 617.05022, Florida Statutes, is created 2121 to read: 2122 617.05022âChange of name or address by a registered agent.â 2123 (1)âIf a registered agent changes the registered agentâs 2124 name or business address, the agent may deliver to the 2125 department for filing a statement of change that provides the 2126 following: 2127 (a)âThe name of the corporation represented by the 2128 registered agent. 2129 (b)âThe name of the registered agent as currently shown in 2130 the records of the department for the corporation. 2131 (c)âIf the name of the registered agent has changed, its 2132 new name. 2133 (d)âIf the address of the registered agent has changed, the 2134 new address. 2135 (e)âA statement that the registered agent has given the 2136 notice required under subsection (2). 2137 (2)âA registered agent shall promptly furnish notice to the 2138 represented corporation of the statement of change and the 2139 changes made in the statement, as delivered to the department. 2140 (3)âA statement of change is effective when filed by the 2141 department. 2142 (4)âThe changes described in this section may also be made 2143 on the corporationâs annual report, in an application for 2144 reinstatement filed with the department under s. 617.1422, or in 2145 an amendment to or restatement of the companyâs articles of 2146 incorporation in accordance with s. 617.1006 or s. 617.1007. 2147 (5)âThe department shall collect a fee pursuant to s. 2148 15.09(2) for filings authorized by this section. 2149 Section 23.âSection 617.0503, Florida Statutes, is amended 2150 to read: 2151 617.0503âFailure to maintain registered agent; subpoena by 2152 the Department of Legal Affairs Registered agent; duties; 2153 confidentiality of investigation records.â 2154 (1)(a)âEach corporation or, foreign corporation, or alien 2155 business organization that owns real property located in this 2156 state, that owns a mortgage on real property located in this 2157 state, or that conducts affairs transacts business in this state 2158 shall have and continuously maintain in this state a registered 2159 office and a registered agent and shall file with the department 2160 of State notice of the registered office and registered agent as 2161 provided in ss. 617.0501 and 617.0502. The appointment of a 2162 registered agent in compliance with s. 617.0501 or s. 617.0502 2163 is sufficient for purposes of this section if the registered 2164 agent so appointed files, in the form and manner prescribed by 2165 the department of State, an acceptance of the obligations 2166 provided for in this section. 2167 (b)âEach such corporation or, foreign corporation, or alien 2168 business organization that fails to have and continuously 2169 maintain a registered office and a registered agent as required 2170 in this section is liable to this state for $500 for each year, 2171 or part of a year, during which the domestic or corporation, 2172 foreign corporation, or alien business organization fails to 2173 comply with these requirements; but this liability is forgiven 2174 in full upon the compliance by the domestic or foreign 2175 corporation, foreign corporation, or alien business organization 2176 with the requirements of this subsection, even if that 2177 compliance occurs after an action to collect such amount is 2178 instituted. The Department of Legal Affairs may file an action 2179 in the circuit court for the judicial circuit in which the 2180 domestic or foreign corporation, foreign corporation, or alien 2181 business organization is found or conducts affairs transacts 2182 business, or in which real property belonging to the domestic or 2183 foreign corporation, foreign corporation, or alien business 2184 organization is located, to petition the court for an order 2185 directing that a registered agent be appointed and that a 2186 registered office be designated, and to obtain judgment for the 2187 amount owed under this subsection. In connection with such 2188 proceeding, the department may, without prior approval by the 2189 court, file a lis pendens against real property owned by the 2190 domestic or foreign corporation, foreign corporation, or alien 2191 business organization, which lis pendens must shall set forth 2192 the legal description of the real property and must shall be 2193 filed in the public records of the county where the real 2194 property is located. If the lis pendens is filed in any county 2195 other than the county in which the action is pending, the lis 2196 pendens that is filed must be a certified copy of the original 2197 lis pendens. The failure to comply timely or fully with an order 2198 directing that a registered agent be appointed and that a 2199 registered office be designated will result in a civil penalty 2200 of not more than $1,000 for each day of noncompliance. A 2201 judgment or an order of payment entered under this subsection 2202 becomes a judgment lien against any real property owned by the 2203 domestic or foreign corporation, foreign corporation, or alien 2204 business organization when a certified copy of the judgment or 2205 order is recorded as required by s. 55.10. The department may 2206 avail itself of, and is entitled to use, any provision of law or 2207 of the Florida Rules of Civil Procedure to further the 2208 collecting or obtaining of payment pursuant to a judgment or 2209 order of payment. The state, through the Attorney General, may 2210 bid, at any judicial sale to enforce its judgment lien, any 2211 amount up to the amount of the judgment or lien obtained 2212 pursuant to this subsection. All moneys recovered under this 2213 subsection must shall be treated as forfeitures under ss. 2214 895.01-895.09 and used or distributed in accordance with the 2215 procedure set forth in s. 895.09. A domestic or foreign 2216 corporation, foreign corporation, or alien business organization 2217 that fails to have and continuously maintain a registered office 2218 and a registered agent as required in this section may not 2219 defend itself against any action instituted by the Department of 2220 Legal Affairs or by any other agency of this state until the 2221 requirements of this subsection have been met. 2222 (2)âEach domestic or foreign corporation, foreign 2223 corporation, or alien business organization that owns real 2224 property located in this state, that owns a mortgage on real 2225 property located in this state, or that conducts affairs 2226 transacts business in this state must shall, pursuant to 2227 subpoena served upon the registered agent of the domestic or 2228 foreign corporation, foreign corporation, or alien business 2229 organization issued by the Department of Legal Affairs, produce, 2230 through its registered agent or through a designated 2231 representative within 30 days after service of the subpoena, 2232 testimony and records showing the following: 2233 (a)âTrue copies of documents evidencing the legal existence 2234 of the entity, including the articles of incorporation and any 2235 amendments to the articles of incorporation or the legal 2236 equivalent of the articles of incorporation and such amendments. 2237 (b)âThe names and addresses of each current officer and 2238 director of the entity or persons holding equivalent positions. 2239 (c)âThe names and addresses of all prior officers and 2240 directors of the entity or persons holding equivalent positions, 2241 for a period not to exceed the 5 years previous to the date of 2242 issuance of the subpoena. 2243 (d)âThe names and addresses of each member current 2244 shareholder, equivalent equitable owner, and ultimate equitable 2245 owner of the entity, the number of which names is limited to the 2246 names of the 100 members holding the largest share of voting 2247 power of the domestic or foreign corporation shareholders, 2248 equivalent equitable owners, and ultimate equitable owners that, 2249 in comparison to all other shareholders, equivalent equitable 2250 owners, or ultimate equitable owners, respectively, own the 2251 largest number of shares of stock of the corporation, foreign 2252 corporation, or alien business organization or the largest 2253 percentage of an equivalent form of equitable ownership of the 2254 corporation, foreign corporation, or alien business 2255 organization. 2256 (e)âThe names and addresses of all previous members prior 2257 shareholders, equivalent equitable owners, and ultimate 2258 equitable owners of the entity for the 12-month period preceding 2259 the date of issuance of the subpoena, the number of which names 2260 is limited to the 100 members holding the largest share of 2261 voting power of the domestic or foreign corporation 2262 shareholders, equivalent equitable owners, and ultimate 2263 equitable owners that, in comparison to all other shareholders, 2264 equivalent equitable owners, or ultimate equitable owners, 2265 respectively, own the largest number of shares of stock of the 2266 corporation, foreign corporation, or alien business organization 2267 or the largest percentage of an equivalent form of equitable 2268 ownership of the corporation, foreign corporation, or alien 2269 business organization. 2270 (f)âThe names and addresses of the person or persons who 2271 provided the records and information to the registered agent or 2272 designated representative of the entity. 2273 (g)âThe requirements of paragraphs (d) and (e) do not apply 2274 to: 2275 1.âA financial institution; 2276 2.âA corporation, foreign corporation, or alien business 2277 organization the securities of which are registered pursuant to 2278 s. 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. ss. 78a 2279 78kk, if such corporation, foreign corporation, or alien 2280 business organization files with the United States Securities 2281 and Exchange Commission the reports required by s. 13 of that 2282 act; or 2283 3.âA corporation, foreign corporation, or alien business 2284 organization, the securities of which are regularly traded on an 2285 established securities market located in the United States or on 2286 an established securities market located outside the United 2287 States, if such non-United States securities market is 2288 designated by rule adopted by the Department of Legal Affairs; 2289 2290 upon a showing by the corporation, foreign corporation, or alien 2291 business organization that the exception in subparagraph 1., 2292 subparagraph 2., or subparagraph 3. applies to the corporation, 2293 foreign corporation, or alien business organization. Such 2294 exception in subparagraph 1., subparagraph 2., or subparagraph 2295 3. does not, however, exempt the corporation, foreign 2296 corporation, or alien business organization from the 2297 requirements for producing records, information, or testimony 2298 otherwise imposed under this section for any period of time when 2299 the requisite conditions for the exception did not exist. 2300 (3)âThe time limit for producing records and testimony may 2301 be extended for good cause shown by the domestic or foreign 2302 corporation, foreign corporation, or alien business 2303 organization. 2304 (4)âA domestic or foreign corporation person, corporation, 2305 foreign corporation, or alien business organization designating 2306 an attorney or, accountant, or spouse as a registered agent or 2307 designated representative shall, with respect to this state or 2308 any agency or subdivision of this state, be deemed to have 2309 waived any privilege that might otherwise attach to 2310 communications with respect to the information required to be 2311 produced pursuant to subsection (2), which communications are 2312 among such domestic or foreign corporation, foreign corporation, 2313 or alien business organization; the registered agent or 2314 designated representative of such domestic or foreign 2315 corporation, foreign corporation, or alien business 2316 organization; and the beneficial owners of such domestic or 2317 foreign corporation, foreign corporation, or alien business 2318 organization. The duty to comply with the provisions of this 2319 section will not be excused by virtue of any privilege or 2320 provision of law of this state or any other state or country, 2321 which privilege or provision authorizes or directs that the 2322 testimony or records required to be produced under subsection 2323 (2) are privileged or confidential or otherwise may not be 2324 disclosed. 2325 (5)âIf a domestic or foreign corporation, foreign 2326 corporation, or alien business organization fails without lawful 2327 excuse to comply timely or fully with a subpoena issued pursuant 2328 to subsection (2), the Department of Legal Affairs may file an 2329 action in the circuit court for the judicial circuit in which 2330 the domestic or foreign corporation, foreign corporation, or 2331 alien business organization is found or conducts affairs, 2332 transacts business or in which real property belonging to the 2333 domestic or foreign corporation, foreign corporation, or alien 2334 business organization is located, for an order compelling 2335 compliance with the subpoena. The failure without a lawful 2336 excuse to comply timely or fully with an order compelling 2337 compliance with the subpoena will result in a civil penalty of 2338 not more than $1,000 for each day of noncompliance with the 2339 order. In connection with such proceeding, the department may, 2340 without prior approval by the court, file a lis pendens against 2341 real property owned by the domestic or foreign corporation, 2342 foreign corporation, or alien business organization, which lis 2343 pendens must shall set forth the legal description of the real 2344 property and must shall be filed in the public records of the 2345 county where the real property is located. If the lis pendens is 2346 filed in any county other than the county in which the action is 2347 pending, the lis pendens that is filed must be a certified copy 2348 of the original lis pendens. A judgment or an order of payment 2349 entered pursuant to this subsection will become a judgment lien 2350 against any real property owned by the domestic or foreign 2351 corporation, foreign corporation, or alien business organization 2352 when a certified copy of the judgment or order is recorded as 2353 required by s. 55.10. The department may avail itself of, and is 2354 entitled to use, any provision of law or of the Florida Rules of 2355 Civil Procedure to further the collecting or obtaining of 2356 payment pursuant to a judgment or order of payment. The state, 2357 through the Attorney General, may bid at any judicial sale to 2358 enforce its judgment lien, an amount up to the amount of the 2359 judgment or lien obtained pursuant to this subsection. All 2360 moneys recovered under this subsection shall be treated as 2361 forfeitures under ss. 895.01-895.09 and used or distributed in 2362 accordance with the procedure set forth in s. 895.09. 2363 (6)âInformation provided to, and records and transcriptions 2364 of testimony obtained by, the Department of Legal Affairs 2365 pursuant to this section are confidential and exempt from the 2366 provisions of s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 2367 Constitution while the investigation is active. For purposes of 2368 this section, an investigation shall be considered âactiveâ 2369 while such investigation is being conducted with a reasonable, 2370 good faith belief that it may lead to the filing of an 2371 administrative, a civil, or a criminal proceeding. An 2372 investigation does not cease being to be active so long as the 2373 department is proceeding with reasonable dispatch and there is a 2374 good faith belief that action may be initiated by the department 2375 or other administrative or law enforcement agency. Except for 2376 active criminal intelligence or criminal investigative 2377 information, as defined in s. 119.011, and information which, if 2378 disclosed, would reveal a trade secret, as defined in s. 2379 688.002, or would jeopardize the safety of an individual, all 2380 information, records, and transcriptions become available to the 2381 public when the investigation is completed or becomes inactive 2382 ceases to be active. The department may shall not disclose 2383 confidential information, records, or transcriptions of 2384 testimony except pursuant to authorization by the Attorney 2385 General in any of the following circumstances: 2386 (a)âTo a law enforcement agency participating in or 2387 conducting a civil investigation under chapter 895, or 2388 participating in or conducting a criminal investigation. 2389 (b)âIn the course of filing, participating in, or 2390 conducting a judicial proceeding instituted pursuant to this 2391 section or chapter 895. 2392 (c)âIn the course of filing, participating in, or 2393 conducting a judicial proceeding to enforce an order or judgment 2394 entered pursuant to this section or chapter 895. 2395 (d)âIn the course of a criminal proceeding. 2396 2397 A person or law enforcement agency that receives any 2398 information, record, or transcription of testimony that has been 2399 made confidential by this subsection shall maintain the 2400 confidentiality of such material and may shall not disclose such 2401 information, record, or transcription of testimony except as 2402 provided for herein. Any person who willfully discloses any 2403 information, record, or transcription of testimony that has been 2404 made confidential by this subsection, except as provided for in 2405 this subsection, commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, 2406 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. If any 2407 information, record, or testimony obtained pursuant to 2408 subsection (2) is offered in evidence in any judicial 2409 proceeding, the court may, in its discretion, seal that portion 2410 of the record to further the policies of confidentiality set 2411 forth in this subsection. 2412 (7)âThis section is supplemental and may shall not be 2413 construed to preclude or limit the scope of evidence gathering 2414 or other permissible discovery pursuant to any other subpoena or 2415 discovery method authorized by law or rule of procedure. 2416 (8)âIt is unlawful for any person, with respect to any 2417 record or testimony produced pursuant to a subpoena issued by 2418 the Department of Legal Affairs under subsection (2), to 2419 knowingly and willfully falsify, conceal, or cover up a material 2420 fact by a trick, scheme, or device; make any false, fictitious, 2421 or fraudulent statement or representation; or make or use any 2422 false writing or document knowing the writing or document to 2423 contain any false, fictitious, or fraudulent statement or entry. 2424 A person who violates this subsection commits a felony of the 2425 third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, 2426 or s. 775.084. 2427 (9)âIn the absence of a written agreement to the contrary, 2428 a registered agent is not liable for the failure to give notice 2429 of the receipt of a subpoena under subsection (2) to the 2430 domestic or foreign corporation, foreign corporation, or alien 2431 business organization that appointed the registered agent if the 2432 registered agent timely sends written notice of the receipt of 2433 the subpoena by first-class mail or domestic or international 2434 air mail, postage fees prepaid, to the last address that has 2435 been designated in writing to the registered agent by the 2436 appointing domestic or foreign corporation, foreign corporation, 2437 or alien business organization. 2438 (10)âThe designation of a registered agent and a registered 2439 office as required by subsection (1) for a domestic or foreign 2440 corporation, foreign corporation, or alien business organization 2441 that owns real property in this state or a mortgage on real 2442 property in this state is solely for the purposes of this 2443 chapter; and, notwithstanding s. 48.181, s. 617.1502, s. 2444 617.1503, or any other relevant section of the Florida Statutes, 2445 such designation may not be used in determining whether the 2446 domestic or foreign corporation, foreign corporation, or alien 2447 business organization is actually doing business in this state. 2448 (11)âAs used in this section, the term: 2449 (a)ââAlien business organizationâ means: 2450 1.âAny corporation, association, partnership, trust, joint 2451 stock company, or other entity organized under any laws other 2452 than the laws of the United States, of any United States 2453 territory or possession, or of any state of the United States; 2454 or 2455 2.âAny corporation, association, partnership, trust, joint 2456 stock company, or other entity or device 10 percent or more of 2457 which is owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by an 2458 entity described in subparagraph 1. or by a foreign natural 2459 person. 2460 (b)ââFinancial institutionâ means: 2461 1.âA bank, banking organization, or savings association, as 2462 defined in s. 220.62; 2463 2.âAn insurance company, trust company, credit union, or 2464 industrial savings bank, any of which is licensed or regulated 2465 by an agency of the United States or any state of the United 2466 States; or 2467 3.âAny person licensed under the provisions of chapter 494. 2468 (c)ââMortgageâ means a mortgage on real property situated 2469 in this state, except a mortgage owned by a financial 2470 institution. 2471 (b)(d)ââReal propertyâ means any real property situated in 2472 this state or any interest in such real property. 2473 (e)ââUltimate equitable ownerâ means a natural person who, 2474 directly or indirectly, owns or controls an ownership interest 2475 in a corporation, foreign corporation, or alien business 2476 organization, regardless of whether such natural person owns or 2477 controls such ownership interest through one or other natural 2478 persons or one or more proxies, powers of attorney, nominees, 2479 corporations, associations, partnerships, trusts, joint stock 2480 companies, or other entities or devices, or any combination 2481 thereof. 2482 (12)âAny alien business organization may withdraw its 2483 registered agent designation by delivering an application for 2484 certificate of withdrawal to the department for filing. The 2485 application shall set forth: 2486 (a)âThe name of the alien business organization and the 2487 jurisdiction under the law of which it is incorporated or 2488 organized; and 2489 (b)âThat it is no longer required to maintain a registered 2490 agent in this state. 2491 Section 24.âSection 617.0505, Florida Statutes, is amended 2492 to read: 2493 617.0505âDistributions and dividends prohibited; 2494 exceptions.âExcept as authorized in s. 617.1302, A corporation 2495 may not make distributions to its members, directors, or 2496 officers. 2497 (1)âA corporation may not pay any dividend and may not make 2498 distributions of any part of the net income or net earnings of 2499 the corporation to its members, directors, or officers, except 2500 that a corporation may: 2501 (a)âMake payments for compensation and benefits as 2502 authorized in s. 617.0603, membership purchases as authorized in 2503 s. 617.0608(2), and compensation for directors as authorized in 2504 s. 617.08101; 2505 (b)âMake distributions to its members upon dissolution in 2506 conformity with the dissolution provisions of this chapter or, 2507 if expressly permitted by its articles of incorporation, upon 2508 partial liquidation; and 2509 (c)âMake distributions to another nonprofit entity or 2510 governmental unit that is a member of the distributing 2511 corporation or has the power to appoint one or more of the 2512 directors of the distributing corporation A mutual benefit 2513 corporation, such as a private club that is established for 2514 social, pleasure, or recreational purposes and that is organized 2515 as a corporation of which the equity interests are held by the 2516 members, may, subject to s. 617.1302, purchase the equity 2517 membership interest of any member, and the payment for such 2518 interest is not a distribution for purposes of this section. 2519 (2)âA corporation may pay compensation in a reasonable 2520 amount to its members, directors, or officers for services 2521 rendered, may confer benefits upon its members in conformity 2522 with its purposes, and, upon dissolution or final liquidation, 2523 may make distributions to its members as permitted by this 2524 chapter. 2525 (3)âIf expressly permitted by its articles of 2526 incorporation, a corporation may make distributions upon partial 2527 liquidation to its members, as permitted by this section. Any 2528 such payment, benefit, or distribution does not constitute a 2529 dividend or a distribution of income or profit for purposes of 2530 this section. 2531 (4)âA corporation that is a utility exempt from regulation 2532 under s. 367.022(7), whose articles of incorporation state that 2533 it is exempt from taxation under s. 501(c)(12) of the Internal 2534 Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, may make refunds to its 2535 members, before prior to a dissolution or liquidation, as its 2536 managing board deems necessary to establish or preserve its tax 2537 exempt status. Any such refund does not constitute a dividend or 2538 a distribution of income or earnings profit for purposes of this 2539 section. 2540 (3)(5)âA corporation that is regulated by chapter 718, 2541 chapter 719, chapter 720, chapter 721, or chapter 723, or a 2542 corporation where membership in such corporation is required 2543 pursuant to a document recorded in the official county property 2544 records, may make refunds to its members, give giving credits to 2545 its members, disburse disbursing insurance proceeds to its 2546 members, or disburse disbursing or pay paying settlements to its 2547 members without violating this section. 2548 (4)âA dividend or distribution by a nonprofit insurance 2549 company subsidiary to its mutual insurance holding company 2550 organized under part III of chapter 628, directly or indirectly 2551 through one or more intermediate holding companies authorized 2552 under that part, is not a distribution for the purposes of this 2553 chapter. 2554 Section 25.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) and subsections 2555 (3) through (7) of section 617.0601, Florida Statutes, are 2556 amended, and subsections (8) and (9) are added to that section, 2557 to read: 2558 617.0601âMembers, generally.â 2559 (1) 2560 (b)âFor The articles of incorporation or bylaws of any 2561 nonprofit corporation not for profit that does not have members, 2562 or does not have members entitled to vote on a matter, any law 2563 requiring notice to, the presence of, or the vote, consent, or 2564 other action by members of the corporation in connection with 2565 such matter is satisfied by notice to, the presence of, or the 2566 vote, consent, or other action by the board of directors of the 2567 nonprofit corporation maintains chapters or affiliates may grant 2568 representatives of such chapters or affiliates the right to vote 2569 in conjunction with the board of directors of the corporation 2570 notwithstanding applicable quorum or voting requirements of this 2571 chapter if the corporation is registered with the Department of 2572 Agriculture and Consumer Services pursuant to ss. 496.401 2573 496.424, the Solicitation of Contributions Act. 2574 (3)âCorporation members have no voting or other rights 2575 except as provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws 2576 and each member has the same rights and obligations as every 2577 other member except as provided in the articles of incorporation 2578 or bylaws. However, members of any corporation existing on July 2579 1, 1991, shall continue to have the same voting and other rights 2580 as before such date until changed by amendment of the articles 2581 of incorporation or bylaws. 2582 (4)âA corporation shall keep a membership list book 2583 containing, in alphabetical order, the name and address of each 2584 member. The corporation shall also keep records in accordance 2585 with s. 617.1601. 2586 (5)âA resignation, expulsion, suspension, or termination of 2587 membership pursuant to s. 617.0606 or s. 617.0607 must shall be 2588 recorded in the membership list book. Unless otherwise provided 2589 in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws, all the rights 2590 and privileges of a member cease on termination of membership. 2591 (6)âExcept as provided in the articles of incorporation or 2592 the bylaws, a corporation may admit members for no consideration 2593 or for such consideration as is determined by the board of 2594 directors. The consideration may take any form, including, but 2595 not limited to, promissory notes, intangible property, or past 2596 or future services. Payment of such consideration may be made at 2597 such times and upon such terms as are set forth in or authorized 2598 by the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or action of the board 2599 of directors Subsections (1), (2), (3), and (4) do not apply to 2600 a corporation that is an association as defined in s. 720.301. 2601 (7)âWhere the articles of incorporation expressly limit 2602 membership in the corporation to property owners within specific 2603 measurable geographic boundaries and where the corporation has 2604 been formed for the benefit of all of those property owners, no 2605 such property owner may not shall be denied membership, provided 2606 that such property owner once admitted to membership complies, 2607 shall comply with the terms and conditions of membership which 2608 may provide for termination of membership upon ceasing to be a 2609 property owner. Any bylaws, rules, or other regulations to the 2610 contrary are deemed void and any persons excluded from 2611 membership by such bylaws, rules, or other regulations are 2612 deemed members with full rights, including the right, by the 2613 majority, or as otherwise provided in the articles of 2614 incorporation, to call for a meeting of the membership. 2615 (8)âA corporation may not be a member of itself or exercise 2616 the rights of a member with respect to itself. Upon a 2617 corporationâs purchase of its own membership interest in 2618 accordance with s. 617.0608, the membership interest is 2619 canceled. 2620 (9)âSubsections (1)-(4) do not apply to a corporation that 2621 is an association as defined in s. 720.301. 2622 Section 26.âSection 617.0603, Florida Statutes, is created 2623 to read: 2624 617.0603âCompensation and benefits.âA corporation may do 2625 any of the following: 2626 (1)âPay compensation in reasonable amounts to its members, 2627 directors, officers, agents, and employees for services 2628 rendered. 2629 (2)âConfer benefits upon its members in conformity with its 2630 purposes. 2631 (3)âUpon dissolution or final liquidation, make 2632 distributions to its members or others as permitted by this 2633 chapter. 2634 2635 No such payments, benefits, or distributions may be deemed to be 2636 a dividend or a distribution of income or earnings. 2637 Section 27.âSubsection (2) of section 617.0604, Florida 2638 Statutes, is amended, and subsections (3) through (7) are added 2639 to that section, to read: 2640 617.0604âLiability of members.â 2641 (2)âA corporation may levy dues, assessments, and fees on 2642 its members to the extent authorized in the articles of 2643 incorporation or the bylaws. Dues, assessments, and fees may be 2644 imposed on members of the same class either alike or in 2645 different amounts or proportions, and may be imposed on a 2646 different basis on different classes of members. Members of a 2647 class may be made exempt from dues, assessments, and fees to the 2648 extent provided in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws A 2649 member may become liable to the corporation for dues, 2650 assessments, or fees as provided by law. 2651 (3)âThe amount and method of collection of dues, 2652 assessments, and fees may be fixed in the articles of 2653 incorporation or bylaws, or the articles of incorporation or 2654 bylaws may authorize the board of directors or its members to 2655 fix the amount and method of collection. 2656 (4)âThe articles of incorporation or bylaws may provide 2657 reasonable means, such as termination and reinstatement of 2658 membership, to enforce the collection of dues, assessments, and 2659 fees. 2660 (5)âA creditor of a corporation may not bring a proceeding 2661 to reach the liability, if any, of a member of the corporation 2662 unless final judgment has been rendered in favor of the creditor 2663 against the corporation and execution has been returned 2664 unsatisfied in whole or in part or unless the proceeding would 2665 be useless. 2666 (6)âAll creditors of a corporation, with or without 2667 reducing their claims to judgment, may intervene in any other 2668 creditorâs proceeding brought pursuant to subsection (5) to 2669 reach and apply unpaid amounts due from the corporation. All 2670 members who owe unpaid amounts to the corporation may be joined 2671 in the proceeding. 2672 (7)âSatisfaction of a debt owed to a creditor by the 2673 corporation through payment of a member who owes unpaid amounts 2674 to the corporation satisfies the debt of the corporation to the 2675 creditor and the debt of the member to the corporation to the 2676 extent so paid by the member to the creditor. 2677 Section 28.âSection 617.0605, Florida Statutes, is amended 2678 to read: 2679 617.0605âTransfer of membership interests.â 2680 (1)âExcept as provided in the articles of incorporation or 2681 bylaws, a member of a corporation may not transfer a membership 2682 or any right arising from membership except as otherwise allowed 2683 in this section. 2684 (2)âExcept as set forth in the articles of incorporation or 2685 bylaws of a mutual benefit corporation, a member of a mutual 2686 benefit corporation may not transfer a membership or any right 2687 arising from membership. 2688 (3)âWhere the right to If transfer a membership has been 2689 provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws rights have 2690 been provided for one or more members of a mutual benefit 2691 corporation, a restriction on such rights is not binding with 2692 respect to a member holding a membership issued before the 2693 adoption of the restriction unless the restriction is approved 2694 by the members and the affected member. 2695 Section 29.âSection 617.0606, Florida Statutes, is amended 2696 to read: 2697 617.0606âResignation of members.â 2698 (1)âExcept as may be provided in the articles of 2699 incorporation or bylaws of a corporation, A member may resign at 2700 any time for any reason of a mutual benefit corporation may not 2701 transfer a membership or any right arising from membership. 2702 (2)âThe resignation of a member does not relieve the member 2703 from any obligations that the member may have to the corporation 2704 as a result of obligations incurred or commitments made before 2705 resignation. 2706 Section 30.âSubsections (3) and (4) of section 617.0607, 2707 Florida Statutes, are amended, and subsection (5) is added to 2708 that section, to read: 2709 617.0607âTermination, expulsion, and suspension.â 2710 (3)âAny proceeding challenging an expulsion, suspension, or 2711 termination, including a proceeding in which the defective 2712 notice is alleged, must be commenced within 1 year after the 2713 effective date of the expulsion, suspension, or termination. 2714 (4)âA member who has been expelled or suspended or has had 2715 a membership suspended or terminated may be liable to the 2716 corporation for dues, assessments, or fees as a result of 2717 obligations incurred or commitments made before the expulsion, 2718 or suspension, or termination. The expulsion, suspension, or 2719 termination does not relieve the member of any obligations or 2720 commitments made before the expulsion, suspension, or 2721 termination. 2722 (5)âA corporation may, if authorized in the articles of 2723 incorporation or bylaws, levy fines or otherwise penalize its 2724 members. A fine or penalty, other than a late fee for nonpayment 2725 of dues, may not be levied until after the corporation has 2726 provided notice thereof to the member concerned and has afforded 2727 the affected member an opportunity to be heard on the matter. 2728 Section 31.âSection 617.0608, Florida Statutes, is amended 2729 to read: 2730 617.0608âPurchase of memberships.â 2731 (1)âA corporation described in s. 501(c)(3) of the Internal 2732 Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, may not purchase the 2733 membership interests of any of its members any of its 2734 memberships or any right arising from membership. Any 2735 corporation that is not described in s. 501(c)(3) of the 2736 Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, may purchase the 2737 membership interest of any member or any right arising from 2738 membership to the extent provided in the articles of 2739 incorporation or bylaws. No such payment for purchase of 2740 membership interest or right arising from membership may be 2741 deemed a dividend or a distribution of income or earnings except 2742 as provided in s. 617.0505 or subsection (2). 2743 (2)âSubject to subsection (1) s. 617.1302, a mutual benefit 2744 corporation may purchase the membership interest of a member who 2745 resigns, or whose membership is terminated, for the amount and 2746 pursuant to the conditions set forth in its articles of 2747 incorporation or bylaws, but only if, after the completing the 2748 purchase: 2749 (a)âThe corporation is able to pay its debts as they become 2750 due in the usual course of its activities; and 2751 (b)âThe total assets of the corporation are at least equal 2752 to the sum of its liabilities. 2753 Section 32.âSection 617.0701, Florida Statutes, is amended 2754 to read: 2755 617.0701âMeetings of members, generally; failure to hold 2756 annual meeting; special meeting; consent to corporate actions 2757 without meetings; waiver of notice of meetings.â 2758 (1)âA corporation with members may hold meetings of members 2759 for the transaction of any proper business at such times stated 2760 in or fixed in accordance with the articles of incorporation or 2761 bylaws. The frequency of all meetings of members, the time and 2762 manner of notice of such meetings, the conduct and adjournment 2763 of such meetings, the determination of members entitled to 2764 notice or to vote at such meetings, and the number or voting 2765 power of members necessary to constitute a quorum, shall be 2766 determined by or in accordance with the articles of 2767 incorporation or the bylaws. Annual, regular, and special 2768 meetings of the members may be held in or out of this state, and 2769 the place and time of all meetings may be determined by the 2770 board of directors. 2771 (2)âThe failure to hold an annual meeting at the time 2772 stated in or fixed in accordance with a corporationâs articles 2773 of incorporation or bylaws or pursuant to this chapter does not 2774 work cause a forfeiture or give cause for dissolution of the 2775 corporation, and nor does not such failure affect the validity 2776 of any corporate action otherwise valid corporate acts, except 2777 as provided in s. 617.1430 in the case of a deadlock among the 2778 directors or the members. 2779 (3)(a)âExcept as provided in the articles of incorporation 2780 or bylaws, special meetings of the members may be called by 2781 either: 2782 1.âBy the corporationâs board of directors or the person or 2783 persons authorized to do so by the articles of incorporation or 2784 bylaws; or 2785 2.âIf members holding no less than 10 percent, or such 2786 other amount as specified in the articles of incorporation or 2787 bylaws, of all the votes entitled to be cast on any issue being 2788 considered at the proposed special meeting sign, date, and 2789 deliver to the corporationâs secretary one or more written 2790 demands for the meeting describing the purpose or purposes for 2791 which it is to be held. 2792 (b)âUnless otherwise provided in the articles of 2793 incorporation or bylaws, a written demand for a special meeting 2794 may be revoked by a writing to that effect received by the 2795 corporation before the receipt by the corporation of demands 2796 sufficient in number to require holding a special meeting 2797 pursuant to subparagraph (a)2. 2798 (c)âOnly business within the purpose or purposes described 2799 in the meeting notice may be conducted at a special meeting of 2800 members. 2801 (d)âSpecial meetings of members may be held in or out of 2802 this state at a place stated in or fixed in accordance with the 2803 articles of incorporation or the bylaws or, when not 2804 inconsistent with the articles of incorporation or the bylaws, 2805 in the notice of the special meeting. If no place is stated or 2806 fixed in accordance with the articles of incorporation or the 2807 bylaws or in the notice of the special meeting, special meetings 2808 must be held at the corporationâs principal office. 2809 (a)âThe president; 2810 (b)âThe chair of the board of directors; 2811 (c)âThe board of directors; 2812 (d)âOther officers or persons as are provided for in the 2813 articles of incorporation or the bylaws; 2814 (e)âThe holders of at least 5 percent of the voting power 2815 of a corporation when one or more written demands for the 2816 meeting, which describe the purpose for which the meeting is to 2817 be held, are signed, dated, and delivered to a corporate 2818 officer; or 2819 (f)âA person who signs a demand for a special meeting 2820 pursuant to paragraph (e) if notice for a special meeting is not 2821 given within 30 days after receipt of the demand. The person 2822 signing the demand may set the time and place of the meeting and 2823 give notice under this subsection. 2824 (4)âUnless otherwise provided in the articles of 2825 incorporation or bylaws, action required or permitted by this 2826 chapter to be taken at an annual or special meeting of members 2827 may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice, and 2828 without a vote if the action is taken by the members entitled to 2829 vote on such action and having not less than the minimum number 2830 of votes necessary to authorize such action at a meeting at 2831 which all members entitled to vote on such action were present 2832 and voted. 2833 (a)âTo be effective, the action must be evidenced by one or 2834 more written consents describing the action taken, dated and 2835 signed by approving members having the requisite number of votes 2836 and entitled to vote on such action, and delivered to the 2837 corporation to its principal office in this state, its principal 2838 place of business, the corporate secretary, or another officer 2839 or agent of the corporation having custody of the book in which 2840 proceedings of meetings of members are recorded. The action 2841 taken by written consent is effective when such written consent 2842 is signed by members entitled to cast the required number of 2843 votes on the action and has been delivered to the corporation by 2844 delivery as set forth in this section, but only if Written 2845 consent to take the corporate action referred to in the consent 2846 is not effective unless the consent is signed by members having 2847 the requisite number of votes necessary to authorize the action 2848 within 90 days after the date of the earliest dated consent and 2849 is delivered in the manner required by this section. 2850 (b)âAny written consent may be revoked before prior to the 2851 date that the corporation receives the required number of 2852 consents to authorize the proposed action. A revocation is not 2853 effective unless in writing and until received by the 2854 corporation at its principal office in this state or its 2855 principal place of business, or received by the corporate 2856 secretary or other officer or agent of the corporation having 2857 custody of the book in which proceedings of meetings of members 2858 are recorded. 2859 (c)âIf the articles of incorporation or bylaws require that 2860 notice of proposed corporate action be delivered to members not 2861 entitled to vote on the action and the action is to be taken by 2862 consent of the members entitled to vote, within 30 days after 2863 obtaining authorization by written consent, notice must be given 2864 to those members who are entitled to vote on the action but who 2865 have not consented in writing and to those members who are not 2866 entitled to vote. The notice must fairly summarize the material 2867 features of the authorized action. 2868 (d)âA consent signed under this section has the effect of a 2869 meeting vote and may be described as such in any document. 2870 (e)âIf the action to which the members consent is such as 2871 would have required the filing of articles or a certificate 2872 under any other section of this chapter if such action had been 2873 voted on by members at a meeting, the articles or certificate 2874 filed under such other section must state that written consent 2875 has been given in accordance with this section. 2876 (f)âWhenever action is taken pursuant to this section, the 2877 written consent of the members consenting thereto to such action 2878 or the written reports of inspectors appointed to tabulate such 2879 consents must be filed with the minutes of member proceedings. 2880 (5)(a)âA member may waive any notice required by this 2881 chapter, the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws before or 2882 after the date and time stated in the notice. The waiver must be 2883 in writing, signed electronically or otherwise by the member 2884 entitled to the notice, and delivered to the corporation for 2885 filing by the corporation with the minutes or corporate records 2886 Notice of a meeting of members need not be given to any member 2887 who signs a waiver of notice, in person or by proxy, either 2888 before or after the meeting. Unless required by the articles of 2889 incorporation or bylaws, neither the affairs to be transacted at 2890 nor the purpose of the meeting need to be specified in the 2891 waiver. 2892 (b)âAttendance of a member at a meeting waives objection 2893 to: 2894 1.âLack, either in person or by proxy, constitutes waiver 2895 of notice or defective notice of the meeting, unless the member 2896 promptly objects to holding the meeting or transacting business 2897 at the beginning of the meeting and does not thereafter vote for 2898 or assent to action taken at the meeting; and 2899 2.âConsideration of a particular matter at the meeting 2900 which is not within the purposes described in the meeting notice 2901 waiver of any and all objections to the place of the meeting, 2902 the time of the meeting, or the manner in which it has been 2903 called or convened, unless the member objects to considering the 2904 matter when it is presented at the meeting attends a meeting 2905 solely for the purpose of stating, at the beginning of the 2906 meeting, any such objection or objections to the transaction of 2907 affairs. 2908 (6)âSubsections (1) and (3) do not apply to any corporation 2909 that is an association as defined in s. 720.301; a corporation 2910 regulated by chapter 718, chapter 719, chapter 720, chapter 721, 2911 or chapter 723; or a corporation where membership in such 2912 corporation is required pursuant to a document recorded in the 2913 county official property records. 2914 Section 33.âSection 617.0721, Florida Statutes, is amended 2915 to read: 2916 617.0721âVoting by members.â 2917 (1)âMembers are not entitled to vote except as conferred by 2918 the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. 2919 (2)âA member who is entitled to vote may vote in person or, 2920 unless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws otherwise 2921 provide, may vote by proxy executed in writing by the member or 2922 by his or her duly authorized attorney in fact. 2923 (3)(a)âA member or the memberâs attorney-in-fact may 2924 appoint a proxy to vote or otherwise act for the member by: 2925 1.âSigning an appointment form, with his or her signature 2926 affixed, by any reasonable means, including, but not limited to, 2927 facsimile or electronic signature; 2928 2.âTransmitting or authorizing the transmission of an 2929 electronic signature to the person who will be appointed as the 2930 proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, a proxy support service 2931 organization, a registrar, or an agent authorized by the person 2932 who will be designated as the proxy to receive such 2933 transmission; or 2934 3.âUsing such other means as provided for in the articles 2935 of incorporation or the bylaws. 2936 (b)âAn appointment form must contain or be accompanied by 2937 information from which it can be determined that the member or 2938 the memberâs attorney-in-fact authorized the appointment of the 2939 proxy. 2940 (4)âNotwithstanding any provision to the contrary in the 2941 articles of incorporation or bylaws, any copy, facsimile 2942 transmission, or other reliable reproduction of the appointment 2943 form original proxy may be substituted or used in lieu of the 2944 original proxy for any purpose for which the original proxy 2945 could be used if the copy, facsimile transmission, or other 2946 reproduction is a complete reproduction of the appointment form 2947 entire proxy. An appointment of a proxy is effective when a 2948 signed appointment in a record is received by the inspectors of 2949 election, the officer or agent of the corporation authorized to 2950 count votes, or the secretary. An appointment of a proxy is not 2951 valid for after 11 months following the date of its execution 2952 unless a longer period, which may not exceed 3 years, is 2953 expressly otherwise provided in the appointment form proxy. The 2954 death or incapacity of the member appointing a proxy does not 2955 affect the right of the corporation to accept the proxyâs 2956 authority unless notice of the death or incapacity is received 2957 by the inspectors of election, the officer or agent authorized 2958 to count votes, or the secretary before the proxy exercises his 2959 or her authority under the appointment. A member may revoke 2960 appointment of a proxy unless the appointment form or electronic 2961 transmission states that it is irrevocable and the appointment 2962 is coupled with an interest. 2963 (a)âIf directors or officers are to be elected by members, 2964 the bylaws may provide that such elections may be conducted by 2965 mail. 2966 (b)âA corporation may reject a vote, ballot, consent, 2967 waiver, demand, or proxy appointment if the person secretary or 2968 other officer or agent authorized to accept or reject such vote, 2969 ballot, consent, waiver, demand, or proxy appointment tabulate 2970 votes, acting in good faith, has a reasonable basis to doubt for 2971 doubting the validity of the signature on it or the signatoryâs 2972 authority to sign for the member. 2973 (5)(a)(3)âIf authorized by the board of directors, and 2974 subject to such guidelines and procedures as the board of 2975 directors may adopt, Members of any class, their attorneys-in 2976 fact, and proxies may participate in any and proxy holders who 2977 are not physically present at a meeting of members may, by means 2978 of remote communication to the extent the board of directors 2979 authorizes such participation for such class. Participation by 2980 means of remote communication is subject to the guidelines and 2981 procedures adopted by the board of directors and must be in 2982 conformity with paragraph (b).: 2983 (a)âParticipate in the meeting. 2984 (b)âMembers, their attorneys-in-fact, and proxies 2985 participating in a membersâ meeting by means of remote 2986 communication authorized in paragraph (a) are Be deemed to be 2987 present in person and may vote at the meeting if the corporation 2988 has implemented reasonable measures to: 2989 1.âThe corporation implements reasonable means to Verify 2990 that each person participating remotely as a member is a member, 2991 a memberâs attorney-in-fact, or a proxy deemed present and 2992 authorized to vote by means of remote communication is a member 2993 or proxy holder; and 2994 2.âThe corporation implements reasonable measures to 2995 Provide such members, memberâs attorneys-in-fact, and proxies or 2996 proxy holders with a reasonable opportunity to participate in 2997 the meeting and to vote on matters submitted to the members, 2998 including an opportunity to communicate and to read or hear the 2999 proceedings of the meeting substantially concurrent with the 3000 proceedings. 3001 (c)âIf any member, attorney-in-fact for a member, or proxy 3002 holder votes or takes other action at a membersâ meeting by 3003 means of remote communication, a record of such vote or other 3004 action that memberâs participation in the meeting must be 3005 maintained by the corporation in accordance with s. 617.1601. 3006 (d)âUnless the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or 3007 demands of members in accordance with s. 617.0701(3) require a 3008 meeting of members to be held at a geographic location, the 3009 board of directors may determine that any meeting of members 3010 will not be held at a geographic location, and instead will be 3011 held solely by means of remote communication, but only if the 3012 corporation implements the measures required by paragraph (b). 3013 (6)(4)âIf any entity corporation, whether for profit or not 3014 for profit, is a member of a corporation organized under this 3015 chapter, the chair of the governing body board, the president, 3016 any vice president, the secretary, or the treasurer of the 3017 member entity corporation, and any such officer or cashier or 3018 trust officer of a banking or trust corporation holding such 3019 membership, and any like officer of a foreign entity corporation 3020 whether for profit or not for profit, holding such membership in 3021 a domestic corporation, is shall be deemed by the corporation in 3022 which membership is held to have the authority to vote on behalf 3023 of the member entity corporation and to execute proxies and 3024 written waivers and consents in relation thereto, unless, before 3025 a vote is taken or a waiver or consent is acted upon, it appears 3026 pursuant to a certified copy of the bylaws or other governing 3027 documents of the entity or a resolution of the governing 3028 documents board of directors or executive committee of the 3029 member entity corporation that such authority does not exist or 3030 is vested in some other officer or person. In the absence of 3031 such certification, a person executing any such proxies, 3032 waivers, or consents or presenting himself or herself at a 3033 meeting as one of such officers of a corporate member entity is 3034 shall be, for the purposes of this section, conclusively deemed 3035 to be duly elected, qualified, and acting as such officer and to 3036 be fully authorized. In the case of conflicting representation, 3037 the corporate member entity shall be represented by its senior 3038 officer, in the order stated in this subsection. 3039 (7)(5)âThe articles of incorporation or the bylaws may 3040 provide that, in all elections for directors, every member 3041 entitled to vote has the right to cumulate the memberâs his or 3042 her votes and to give one candidate a number of votes equal to 3043 the number of votes the member he or she could give if one 3044 director were being elected multiplied by the number of 3045 directors to be elected or to distribute such votes on the same 3046 principles among any number of such candidates. A corporation 3047 may not have cumulative voting unless such voting is expressly 3048 authorized in the articles of incorporation. 3049 (8)(6)âIf a corporation has no members or its members do 3050 not have the right to vote, the directors shall have the sole 3051 voting power. 3052 (9)(7)âSubsections (1), (7) (5), and (8) (6) do not apply 3053 to a corporation that is an association, as defined in s. 3054 720.301, or a corporation regulated by chapter 718 or chapter 3055 719. 3056 Section 34.âSection 617.0741, Florida Statutes, is created 3057 to read: 3058 617.0741âStanding.âA director, an officer, or a member may 3059 not commence a proceeding in the right of a domestic or foreign 3060 corporation unless such director, officer, or member holds that 3061 position at the time the action is commenced and: 3062 (1)âWas a director, an officer, or a member when the 3063 conduct giving rise to the action occurred; or 3064 (2)âThe person became a member through transfer or by 3065 operation of law from a person who was a member when the conduct 3066 giving rise to the action occurred. 3067 Section 35.âSection 617.0742, Florida Statutes, is created 3068 to read: 3069 617.0742âComplaint; demand and excuse.âA complaint in a 3070 proceeding brought in the right of a corporation must be 3071 verified and allege with particularity: 3072 (1)âThe demand, if any, made to obtain the action desired 3073 by the director, officer, or member from the board of directors; 3074 and 3075 (2)âEither: 3076 (a)âIf such demand was made, that the demand was refused, 3077 rejected, or ignored by the board of directors before the 3078 expiration of 90 days from the date the demand was made. 3079 (b)âIf such a demand was made, why irreparable injury to 3080 the corporation or misapplication or waste of corporate assets 3081 causing material injury to the corporation would result by 3082 waiting for the expiration of a 90-day period from the date the 3083 demand was made; or 3084 (c)âThe reason or reasons the director, officer, or member 3085 did not make the effort to obtain the desired action from the 3086 board of directors or comparable authority. 3087 Section 36.âSection 617.0743, Florida Statutes, is created 3088 to read: 3089 617.0743âStay of proceedings.âIf the corporation commences 3090 an inquiry into the allegations made in the demand or complaint, 3091 the court may stay any derivative proceeding for such period as 3092 the court deems appropriate. 3093 Section 37.âSection 617.0744, Florida Statutes, is created 3094 to read: 3095 617.0744âDismissal.â 3096 (1)âA derivative proceeding may be dismissed, in whole or 3097 in part, by the court upon motion by the corporation if a group 3098 specified in subsection (2) or subsection (3) has determined in 3099 good faith, after conducting a reasonable inquiry upon which its 3100 conclusions are based, that the maintenance of the derivative 3101 proceeding is not in the best interests of the corporation. In 3102 all such cases, the corporation has the burden of proof 3103 regarding the qualifications, good faith, and reasonable inquiry 3104 of the group making the determination. 3105 (2)âUnless a panel is appointed pursuant to subsection (3), 3106 the determination required in subsection (1) must be made by: 3107 (a)âA majority of qualified directors present at a meeting 3108 of the board of directors if the qualified directors constitute 3109 a quorum; or 3110 (b)âA majority vote of a committee consisting of two or 3111 more qualified directors appointed by majority vote of qualified 3112 directors present at a meeting of the board of directors, 3113 regardless of whether such qualified directors constitute a 3114 quorum. 3115 (3)âUpon motion by the corporation, the court may appoint a 3116 panel consisting of one or more disinterested and independent 3117 individuals to make a determination required in subsection (1). 3118 (4)âThis section does not prevent the court from: 3119 (a)âEnforcing a personâs rights under the corporationâs 3120 articles of incorporation or bylaws or this chapter, including 3121 the personâs rights to information under s. 617.1602; or 3122 (b)âExercising its equitable or other powers, including 3123 granting extraordinary relief in the form of a temporary 3124 restraining order or preliminary injunction. 3125 Section 38.âSection 617.0745, Florida Statutes, is created 3126 to read: 3127 617.0745âDiscontinuance or settlement; notice.â 3128 (1)âA derivative action on behalf of a corporation may not 3129 be discontinued or settled without the courtâs approval. 3130 (2)âIf the court determines that a proposed discontinuance 3131 or settlement will substantially affect the interest of any of 3132 the corporationâs members, the court must direct that notice be 3133 given to the members affected. The court may determine which 3134 party or parties to the derivative action bears the expense of 3135 giving the notice. 3136 Section 39.âSection 617.0746, Florida Statutes, is created 3137 to read: 3138 617.0746âProceeds and expenses.âOn termination of the 3139 derivative proceeding, the court may: 3140 (1)âOrder the corporation to pay from the amount recovered 3141 in the derivative proceeding by the corporation the plaintiffâs 3142 reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorney fees and 3143 costs, incurred in the derivative proceeding if it finds that, 3144 in the derivative proceeding, the plaintiff was successful in 3145 whole or in part; or 3146 (2)âOrder the plaintiff to pay any of the defendantâs 3147 reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorney fees and 3148 costs, incurred in defending the derivative proceeding if it 3149 finds that the derivative proceeding was commenced or maintained 3150 without reasonable cause or for an improper purpose. 3151 Section 40.âSection 617.0747, Florida Statutes, is created 3152 to read: 3153 617.0747âApplicability to foreign corporations.âIn any 3154 derivative proceeding in the right of a foreign corporation 3155 brought in the courts of this state, the matters covered by ss. 3156 617.0741-617.0747 are governed by the laws of the jurisdiction 3157 of incorporation of the foreign corporation, except for ss. 3158 617.0743, 617.0745, and 617.0746. 3159 Section 41.âSection 617.0803, Florida Statutes, is amended 3160 to read: 3161 617.0803âNumber of directors.â 3162 (1)âA board of directors must consist of one three or more 3163 individuals, as may be with the number specified in or fixed in 3164 accordance with the articles of incorporation or the bylaws, as 3165 may be amended, except that a corporation that is exempt from 3166 federal income taxation under s. 501(c)(3) of the Internal 3167 Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, must have a board of directors 3168 that consists of three or more individuals. 3169 (2)âThe number of directors may be increased or decreased 3170 from time to time by amendment to, or in the manner provided in, 3171 the articles of incorporation or the bylaws, but the corporation 3172 must never have fewer than three directors. 3173 (3)âDirectors shall be elected or appointed in the manner 3174 and for the terms provided in the articles of incorporation or 3175 the bylaws. 3176 Section 42.âSection 617.0804, Florida Statutes, is created 3177 to read: 3178 617.0804âSelection of directors.â 3179 (1)âThe directors of a membership corporation, except for 3180 any initial directors named in the articles of incorporation or 3181 elected by the incorporators, shall be elected by the members 3182 entitled to vote at the time at the first annual meeting of 3183 members, and at each annual meeting thereafter. Notwithstanding 3184 this subsection, the articles of incorporation or bylaws may 3185 provide some other time or method of election, or provide that 3186 some or all of the directors are appointed by some other person 3187 or designated in some other manner. 3188 (2)âThe directors of a nonmembership corporation, except 3189 for any initial directors named in the articles of incorporation 3190 or elected by the incorporators, shall be elected, appointed, or 3191 designated as provided in the articles of incorporation or 3192 bylaws. If no method of election, appointment, or designation is 3193 set forth in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, such 3194 directors are elected by the board of directors. 3195 (3)âIf the articles of incorporation or bylaws divide, or 3196 authorize dividing, the members into classes, the articles of 3197 incorporation or bylaws may also authorize the election of all 3198 or a specified number of directors by the holders of one or more 3199 authorized classes of members. A class or multiple classes of 3200 members entitled to elect one or more directors is a separate 3201 voting group for purposes of the election of directors. 3202 Section 43.âSection 617.0805, Florida Statutes, is created 3203 to read: 3204 617.0805âTerms of directors, generally.â 3205 (1)âThe articles of incorporation or bylaws may specify the 3206 terms of directors. If a term is not specified in the articles 3207 of incorporation or bylaws, the term of a director is 1 year. 3208 (2)âA decrease in the number of directors or term of office 3209 does not shorten an incumbent directorâs term. 3210 (3)âExcept as provided in the articles of incorporation or 3211 bylaws, the term of a director elected to fill a vacancy expires 3212 at the end of the term that the director is filling. 3213 (4)âNotwithstanding the expiration of a directorâs term, 3214 the director continues to serve until the directorâs successor 3215 is elected, appointed, or designated and until the directorâs 3216 successor takes office unless otherwise provided in the articles 3217 of incorporation or bylaws or there is a decrease in the number 3218 of directors. 3219 Section 44.âPresent subsection (3) of section 617.0808, 3220 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (2) of that 3221 section, and subsection (1) and present subsection (2) of that 3222 section are amended, to read: 3223 617.0808âRemoval of directors.â 3224 (1)âSubject to subsection (2), A director may be removed 3225 from office pursuant to procedures provided in the articles of 3226 incorporation or the bylaws. Unless the articles of 3227 incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, a director may be 3228 removed as follows, which shall provide the following, and if 3229 they do not do so, shall be deemed to include the following: 3230 (a)âAny member of the board of directors may be removed 3231 from office with or without cause by: 3232 1.âExcept as provided in paragraph (i), a majority of all 3233 votes of the directors, if the director was elected or appointed 3234 by the directors; or 3235 2.âA majority of all votes of the members, if the director 3236 was elected or appointed by the members. 3237 (b)âIf a director is elected by a class, chapter, or other 3238 organizational unit, or by region or other geographic grouping, 3239 the director may be removed only by the members of that class, 3240 chapter, unit, or grouping. However: 3241 1.âA director may be removed only if the number of votes 3242 cast to remove the director would be sufficient to elect the 3243 director at a meeting to elect directors, except as provided in 3244 subparagraphs 2. and 3. 3245 2.âIf cumulative voting is authorized, a director may not 3246 be removed if the number of votes sufficient to elect the 3247 director under cumulative voting is voted against the removal of 3248 the director. 3249 3.âIf at the beginning of the term of a director the 3250 articles of incorporation or bylaws provide that the director 3251 may be removed for missing a specified number of board meetings, 3252 the board may remove the director for failing to attend the 3253 specified number of meetings. The director may be removed only 3254 if a majority of the directors then in office vote for the 3255 removal. 3256 (c)âThe notice of a meeting to recall a member or members 3257 of the board of directors must shall state the specific 3258 directors sought to be removed. 3259 (d)âA proposed removal of a director at a meeting requires 3260 shall require a separate vote for each director whose removal is 3261 sought. Where removal is sought by written consent, a separate 3262 consent is required for each director to be removed. 3263 (e)âIf removal is effected at a meeting, any vacancies 3264 created shall be filled by the members or directors eligible to 3265 vote for the removal. 3266 (f)âAny director who is removed from the board is not 3267 eligible to stand for reelection until the next annual meeting 3268 at which directors are elected. 3269 (g)âAny director removed from office must shall turn over 3270 to the board of directors within 72 hours any and all records of 3271 the corporation in such directorâs his or her possession. 3272 (h)âIf a director who is removed does not relinquish such 3273 directorâs his or her office or turn over records as required 3274 under this section, the circuit court in the county where the 3275 corporationâs principal office is located may summarily order 3276 the director to relinquish such directorâs his or her office and 3277 turn over corporate records upon application of any member. 3278 (i)âA director elected or appointed by the board may be 3279 removed without cause by a vote of two-thirds of the directors 3280 then in office or such greater number as is set forth in the 3281 articles of incorporation or bylaws. 3282 (2)âA director of a corporation described in s. 501(c) of 3283 the Internal Revenue Code may be removed from office pursuant to 3284 procedures provided in the articles of incorporation or the 3285 bylaws, and the corporation may provide in the articles of 3286 incorporation or the bylaws that it is subject to the provisions 3287 of subsection (1). 3288 Section 45.âPresent subsection (4) of section 617.0809, 3289 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (3) of that 3290 section, and subsections (1) and (2) and present subsection (3) 3291 of that section are amended, to read: 3292 617.0809âBoard vacancy.â 3293 (1)âExcept as otherwise provided in subsection (2) s. 3294 617.0808(1)(f), the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws, if 3295 a any vacancy occurs occurring on the board of directors, 3296 including a vacancy resulting from an increase in the number of 3297 directors, the vacancy may be filled by a the affirmative vote 3298 of the majority of the remaining directors in office, even if 3299 though the remaining directors constitute less than a quorum, or 3300 by the sole remaining director or, if the vacancy is not so 3301 filled or if no director remains, by the members or, on the 3302 application of any person, by the circuit court of the county 3303 where the registered office of the corporation is located. 3304 (2)âExcept as otherwise provided in the articles of 3305 incorporation or bylaws, Whenever a vacancy in the position of a 3306 director who is: occurs with respect to a director 3307 (a)âElected by a voting group of members, a class, chapter 3308 or other organizational, unit of members, or a region or other 3309 geographic grouping of members group, the vacancy may be filled 3310 during the first 3 months after the vacancy occurs only by 3311 members of that voting class, chapter, unit, or group, chapter, 3312 unit, region, or grouping, or by a majority of the directors 3313 then in office elected by such voting group, chapter, unit, 3314 region, or grouping class, chapter, unit, or group. If the 3315 vacancy has not been filled within the 3-month period, the 3316 vacancy may be filled by vote of a majority of the directors 3317 remaining in office in accordance with subsection (1); 3318 (b)âAppointed by persons, other than the members, may be 3319 filled only by those persons; or 3320 (c)âDesignated in the articles of incorporation or bylaws 3321 may not be filled by action of the board of directors. 3322 (3)âThe term of a director elected or appointed to fill a 3323 vacancy expires at the next annual meeting at which directors 3324 are elected. Any directorship to be filled by reason of an 3325 increase in the number of directors may be filled by the board 3326 of directors, but only for a term of office continuing until the 3327 next election of directors by the members or, if the corporation 3328 has no members or no members having the right to vote thereon, 3329 for such term of office as is provided in the articles of 3330 incorporation or the bylaws. 3331 Section 46.âSection 617.08091, Florida Statutes, is created 3332 to read: 3333 617.08091âRemoval of directors by judicial proceedings.â 3334 (1)âThe court of the county where the principal office of a 3335 corporation, or if one is not in this state, its registered 3336 office, is located may remove a director from office in a 3337 proceeding commenced by or in the right of the corporation if 3338 the court finds that: 3339 (a)âThe director engaged in fraudulent conduct with respect 3340 to the corporation or its members, grossly abused the position 3341 of director, or intentionally inflicted harm on the corporation; 3342 and 3343 (b)âConsidering the directorâs course of conduct and the 3344 inadequacy of other available remedies, removal is in the best 3345 interest of the corporation. 3346 (2)âOnly a member, an officer, or a director may bring an 3347 action under this section, and such action must comply with the 3348 requirements of ss. 617.0742-617.0747. An action by a member may 3349 not be brought unless the complaint is filed by a member having, 3350 or is formally joined by members collectively having, no less 3351 than 10 percent of the corporationâs voting power. 3352 (3)âIn addition to removing the director, the court may bar 3353 the director from being reelected, redesignated, or reappointed 3354 for a period prescribed by the court. 3355 (4)âThis section does not limit the equitable powers of the 3356 court to order other relief. 3357 Section 47.âSection 617.0820, Florida Statutes, is amended 3358 to read: 3359 617.0820âBoard meetings.â 3360 (1)âThe board of directors may hold regular or special 3361 meetings in or out of this state. 3362 (2)âA majority of the directors present, whether or not a 3363 quorum exists, may adjourn any meeting of the board of directors 3364 to another time and place. Unless the bylaws otherwise provide, 3365 notice of any such adjourned meeting shall be given to the 3366 directors who were not present at the time of the adjournment 3367 and, unless the time and place of the adjourned meeting are 3368 announced at the time of the adjournment, to the other 3369 directors. 3370 (3)âUnless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws 3371 provide otherwise, meetings of the board of directors may be 3372 called and notice of the meeting delivered by the chair of the 3373 board, the president or a similarly situated officer, or 20 3374 percent of the directors then in office or by the president 3375 unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or 3376 the bylaws. 3377 (4)âUnless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws 3378 provide otherwise, the board of directors may permit any or all 3379 directors to participate in a regular or special meeting by, or 3380 conduct the meeting through the use of, any means of 3381 communication by which all directors participating may 3382 simultaneously hear each other during the meeting. A director 3383 participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present 3384 in person at the meeting. 3385 (5)âUnless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws 3386 provide for a longer or shorter period, regular meetings of the 3387 board of directors may be held without notice of the date, time, 3388 place, or purpose of the meeting. 3389 (6)âUnless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws 3390 provide otherwise, a special meeting of the board of directors 3391 must be preceded by at least 2 daysâ notice of the date, time, 3392 and place of the meeting. The notice need not describe the 3393 purpose of the special meeting unless required by the articles 3394 of incorporation or the bylaws. 3395 Section 48.âSubsections (1) and (2) of section 617.0821, 3396 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 3397 617.0821âAction by directors without a meeting.â 3398 (1)âUnless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws 3399 provide otherwise, action required or permitted by this chapter 3400 act to be taken at a board of directorsâ meeting or committee 3401 meeting may be taken without a meeting if the action is taken by 3402 all members of the board or of the committee. The action must be 3403 evidenced by one or more written consents describing the action 3404 taken and signed by each director or committee member and 3405 delivered to the corporation. 3406 (2)âAction taken under this section is effective when the 3407 last director signs the consent and delivers the consent to the 3408 corporation, unless the consent specifies a different effective 3409 date. A directorâs consent may be withdrawn by a revocation 3410 signed by the director and delivered to the corporation before 3411 delivery to the corporation of unrevoked written consents signed 3412 by all the directors. 3413 Section 49.âSection 617.0823, Florida Statutes, is amended 3414 to read: 3415 617.0823âWaiver of notice.âNotice of a meeting of the board 3416 of directors need not be given to any director who signs a 3417 waiver of notice either before or after the meeting. Attendance 3418 of a director at a meeting constitutes shall constitute a waiver 3419 of notice of such meeting and a waiver of any objection and all 3420 objections to the date of the meeting, the place of the meeting, 3421 the time of the meeting, or the manner in which it has been 3422 called or convened, except when a director states, at the 3423 beginning of the meeting or promptly upon arrival at the 3424 meeting, any objection to holding the meeting or the transaction 3425 of affairs because the meeting is not lawfully called or 3426 convened and, after such objection, the director does not vote 3427 for or consent to action taken at the meeting. 3428 Section 50.âSection 617.0830, Florida Statutes, is amended 3429 to read: 3430 (Substantial rewording of section. 3431 See s. 617.0830, F.S., for present text.) 3432 617.0830 General standards for directors.â 3433 (1)âEach member of the board of directors, when discharging 3434 duties of a director, including in discharging duties as a 3435 member of a board committee, shall act: 3436 (a)âIn good faith; and 3437 (b)âIn a manner such director reasonably believes is in the 3438 best interests of the corporation. 3439 (2)âThe members of the board of directors or a board 3440 committee, when becoming informed in connection with a 3441 decisionmaking function or devoting attention to an oversight 3442 function, shall discharge their duties with the care that an 3443 ordinary prudent person in a like position would reasonably 3444 believe appropriate under similar circumstances. 3445 (3)âIn discharging board or board committee duties, a 3446 director who does not have knowledge that makes reliance 3447 unwarranted is entitled to rely on the performance by any of the 3448 persons specified in paragraph (5)(a) or paragraph (5)(b) to 3449 whom the board may have delegated, formally or informally by 3450 course of conduct, the authority or duty to perform one or more 3451 of the boardâs functions that are delegable under applicable 3452 law. 3453 (4)âIn discharging board or board committee duties, a 3454 director who does not have knowledge that makes reliance 3455 unwarranted is entitled to rely on any information, opinions, 3456 reports, or statements, including financial statements and other 3457 financial data, prepared or presented by any of the persons 3458 specified in subsection (5). 3459 (5)âA director is entitled to rely, in accordance with 3460 subsection (3) or subsection (4), on: 3461 (a)âOne or more officers or employees of the corporation 3462 whom the director reasonably believes to be reliable and 3463 competent in the functions performed or the information, 3464 opinions, reports, or statements provided; 3465 (b)âLegal counsel, public accountants, or other persons 3466 retained by the corporation or by a committee of the board of 3467 the corporation as to matters involving skills or expertise the 3468 director reasonably believes are matters: 3469 1.âWithin the particular personâs professional or expert 3470 competence; or 3471 2.âAs to which the particular person merits confidence; or 3472 (c)âA committee of the board of directors of which the 3473 director is not a member if the director reasonably believes the 3474 committee merits confidence. 3475 (d)âIn the case of a corporation engaged in religious 3476 activity, religious authorities and ministers, priests, rabbis, 3477 imams, or other persons whose positions or duties the director 3478 reasonably believes justify reliance and confidence and whom the 3479 director believes to be reliable and competent in the matters 3480 presented. 3481 (6)âA director is not a trustee with respect to the 3482 corporation or with respect to any property held or administered 3483 by the corporation in trust, including property that may be 3484 subject to restrictions imposed by the donor or transferor of 3485 the property. 3486 Section 51.âSection 617.0832, Florida Statutes, is amended 3487 to read: 3488 (Substantial rewording of section. 3489 See s. 617.0832, F.S., for present text.) 3490 617.0832âGeneral standards for directors.â 3491 (1)âAs used in this section, the following terms and 3492 definitions apply: 3493 (a)ââDirectorâs conflict of interest transactionâ means a 3494 transaction between a corporation and one or more of its 3495 directors, or another entity in which one or more of the 3496 corporationâs directors are directly or indirectly a party to 3497 the transaction, other than being an indirect party as a result 3498 of being a member of the corporation, and have a direct or 3499 indirect material financial interest or other material interest. 3500 (b)ââFair to the corporationâ means that the transaction, 3501 as a whole, is beneficial to the corporation and its members, 3502 taking into appropriate account whether it is: 3503 1.âFair in terms of the directorâs dealings with the 3504 corporation in connection with that transaction; and 3505 2.âComparable to what might have been obtainable in an 3506 armâs length transaction. 3507 (c)ââFamily memberâ includes any of the following: 3508 1.âThe directorâs spouse. 3509 2.âA child, stepchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, 3510 sibling, step sibling, or half sibling of the director or the 3511 directorâs spouse. 3512 (d)âA director has an âindirect material financial 3513 interestâ if a directorâs family member has a material financial 3514 interest in the transaction, other than having an indirect 3515 interest as a member of the corporation, or if the transaction 3516 is with an entity, other than the corporation, which has a 3517 material financial interest in the transaction and controls, or 3518 is controlled by, the director or another person specified in 3519 this section. 3520 (e)âA director is âindirectlyâ a party to a transaction if 3521 the director has a material financial interest in or is a 3522 director, an officer, a member, a manager, or a partner of a 3523 person, other than the corporation, who is a party to the 3524 transaction. 3525 (f)ââMaterial financial interestâ or âother material 3526 interestâ means a financial or other interest in the transaction 3527 that would reasonably be expected to impair the objectivity of a 3528 directorâs judgment when participating in the action on the 3529 authorization of the transaction. 3530 (2)âIf a directorâs conflict of interest transaction is 3531 fair to the corporation at the time it is authorized, approved, 3532 effectuated, or ratified: 3533 (a)âSuch transaction is not void or voidable; and 3534 (b)âThe fact that the transaction is a directorâs conflict 3535 of interest transaction is not grounds for any equitable relief, 3536 an award of damages, or other sanctions, because of that 3537 relationship or interest, because such director or directors are 3538 present at the meeting of the board of directors or a committee 3539 thereof which authorizes, approves, or ratifies such 3540 transaction, or because such directors or their votes are 3541 counted for such purpose. 3542 (3)(a)âIn a proceeding challenging the validity of a 3543 directorâs conflict of interest transaction or in a proceeding 3544 seeking equitable relief, award of damages, or other sanctions 3545 with respect to a directorâs conflict of interest transaction, 3546 the person challenging the validity or seeking equitable relief, 3547 award of damages, or other sanctions has the burden of proving 3548 the lack of fairness of the transaction if: 3549 1.âThe material facts of the transaction and the directorâs 3550 interest in the transaction were disclosed or known to the board 3551 of directors or committee that authorizes, approves, or ratifies 3552 the transaction and the transaction was authorized, approved, or 3553 ratified by a vote of a majority of the qualified directors, 3554 even if the qualified directors constitute less than a quorum of 3555 the board or the committee; however, the transaction may not be 3556 authorized, approved, or ratified under this subsection solely 3557 by a single director; or 3558 2.âThe material facts of the transaction and the directorâs 3559 interest in the transaction were disclosed or known to the 3560 members who voted upon such transaction and the transaction was 3561 authorized, approved, or ratified by a majority of the votes 3562 cast by disinterested members or by the written consent of 3563 disinterested members representing a majority of the votes that 3564 could be cast by all disinterested members. A membership 3565 interest owned by or voted under the control of a director who 3566 has a relationship or interest in the directorâs conflict of 3567 interest transaction may not be considered a membership interest 3568 owned by a disinterested member and may not be counted in a vote 3569 of members to determine whether to authorize, approve, or ratify 3570 a directorâs conflict of interest transaction under this 3571 subsection. The vote of those membership interests, however, is 3572 counted in determining whether the transaction is approved under 3573 other sections of this chapter. A majority of the membership 3574 interests, whether or not present, that are entitled to be 3575 counted in a vote on the transaction under this subsection 3576 constitutes a quorum for the purpose of taking action under this 3577 section. 3578 (b)âIf neither of the conditions provided in paragraph (a) 3579 has been satisfied, the person defending or asserting the 3580 validity of a directorâs conflict of interest transaction has 3581 the burden of proving its fairness in a proceeding challenging 3582 the validity of the transaction. 3583 (4)âThe presence of or a vote cast by a director with an 3584 interest in the transaction does not affect the validity of an 3585 action taken under paragraph (3)(a) if the transaction is 3586 otherwise authorized, approved, or ratified as provided in 3587 subsection (3), but the presence or vote of the director may be 3588 counted for purposes of determining whether the transaction is 3589 approved under this chapter. 3590 (5)âIn addition to other grounds for challenge, a party 3591 challenging the validity of the transaction is not precluded 3592 from asserting and proving that a particular director or member 3593 was not disinterested on grounds of financial or other interest 3594 for purposes of the vote on, consent to, or approval of the 3595 transaction. 3596 (6)âIf directorsâ action under this section does not 3597 otherwise satisfy a quorum or voting requirement applicable to 3598 the authorization of the transaction by directors as required by 3599 the articles of incorporation, the bylaws, this chapter, or any 3600 other law, an action to satisfy those authorization 3601 requirements, whether as part of the same action or by way of 3602 another action, must be taken by the board of directors or a 3603 committee in order to authorize the transaction. In such action, 3604 the vote or consent of directors who are not disinterested may 3605 be counted. 3606 (7)âIf membersâ action under this section does not satisfy 3607 a quorum or voting requirement applicable to the authorization 3608 of the transaction by members as required by the articles of 3609 incorporation, the bylaws, this chapter, or any other law, an 3610 action to satisfy those authorization requirements, whether as 3611 part of the same action or by way of another action, must be 3612 taken by the members in order to authorize the transaction. In 3613 such action, the vote or consent of members who are not 3614 disinterested members may be counted. 3615 Section 52.âSection 617.0834, Florida Statutes, is 3616 reordered and amended to read: 3617 617.0834âLiability of directors and officers and directors 3618 of certain corporations and associations not for profit; 3619 immunity from civil liability.â 3620 (1)âA director or an officer or director of a nonprofit 3621 organization recognized under s. 501(c)(3) or s. 501(c)(4) or s. 3622 501(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or 3623 of an agricultural or a horticultural organization recognized 3624 under s. 501(c)(5), of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as 3625 amended, is not personally liable for monetary damages to the 3626 corporation or any person for any statement, vote, decision to 3627 take or not, or failure to take an action, or any failure to 3628 take any action, as a director or an officer regarding 3629 organizational management or policy by an officer or director, 3630 unless: 3631 (a)âThe director or officer or director breached or failed 3632 to perform the directorâs or officerâs his or her duties as a 3633 director or an officer or director; and 3634 (b)âThe directorâs or officerâs or directorâs breach of, or 3635 failure to perform, the directorâs or officerâs his or her 3636 duties constitutes any of the following: 3637 1.âA violation of the criminal law, unless the officer or 3638 director or officer had reasonable cause to believe the 3639 directorâs or officerâs his or her conduct was lawful or had no 3640 reasonable cause to believe the directorâs or officerâs his or 3641 her conduct was unlawful. A judgment or other final adjudication 3642 against a director or an officer or director in any criminal 3643 proceeding for violation of the criminal law estops that 3644 director or officer or director from contesting the fact that 3645 the directorâs or officerâs his or her breach, or failure to 3646 perform, constitutes a violation of the criminal law, but does 3647 not estop the director or officer or director from establishing 3648 that the director or officer he or she had reasonable cause to 3649 believe that the directorâs or officerâs his or her conduct was 3650 lawful or had no reasonable cause to believe that the directorâs 3651 or officerâs his or her conduct was unlawful; 3652 2.âA transaction from which the director or officer or 3653 director derived an improper personal benefit, directly or 3654 indirectly; or 3655 3.âIn a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation to 3656 procure a judgment in its favor or by or in the right of a 3657 member, conscious disregard for the best interest of the 3658 corporation, or willful or intentional misconduct; or 3659 4.âIn a proceeding by or in the right of someone other than 3660 the corporation or a member, recklessness or an act or omission 3661 that was committed in bad faith or with malicious purpose or in 3662 a manner exhibiting wanton and willful disregard of human 3663 rights, safety, or property. 3664 (2)âA director or an officer is deemed not to have derived 3665 an improper personal benefit from any transaction if the 3666 transaction and the nature of any personal benefit derived by 3667 the director or officer are not prohibited by state or federal 3668 law or regulation and, without further limitation, the 3669 transaction is fair to the corporation at the time it is 3670 authorized, approved, or ratified as determined in accordance 3671 with s. 617.0832. 3672 (3)âThe circumstances set forth in subsection (2) are not 3673 exclusive and do not preclude the existence of other 3674 circumstances under which a director or officer will be deemed 3675 not to have derived an improper benefit. 3676 (4)âFor the purposes of this section, the term: 3677 (c)(a)ââRecklessnessâ means the acting, or omission to act, 3678 in conscious disregard of a risk: 3679 1.âKnown, or so obvious that it should have been known, to 3680 the director or officer or director; and 3681 2.âKnown to the director or officer or director, or so 3682 obvious that it should have been known, to be so great as to 3683 make it highly probable that harm would follow from such action 3684 or omission. 3685 (a)(b)ââDirectorâ means a person who serves as a director, 3686 trustee, or member of the governing board of an organization. 3687 (b)(c)ââOfficerâ means a person who serves as an officer 3688 without compensation except reimbursement for actual expenses 3689 incurred or to be incurred. 3690 Section 53.âSubsection (4) of section 617.0835, Florida 3691 Statutes, is amended to read: 3692 617.0835âProhibited activities by private foundations.â 3693 (4)âThe provisions of Subsections (2) and (3) do not apply 3694 to any corporation that was incorporated before January 1, 1970, 3695 and that has been properly relieved from the requirements of 26 3696 U.S.C. s. 508(e)(1) by a timely judicial proceeding to the 3697 extent that a court of competent jurisdiction determines that 3698 such application would be contrary to the terms of the articles 3699 of incorporation or organization or other instrument governing 3700 such corporation or governing the administration of charitable 3701 funds held by it and that the same may not properly be changed 3702 to conform to such subsections. 3703 Section 54.âSection 617.0844, Florida Statutes, is created 3704 to read: 3705 617.0844âStandards of conduct for officers.â 3706 (1)âAn officer, when discharging his or her duties, shall 3707 act: 3708 (a)âIn good faith; and 3709 (b)âIn a manner such officer reasonably believes to be in 3710 the best interests of the corporation. 3711 (2)âAn officer, when becoming informed in connection with a 3712 decisionmaking function or devoting attention to an oversight 3713 function, shall discharge his or her duties with the care that 3714 an ordinary prudent person in a like position would reasonably 3715 believe appropriate under similar circumstances. 3716 (3)âIn discharging his or her duties, an officer who does 3717 not have knowledge that makes reliance unwarranted is entitled 3718 to rely on the performance by any of the persons specified in 3719 paragraph (5)(a) or paragraph (5)(b) to whom the board may have 3720 delegated, formally or informally by course of conduct, the 3721 authority or duty to perform one or more of the boardâs 3722 functions that are delegable under applicable law. 3723 (4)âIn discharging his or her duties, an officer who does 3724 not have knowledge that makes reliance unwarranted is entitled 3725 to rely on any information, opinions, reports, or statements, 3726 including financial statements and other financial data, 3727 prepared or presented by any of the persons specified in 3728 subsection (5). 3729 (5)âAn officer is entitled to rely, in accordance with 3730 subsection (3) or subsection (4), on: 3731 (a)âOne or more officers or employees of the corporation 3732 whom the officer reasonably believes to be reliable and 3733 competent in the functions performed or the information, 3734 opinions, reports, or statements provided; 3735 (b)âLegal counsel, public accountants, or other persons 3736 retained by the corporation or by a committee of the board of 3737 the corporation as to matters involving skills or expertise the 3738 officer reasonably believes are matters: 3739 1.âWithin the particular personâs professional or expert 3740 competence; or 3741 2.âAs to which the particular person merits confidence; or 3742 (c)âA committee of the board of directors of which the 3743 officer is not a member if the officer reasonably believes the 3744 committee merits confidence. 3745 (d)âIn the case of a corporation engaged in religious 3746 activity, religious authorities and ministers, priests, rabbis, 3747 imams, or other persons whose positions or duties the officer 3748 reasonably believes justify reliance and confidence and whom the 3749 officer believes to be reliable and competent in the matters 3750 presented. 3751 (6)âThe duty of an officer includes the obligation to: 3752 (a)âInform the superior officer to whom, or the board of 3753 directors or the committee to which, the officer reports of 3754 information about the affairs of the corporation known to the 3755 officer, within the scope of the officerâs functions, and known 3756 or as should be known to the officer to be material to such 3757 superior officer, board, or committee; and 3758 (b)âInform such officerâs superior officer, or another 3759 appropriate person within the corporation, or the board of 3760 directors, or a committee thereof, of any actual or probable 3761 material violation of law involving the corporation or material 3762 breach of duty to the corporation by an officer, employee, or 3763 agent of the corporation the officer believes has occurred or is 3764 likely to occur. 3765 (7)âAn officer is not a trustee with respect to the 3766 corporation or to any property held or administered by the 3767 corporation in trust, including property that may be subject to 3768 restrictions imposed by the donor. 3769 Section 55.âSubsection (1) of section 617.1001, Florida 3770 Statutes, is amended to read: 3771 617.1001âAuthority to amend the articles of incorporation.â 3772 (1)âA corporation may amend its articles of incorporation 3773 at any time to add or change a provision that is required or 3774 permitted in the articles of incorporation or to delete a 3775 provision not required to be contained in the articles of 3776 incorporation. Whether a provision is required or permitted in 3777 the articles of incorporation is determined as of the effective 3778 date of the amendment as provided in this act. 3779 Section 56.âPresent paragraph (b) of subsection (1) and 3780 present subsections (2) and (3) of section 617.1002, Florida 3781 Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (2), (4), and (5), 3782 respectively, a new subsection (3) is added to that section, and 3783 present subsection (1) of that section is amended, to read: 3784 617.1002âProcedure for amending articles of incorporation.â 3785 (1)âUnless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise 3786 an alternative procedure, amendments to the articles of 3787 incorporation shall must be adopted made in the following 3788 manner: 3789 (a)âIf there are members entitled to vote on a proposed 3790 amendment to the articles of incorporation, the proposed 3791 amendment shall first be adopted by the board of directors. must 3792 adopt a resolution setting forth the proposed amendment and 3793 directing that it be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members 3794 entitled to vote on the proposed amendment, which may be either 3795 an annual or a special meeting. Written notice setting forth the 3796 proposed amendment or a summary of the changes to be effected by 3797 the amendment must be given to each member entitled to vote at 3798 such meeting in accordance with the articles of incorporation or 3799 the bylaws. The proposed amendment shall be adopted upon 3800 receiving at least a majority, or any larger or smaller 3801 percentage specified in the articles of incorporation or the 3802 bylaws, of the votes which members present at such meeting or 3803 represented by proxy are entitled to cast; or 3804 (b)âExcept as provided in subsection (3) or, with respect 3805 to restatements that do not require member approval, or s. 3806 617.1007, the members shall approve the amendment. 3807 (c)âIn submitting the proposed amendment to the members for 3808 approval, the board of directors shall recommend that the 3809 members approve the amendment unless the board of directors 3810 determines that, because of a conflict of interest or other 3811 special circumstances, it should not make such a recommendation, 3812 in which case the board must inform the members of the basis for 3813 proceeding without such recommendation. 3814 (d)âThe board of directors may set conditions for the 3815 approval of the amendment by the members or the effectiveness of 3816 the amendment. 3817 (e)âIf the amendment is required to be approved by the 3818 members, and the approval is to be given at a meeting, the 3819 corporation must notify each member entitled to vote on the 3820 amendment of the meeting of members at which the amendment is to 3821 be submitted for approval. The notice must state that the 3822 purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider 3823 the amendment, and must contain or be accompanied by a copy of 3824 the amendment. 3825 (f)âUnless this chapter, the articles of incorporation, or 3826 the board of directors, acting pursuant to paragraph (d), 3827 requires a greater vote or a greater quorum, the approval of the 3828 amendment requires the approval of the members at a meeting at 3829 which the current required quorum exists. 3830 (2)(b)âIf there are no members or if members are not 3831 entitled to vote on proposed amendments to the articles of 3832 incorporation, unless the articles of incorporation provide 3833 otherwise, an amendment may be adopted at a meeting of the board 3834 of directors by a majority vote of the directors then in office, 3835 or by the incorporators if no board has been elected. Unless the 3836 articles of incorporation provide otherwise, an amendment 3837 adopted by the board of directors under this subsection must 3838 also be approved, if the amendment changes or deletes a 3839 provision regarding the appointment of a director by persons 3840 other than the board, by those persons as if they constituted a 3841 voting group. 3842 (3)âUnless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, 3843 the board of directors of a corporation with members entitled to 3844 vote on proposed amendments may adopt amendments to the 3845 corporationâs articles of incorporation without approval of the 3846 members to: 3847 (a)âExtend the duration of the corporation if it was 3848 incorporated at a time when limited duration was required by 3849 law; 3850 (b)âDelete the names and addresses of the initial 3851 directors; 3852 (c)âDelete the name and address of the initial registered 3853 agent or registered office, if a statement of change is on file 3854 with the department; 3855 (d)âDelete any other information contained in the articles 3856 of incorporation which is solely of historical interest; 3857 (e)âChange the corporate name by substituting the word 3858 âcorporation,â âincorporated,â or the abbreviation âCorp.,â or 3859 âInc.,â for a similar word or abbreviation in the name, or by 3860 adding, deleting, or changing a geographical attribution for the 3861 name; or 3862 (f)âRestate without change all of the then operative 3863 provisions of the articles of incorporation as provided in s. 3864 617.1007. 3865 Section 57.âSection 617.1006, Florida Statutes, is amended 3866 to read: 3867 617.1006âContents of articles of amendment.â 3868 (1)âAfter an amendment to the articles of incorporation has 3869 been adopted and approved as required by this chapter, the 3870 corporation shall deliver to the department for filing articles 3871 of amendment which must be signed in accordance with The 3872 articles of amendment must be executed by the corporation as 3873 provided in s. 617.01201 and must set forth: 3874 (a)(1)âThe name of the corporation; 3875 (b)(2)âThe text of each amendment adopted or the 3876 information required by s. 617.01201(10), if applicable; 3877 (c)âIf the amendment provides for an exchange, a 3878 reclassification, or a cancellation of memberships, provisions 3879 for implementing the amendment if not contained in the amendment 3880 itself, which may be made dependent upon facts objectively 3881 ascertainable outside the articles of amendment in accordance 3882 with s. 617.01201(10); 3883 (d)âThe date of each amendmentâs adoption; and 3884 (e)âIf the amendment: 3885 1.âWas adopted by the incorporators or the board of 3886 directors without member approval, a statement that the 3887 amendment was adopted by the incorporators or by the board of 3888 directors and that member approval was not required; 3889 2.âRequired approval by the members, a statement that the 3890 amendment was duly approved by the members in the manner 3891 required by this chapter and by the articles of incorporation 3892 and bylaws; or 3893 3.âIs being filed pursuant to s. 617.01201(10), a statement 3894 to that effect. 3895 (2)âArticles of amendment take effect on the effective date 3896 determined pursuant to s. 617.0123. 3897 (3)âIf there are members entitled to vote on a proposed 3898 amendment, the date of the adoption of the amendment by the 3899 members and a statement that the number of votes cast for the 3900 amendment was sufficient for approval; and 3901 (4)âIf there are no members or if members are not entitled 3902 to vote on a proposed amendment, a statement of such fact and 3903 the date of the adoption of the amendment by the board of 3904 directors. 3905 Section 58.âSection 617.1101, Florida Statutes, is amended 3906 to read: 3907 (Substantial rewording of section. 3908 See s. 617.1101, F.S., for present text.) 3909 617.1101âPlan of merger.â 3910 (1)âBy complying with this chapter, including adopting a 3911 plan of merger in accordance with subsection (3) and complying 3912 with s. 617.1103: 3913 (a)âSubject to and except as otherwise provided in s. 3914 617.1102, one or more domestic corporations may merge with one 3915 or more domestic or foreign eligible entities pursuant to a plan 3916 of merger, resulting in a survivor; and 3917 (b)âAny two or more eligible entities may merge, resulting 3918 in a surviving entity that is a domestic corporation created in 3919 the merger. 3920 (2)âSubject to and except as otherwise provided in s. 3921 617.1102, a domestic eligible entity that is not a corporation 3922 may be a party to a merger with a domestic corporation, or may 3923 be created as the survivor in a merger in which a domestic 3924 corporation is a party, but only if the parties to the merger 3925 comply with this chapter and the merger is permitted by the 3926 organic law of the domestic eligible entity that is not a 3927 corporation. A foreign eligible entity may be a party to a 3928 merger with a domestic corporation or, subject to and as 3929 otherwise provided in s. 617.1102, may be created as the 3930 survivor in a merger in which a domestic corporation is a party, 3931 but only if the parties to the merger comply with this chapter 3932 and the merger is permitted by the organic law of the foreign 3933 eligible entity. 3934 (3)âThe plan of merger must set forth: 3935 (a)âAs to each party to the merger, its name, jurisdiction 3936 of formation, and type of entity; 3937 (b)âThe survivorâs name, jurisdiction of formation, and 3938 type of entity, and, if the survivor is to be created in the 3939 merger, a statement to that effect; 3940 (c)âThe terms and conditions of the merger, including: 3941 1.âA statement that the interests in such entity are to be 3942 canceled; or 3943 2.âThe manner of converting the interests in such entity 3944 into interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, 3945 rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of 3946 the foregoing; 3947 (d)âThe articles of incorporation of any domestic or 3948 foreign corporation, or the public organic record of any other 3949 domestic or foreign eligible entity to be created by the merger, 3950 or if a new domestic or foreign corporation or other eligible 3951 entity is not to be created by the merger, any amendment to, or 3952 restatement of, the survivorâs articles of incorporation or 3953 other public organic record; 3954 (e)âThe effective date and time of the merger, which may be 3955 on or after the filing date of filing the articles of merger; 3956 and 3957 (f)âAny other provision required by the laws under which 3958 any party to the merger is organized or by which it is governed, 3959 or by the articles of incorporation or organic rules of any such 3960 party. 3961 (4)âIn addition to the requirements of subsection (3), a 3962 plan of merger may contain any other provision that is not 3963 prohibited by law. 3964 (5)âTerms of a plan of merger may be made dependent upon 3965 facts objectively ascertainable outside the plan in accordance 3966 with s. 617.01201(10). 3967 (6)âA plan of merger may be amended only with the consent 3968 of each party to the merger, except as provided in the plan. A 3969 domestic party to a merger may approve an amendment to a plan: 3970 (a)âIn the same manner as the plan was approved, if the 3971 plan does not provide for the manner in which it may be amended; 3972 or 3973 (b)âIn the manner provided in the plan, except that an 3974 interest holder that was entitled to vote on or consent to the 3975 approval of the plan is entitled to vote on or consent to any 3976 amendment to the plan which will change: 3977 1.âThe amount or kind of interests, securities, 3978 obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests 3979 or securities, or any combination of the foregoing, to be 3980 received under the plan by the interest holders of any party to 3981 the merger; 3982 2.âThe articles of incorporation of any domestic 3983 corporation, or the organic rules of any other type of entity, 3984 that will be the survivor of the merger, except for changes 3985 permitted by s. 617.1002(3) or by comparable provisions of the 3986 organic law of any other type of entity; or 3987 3.âAny of the other terms or conditions of the plan if the 3988 change would adversely affect the interest holder in any 3989 material respect. 3990 Section 59.âSection 617.1102, Florida Statutes, is amended 3991 to read: 3992 617.1102âLimitation on merger.âA domestic corporation that 3993 holds property for a charitable purpose not for profit organized 3994 under this chapter may merge with one or more other eligible 3995 entities, as identified in s. 607.1101(1), only if the surviving 3996 entity of such merger is a domestic or foreign corporation not 3997 for profit or other eligible entity that has been organized as a 3998 nonprofit not-for-profit entity under a governing statute or 3999 other applicable law that allows such a merger. 4000 Section 60.âSection 617.1103, Florida Statutes, is amended 4001 to read: 4002 (Substantial rewording of section. 4003 See s. 617.1103, F.S., for present text.) 4004 617.1103âApproval of plan of merger; abandonment of plan 4005 thereafter.â 4006 (1)âIn the case of a domestic corporation that is a party 4007 to a merger, the plan of merger shall be adopted in the 4008 following manner if there are members of the domestic 4009 corporation entitled to vote on the merger: 4010 (a)âThe plan of merger shall first be adopted by the board 4011 of directors of such domestic corporation. 4012 (b)âExcept as provided in paragraph (h), and in s. 4013 617.1104, the members entitled to vote shall vote to adopt the 4014 plan of merger. 4015 (c)âIn submitting the plan of merger to the members for 4016 approval, the board of directors shall recommend that the 4017 members approve the plan, unless the board of directors makes a 4018 determination that because of conflicts of interest or other 4019 special circumstances it should not make such a recommendation, 4020 in which case the board shall inform the members of the basis 4021 for proceeding without such recommendation. 4022 (d)âThe board of directors may set conditions for the 4023 approval of the proposed merger by the members or the 4024 effectiveness of the plan of merger. 4025 (e)âIf the approval by members is to be given at a meeting, 4026 the corporation shall notify each member entitled to vote of the 4027 meeting of members at which the plan is submitted for approval 4028 in accordance with this chapter and the articles of 4029 incorporation and bylaws of the corporation. The notice must 4030 also state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the 4031 meeting is to consider the plan of merger, regardless of whether 4032 the meeting is an annual or a special meeting, and contain or be 4033 accompanied by a copy of the plan. If the corporation is not to 4034 be the surviving entity, the notice must also include or be 4035 accompanied by a copy of the articles of incorporation and 4036 bylaws or the organic rules of the surviving entity. 4037 (f)âUnless this chapter, the articles of incorporation, or 4038 the board of directors, acting pursuant to paragraph (d), 4039 requires a greater vote or a greater quorum in the respective 4040 case, approval of the plan of merger shall require the approval 4041 of the members at a meeting at which the current required quorum 4042 exists by a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the 4043 plan and, if any class of members is entitled to vote as a 4044 separate voting group on the plan of merger, the approval of 4045 each such separate voting group at a meeting at which a quorum 4046 of the voting group is present by a majority of the votes 4047 entitled to be cast on the merger by that voting group. 4048 (g)âSubject to paragraph (h), unless otherwise provided in 4049 the articles of incorporation, separate voting on a plan of 4050 merger is required for each class of members that is to be 4051 converted under the plan of merger into securities, interests, 4052 or obligations; rights to acquire securities or other interests; 4053 or cash, other property, or any combination thereof. 4054 (h)âThe articles of incorporation may expressly limit or 4055 eliminate the separate voting rights as to any class of members. 4056 (2)âIf a domestic corporation that is a party to a merger 4057 has no members or if its members are not entitled to vote on a 4058 plan of merger, such plan may be adopted at a meeting of its 4059 board of directors by a majority vote of the directors then in 4060 office. 4061 (3)(a)âAfter a plan of merger has been approved and before 4062 articles of merger are effective, the plan may be abandoned as 4063 provided in the plan. Unless prohibited by the plan, the plan 4064 may be abandoned by the board of directors in the same manner as 4065 the plan was approved by: 4066 1.âA domestic corporation; or 4067 2.âA merging domestic eligible entity if the organic law of 4068 the entity does not provide for amendment of a plan of merger. 4069 (b)âIf a merger is abandoned under paragraph (a) after 4070 articles of merger have been delivered to the department for 4071 filing but before the articles of merger have become effective, 4072 a statement of abandonment signed by all the parties that signed 4073 the articles of merger shall be delivered to the department for 4074 filing before the articles of merger become effective. The 4075 statement takes effect on filing, whereupon the merger is deemed 4076 abandoned and does not become effective. The statement of 4077 abandonment must contain: 4078 1.âThe name of each party to the merger; 4079 2.âThe date on which the articles of merger were filed by 4080 the department; and 4081 3.âA statement that the merger has been abandoned in 4082 accordance with this section. 4083 Section 61.âSection 617.1104, Florida Statutes, is created 4084 to read: 4085 617.1104âShort-form merger between parent and subsidiary or 4086 between subsidiaries.â 4087 (1)(a)âA domestic or foreign parent eligible entity that 4088 holds a membership in a domestic corporation that carries at 4089 least 80 percent of the voting power of each class of membership 4090 of the domestic corporation which has voting power may: 4091 1.âMerge the subsidiary into itself, or into another 4092 domestic or foreign eligible entity in which the parent eligible 4093 entity owns at least 80 percent of the voting power of each 4094 class and series of the outstanding interests that have voting 4095 power; or 4096 2.âMerge itself into the subsidiary. 4097 (b)âMergers under subparagraphs (a)1. and 2. do not require 4098 the approval of the board of directors or members of the 4099 subsidiary unless the articles of incorporation or organic rules 4100 of the parent eligible entity or the articles of incorporation 4101 of the subsidiary entity otherwise provide. The articles of 4102 merger relating to a merger under this section do not need to be 4103 signed by the subsidiary entity. 4104 (2)âThe parent eligible entity shall, within 10 days after 4105 the effective date of a merger approved under subsection (1), 4106 notify each of the subsidiary entityâs members that the merger 4107 has become effective. 4108 (3)âExcept as provided for in subsections (1) and (2), a 4109 merger between a parent eligible entity and a domestic 4110 subsidiary corporation is governed by ss. 617.1101-617.1107, 4111 which are applicable to mergers generally. 4112 Section 62.âSection 617.1105, Florida Statutes, is amended 4113 to read: 4114 (Substantial rewording of section. 4115 See s. 617.1105, F.S., for present text.) 4116 617.1105âArticles of merger.â 4117 (1)âAfter a plan of merger has been adopted and approved as 4118 required by this chapter or, if the merger is being effected 4119 pursuant to s. 617.1101(1)(b), the merger has been approved as 4120 required by the organic law governing the parties to the merger, 4121 the articles of merger must be signed by each party to the 4122 merger, except as provided in s. 617.1104. The articles of 4123 merger must set forth: 4124 (a)âThe name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity 4125 of each party to the merger; 4126 (b)âIf not already identified as the survivor pursuant to 4127 paragraph (a), the name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of 4128 entity of the survivor; 4129 (c)âIf the articles of incorporation of the survivor are 4130 being amended, or if a new domestic corporation is being created 4131 as a result of the merger: 4132 1.âThe amendments to the survivorâs articles of 4133 incorporation; or 4134 2.âThe articles of incorporation of the new corporation; 4135 (d)âIf the plan of merger required approval by the members 4136 of a domestic corporation that is a party to the merger, a 4137 statement that the plan was duly approved by the members and, if 4138 voting by any separate voting group was required, by each such 4139 separate voting group, in the manner required by this chapter 4140 and the articles of incorporation of such domestic corporation; 4141 (e)âIf the plan of merger did not require approval by the 4142 members of a domestic corporation that is a party to the merger, 4143 a statement to that effect; 4144 (f)âAs to each foreign corporation that is a party to the 4145 merger, a statement that the participation of the foreign 4146 corporation was duly authorized in accordance with such 4147 corporationâs organic law; 4148 (g)âAs to each domestic or foreign eligible entity that is 4149 a party to the merger and that is not a domestic or foreign 4150 corporation, a statement that the participation of the eligible 4151 entity in the merger was duly authorized in accordance with such 4152 eligible entityâs organic law; and 4153 (h)âIf the survivor is not a domestic or foreign 4154 corporation or other eligible entity that has been organized as 4155 a nonprofit entity under a governing statute or other applicable 4156 law that allows such a merger, as to each domestic corporation 4157 that is a party to the merger, a statement that it does not hold 4158 any property for a charitable purpose. 4159 (2)âIn addition to the requirements of subsection (1), 4160 articles of merger may contain any other provision not 4161 prohibited by law. 4162 (3)âThe articles of merger shall be delivered to the 4163 department for filing, and, subject to subsection (4), the 4164 merger must take effect on the effective date determined in 4165 accordance with s. 617.0123. 4166 (4)âWith respect to a merger in which one or more foreign 4167 entities is a party or a foreign corporation created by the 4168 merger is the survivor, the merger itself becomes effective at 4169 the later of: 4170 (a)âWhen all documents required to be filed in all foreign 4171 jurisdictions to effect the merger have become effective; or 4172 (b)âWhen the articles of merger take effect. 4173 (5)âArticles of merger required to be filed under this 4174 section may be combined with any filing required under the 4175 organic law governing any other domestic eligible entity 4176 involved in the transaction if the combined filing satisfies the 4177 requirements of both this section and the other organic law. 4178 Section 63.âSection 617.1106, Florida Statutes, is amended 4179 to read: 4180 (Substantial rewording of section. 4181 See s. 617.1106, F.S., for present text.) 4182 617.1106âEffect of merger.â 4183 (1)âWhen a merger becomes effective: 4184 (a)âThe domestic or foreign eligible entity that is 4185 designated in the plan of merger as the survivor continues or 4186 comes into existence, as the case may be; 4187 (b)âThe separate existence of every merging entity, other 4188 than the survivor, ceases; 4189 (c)âAll property owned by, and every contract right and 4190 other right possessed by, each merging entity vests in the 4191 survivor, without transfer, reversion, or impairment; 4192 (d)âAll debts, obligations, and other liabilities of each 4193 merging entity become debts, obligations, and liabilities of the 4194 survivor; 4195 (e)âThe name of the survivor may be, but need not be, 4196 substituted in any pending proceeding for the name of any party 4197 to the merger whose separate existence ceased in the merger; 4198 (f)âNeither the rights of creditors nor any liens upon the 4199 property of any corporation party to the merger are impaired by 4200 such merger; 4201 (g)âIf the survivor is a domestic eligible entity, the 4202 articles of incorporation and bylaws or the organic rules of the 4203 survivor are amended to the extent provided in the plan of 4204 merger; 4205 (h)âThe articles of incorporation and bylaws or the organic 4206 rules of a survivor that is a domestic eligible entity and is 4207 created by the merger become effective; 4208 (i)âThe interests of each merging entity which are to be 4209 canceled or converted in the merger are canceled or converted, 4210 and the interest holders of those interests are entitled only to 4211 the rights provided to them under the plan of merger and to any 4212 appraisal rights they have under the merging entityâs organic 4213 law; 4214 (j)âExcept as provided by law or the plan of merger, all 4215 the rights, privileges, franchises, and immunities of each 4216 eligible entity that is a party to the merger, other than the 4217 survivor, become the rights, privileges, franchises, and 4218 immunities of the survivor; and 4219 (k)âIf the survivor exists before the merger: 4220 1.âAll the property and contract and other rights of the 4221 survivor remain its property and contract and other rights 4222 without transfer, reversion, or impairment; 4223 2.âThe survivor remains subject to all of its debts, 4224 obligations, and other liabilities; and 4225 3.âExcept as provided by law or the plan of merger, the 4226 survivor continues to hold all of its rights, privileges, 4227 franchises, and immunities. 4228 (2)âExcept as provided in the organic law governing a party 4229 to a merger or in its articles of incorporation or organic 4230 rules, the merger does not give rise to any rights that any 4231 interest holder or third party would have upon a dissolution, 4232 liquidation, or winding up of that party. The merger does not 4233 require a party to the merger to wind up its affairs and does 4234 not constitute or cause its dissolution or termination. 4235 (3)âProperty held in trust or otherwise dedicated to a 4236 charitable purpose and held by a domestic or foreign eligible 4237 entity immediately before a merger becomes effective may not, as 4238 a result of the merger, be diverted from the purposes for which 4239 it was donated, granted, devised, or otherwise transferred 4240 except pursuant to the laws of this state addressing cy pres or 4241 dealing with nondiversion of charitable assets. 4242 (4)âAny bequest, devise, gift, grant, or promise contained 4243 in a will or other instrument of donation, subscription, or 4244 conveyance which is made to an eligible entity that is a party 4245 to a merger that is not the survivor and which takes effect or 4246 remains payable after the merger inures to the survivor. 4247 (5)âA trust obligation that would govern property if the 4248 property is directed to be transferred to a nonsurviving 4249 eligible entity applies to property that is to be transferred 4250 instead to the survivor after a merger becomes effective. 4251 Section 64.âSection 617.1107, Florida Statutes, is amended 4252 to read: 4253 617.1107âMerger of domestic and foreign corporations.â 4254 (1)âOne or more foreign corporations and one or more 4255 domestic corporations may be merged into a corporation of this 4256 state or of another jurisdiction if such merger is permitted by 4257 the laws of the jurisdiction under which each such foreign 4258 corporation is organized and if: 4259 (a)âEach foreign corporation complies with the applicable 4260 laws of the jurisdiction under which it is organized; and 4261 (b)âEach domestic corporation complies with the provisions 4262 of this act relating to the merger of domestic corporations. 4263 (2)âFollowing a merger in accordance with s. 617.1101, if 4264 the surviving eligible entity is a foreign eligible entity 4265 corporation is to be governed by the laws of any jurisdiction 4266 other than this state, it must comply with the provisions of 4267 this chapter act with respect to foreign corporations if it is 4268 to conduct its affairs in this state, and in every case it will 4269 be deemed to have filed with the department of State: 4270 (a)âAn agreement that it may be served with process in this 4271 state in any proceeding for the enforcement of any obligation of 4272 any domestic corporation which is a party to such merger; and 4273 (b)âAn irrevocable appointment of the department of State 4274 of this state as its agent to accept service of process in any 4275 such proceeding. 4276 (2)(3)âFollowing a merger in accordance with s. 617.1101, 4277 if the surviving eligible entity is a corporation is to be 4278 governed by the laws of this state, the effect of such merger is 4279 the same as in the case of the merger of domestic corporations. 4280 If the surviving eligible entity corporation is to be governed 4281 by the laws of any jurisdiction other than this state, the 4282 effect of such merger is governed by the laws of such other 4283 jurisdiction. 4284 (4)âAt any time prior to the filing of the articles of 4285 merger by the Department of State, the merger may be abandoned 4286 pursuant to provisions therefor, if any, set forth in the plan 4287 of merger. 4288 Section 65.âSection 617.1202, Florida Statutes, is amended 4289 to read: 4290 617.1202âSale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of 4291 corporate property and assets requiring member approval.âA sale, 4292 lease, exchange, or other disposition of all or substantially 4293 all of the property and assets of a corporation, in all cases 4294 other than those not requiring member approval as specified in 4295 s. 617.1201, may be made upon such terms and conditions and for 4296 such consideration, which may consist in whole or in part of 4297 money or property, real or personal, including shares, bonds, or 4298 other securities of any corporation or corporations for profit, 4299 domestic or foreign, and must be authorized in the following 4300 manner: 4301 (1)âIf a the corporation has members entitled to vote, the 4302 corporation may sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of 4303 all, or substantially all, of its property, with or without good 4304 will, on the terms and conditions and for the consideration 4305 determined by the corporationâs board of directors, but only if 4306 the board of directors proposes and its members approve the 4307 proposed transaction in the following manner: on the sale, 4308 lease, exchange, or other disposition of corporate property, the 4309 board of directors must adopt a resolution approving such sale, 4310 lease, exchange, or other disposition, and directing that it be 4311 submitted to a vote at a meeting of members entitled to vote 4312 thereon, which may be either an annual or special meeting. 4313 Written notice stating that the purpose, or one of the purposes, 4314 of such meeting is to consider the sale, lease, exchange, or 4315 other disposition of all or substantially all of the property 4316 and assets of the corporation must be given to each member 4317 entitled to vote at such meeting in accordance with the articles 4318 of incorporation or the bylaws. At such meeting, the members may 4319 authorize such sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition and 4320 may approve or fix, or may authorize the board of directors to 4321 fix, any or all of the terms and conditions thereof and the 4322 consideration to be received by the corporation therefor. Such 4323 authorization requires at least a majority of the votes which 4324 members present at such meeting or represented by proxy are 4325 entitled to cast. After such authorization by a vote of members, 4326 the board of directors may, in its discretion, abandon such 4327 sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of assets, subject 4328 to the rights of third parties under any contracts relating to 4329 such sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition, without 4330 further action or approval by members. 4331 (a)âThe board of directors shall first adopt a resolution 4332 approving the disposition, and thereafter, the disposition must 4333 also be approved by the corporationâs members having voting 4334 rights thereon. 4335 (b)âIn submitting the disposition to the members who have 4336 voting rights for approval, the board of directors shall 4337 recommend the proposed transaction to the members of record 4338 unless the board of directors makes a determination that because 4339 of a conflict of interest or other special circumstances it 4340 should not make such a recommendation, in which event the board 4341 of directors shall inform the members of the basis for its so 4342 proceeding without such recommendation. 4343 (c)âThe board of directors may set conditions for approval 4344 of the disposition or the effectiveness of the disposition. 4345 (d)âIf the disposition is required to be approved by the 4346 members under this subsection and if the approval is to be given 4347 at the meeting, the corporation must notify each member entitled 4348 to vote of the meeting of members at which the disposition is to 4349 be submitted for approval. The notice must state that the 4350 purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider 4351 the disposition and must contain a description of the 4352 disposition and the consideration to be received by the 4353 corporation. 4354 (e)âUnless this chapter, the articles of incorporation, or 4355 the board of directors acting pursuant to paragraph (c) requires 4356 a greater vote or a greater quorum, the approval of the 4357 disposition shall require the approval of the members entitled 4358 to vote at a meeting at which the current required quorum exists 4359 consisting of a majority of all the votes entitled to be cast on 4360 the disposition. 4361 (2)âAfter a disposition has been approved by the members 4362 under this section, and at any time before the disposition has 4363 been consummated, it may be abandoned by the corporation without 4364 action by the members, subject to any contractual rights of 4365 other parties to the disposition. 4366 (3)âA disposition of assets in the course of dissolution is 4367 governed by ss. 617.1401-617.1440 and not by this section. 4368 (4)âIf the corporation has no members or if its members are 4369 not entitled to vote thereon, a sale, lease, exchange, or other 4370 disposition of all or substantially all the property and assets 4371 of a corporation may be authorized by a majority vote of the 4372 directors then in office. 4373 Section 66.âSubsection (2) of section 617.1401, Florida 4374 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (3) of that section is 4375 reenacted, to read: 4376 617.1401âVoluntary dissolution of corporation prior to 4377 conducting its affairs.â 4378 (2)âArticles of dissolution must be executed in accordance 4379 with s. 617.01201 and must set forth: 4380 (a)âThe name of the corporation; 4381 (b)âThe date of filing of its articles of incorporation; 4382 (c)âThat the corporation has not commenced to conduct its 4383 affairs; 4384 (d)âThat no debts of the corporation remain unpaid; and 4385 (e)âThat any net assets of the corporation remaining after 4386 winding up have been distributed in accordance with s. 617.1406; 4387 and 4388 (f)âThat the incorporator or a majority of the 4389 incorporators or a majority of the directors, as the case may 4390 be, authorized the dissolution. 4391 (3)âThe articles of dissolution must be filed and shall 4392 become effective in accordance with s. 617.1403, may be revoked 4393 in accordance with s. 617.1404, and shall have the effect 4394 prescribed in s. 617.1405. 4395 Section 67.âSection 617.1402, Florida Statutes, is amended 4396 to read: 4397 617.1402âDissolution of corporation subsequent to 4398 conducting its affairs.âA corporation desiring to dissolve and 4399 wind up its affairs must adopt a resolution to dissolve in the 4400 following manner: 4401 (1)âIf the corporation has members entitled to vote on a 4402 resolution to dissolve, and unless the board of directors 4403 determines that because of a conflict of interest or other 4404 substantial reason it should not make any recommendation, the 4405 board of directors must adopt a resolution recommending that the 4406 corporation be dissolved and directing that the question of such 4407 dissolution be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members 4408 entitled to vote thereon, which may be either an annual or 4409 special meeting. Written notice stating that the purpose, or one 4410 of the purposes, of such meeting is to consider the advisability 4411 of dissolving the corporation must be given to each member 4412 entitled to vote at such meeting in accordance with the articles 4413 of incorporation or the bylaws. A resolution to dissolve the 4414 corporation must shall be adopted upon receiving at least a 4415 majority of the votes which members present at such meeting or 4416 represented by proxy are entitled to cast. 4417 (2)âIf the corporation has no members or if its members are 4418 not entitled to vote on a resolution to dissolve, the 4419 dissolution of the corporation may be authorized at a meeting of 4420 the board of directors by a majority vote of the directors then 4421 in office. 4422 Section 68.âSubsection (1) of section 617.1403, Florida 4423 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (3) is added to that 4424 section, to read: 4425 617.1403âArticles of dissolution.â 4426 (1)âAt any time after dissolution is authorized, the 4427 corporation may dissolve by delivering to the department of 4428 State for filing articles of dissolution setting forth: 4429 (a)âThe name of the corporation; 4430 (b)âIf the corporation has members entitled to vote on 4431 dissolution, the date of the meeting of members at which the 4432 resolution to dissolve was adopted, a statement that the number 4433 of votes cast for dissolution was sufficient for approval, or a 4434 statement that such a resolution was adopted by written consent 4435 and executed in accordance with s. 617.0701; and 4436 (c)âIf the corporation has no members or if its members are 4437 not entitled to vote on dissolution, a statement of such fact, 4438 the date of the adoption of such resolution by the board of 4439 directors, the number of directors then in office, and the vote 4440 for the resolution. 4441 (3)âFor purposes of ss. 617.1401-617.1422, the term 4442 âdissolved corporationâ means a corporation whose articles of 4443 dissolution have become effective and includes a successor 4444 entity, as defined in s. 617.01401. 4445 Section 69.âSubsection (1) of section 617.1405, Florida 4446 Statutes, is amended, subsections (5) and (6) are added to that 4447 section, and subsection (4) of that section is reenacted, to 4448 read: 4449 617.1405âEffect of dissolution.â 4450 (1)âA dissolved corporation that has dissolved continues 4451 its corporate existence but may not conduct its affairs except 4452 to the extent appropriate to wind up and liquidate its affairs, 4453 including: 4454 (a)âCollecting its assets; 4455 (b)âDisposing of its properties that will not be 4456 distributed in kind pursuant to the plan of distribution of 4457 assets adopted under s. 617.1406; 4458 (c)âDischarging or making provision for discharging its 4459 liabilities; 4460 (d)âDistributing its remaining property in accordance with 4461 the plan of distribution of assets adopted under s. 617.1406; 4462 and 4463 (e)âDoing every other act necessary to wind up and 4464 liquidate its affairs. 4465 (4)âThe name of a dissolved corporation is not available 4466 for assumption or use by another corporation until 120 days 4467 after the effective date of dissolution unless the dissolved 4468 corporation provides the department with an affidavit, executed 4469 pursuant to s. 617.01201, authorizing the immediate assumption 4470 or use of the name by another corporation. 4471 (5)âFor purposes of this section, the circuit court may 4472 appoint a trustee, custodian, receiver, or provisional director 4473 as described in s. 617.1435 for any property owned or acquired 4474 by the corporation who may engage in any act permitted in 4475 accordance with subsection (1) if any director or officer of the 4476 dissolved corporation is unwilling or unable to serve or cannot 4477 be located. 4478 (6)âProperty held in trust or otherwise dedicated to a 4479 public or charitable purpose may not be diverted from its trust 4480 or charitable purpose by the dissolution of a corporation except 4481 in compliance with and pursuant to the laws of this state 4482 addressing cy pres or otherwise dealing with the nondiversion of 4483 charitable assets. 4484 Section 70.âSection 617.1406, Florida Statutes, is amended 4485 to read: 4486 617.1406âPlan of distribution of assets.âA plan providing 4487 for the distribution of assets, not inconsistent with this 4488 chapter act or the articles of incorporation, must be adopted by 4489 a corporation in the following manner: 4490 (1)âIf the corporation has members entitled to vote on a 4491 plan of distribution of assets, the board of directors must 4492 adopt a resolution recommending a plan of distribution and 4493 directing its submission to a vote at a meeting of members 4494 entitled to vote thereon, which may be either an annual or a 4495 special meeting. Written notice setting forth the proposed plan 4496 of distribution or a summary thereof must be given to each 4497 member entitled to vote at such meeting in accordance with the 4498 articles of incorporation or the bylaws. Such plan of 4499 distribution shall be adopted upon receiving at least a majority 4500 of the votes which the members present at such meeting or 4501 represented by proxy are entitled to cast. 4502 (2)âIf the corporation has no members or if its members are 4503 not entitled to vote on a plan of distribution, such plan may be 4504 adopted at a meeting of the board of directors by a majority 4505 vote of the directors then in office. 4506 (3)âA plan of distribution of assets must provide that: 4507 (a)âAll liabilities and obligations of the corporation be 4508 paid and discharged, or adequate provisions be made therefor; 4509 (b)âAssets held by the corporation upon condition requiring 4510 return, transfer, or conveyance, which condition occurs by 4511 reason of the dissolution, be returned, transferred, or conveyed 4512 in accordance with such requirements; 4513 (c)âAssets received and held by the corporation subject to 4514 limitations permitting their use only for charitable, religious, 4515 eleemosynary, benevolent, educational, or similar purposes, but 4516 not held upon a condition requiring return, transfer, or 4517 conveyance by reason of the dissolution, be transferred or 4518 conveyed to one or more domestic or foreign corporations, 4519 trusts, societies, or organizations engaged in activities 4520 substantially similar to those of the dissolving corporation, as 4521 provided in the plan of distribution of assets; 4522 (d)âOther assets, if any, be distributed in accordance with 4523 the provisions of the articles of incorporation or the bylaws to 4524 the extent that the articles of incorporation or the bylaws 4525 determine the distributive rights of members, or any class or 4526 classes of members, or provide for distribution to others; and 4527 (e)âAny remaining assets be distributed to such persons, 4528 trusts, societies, organizations, or domestic or foreign 4529 corporations, whether for profit or not for profit, as specified 4530 in the plan of distribution of assets. 4531 (4)âA copy of the plan of distribution of assets, 4532 authenticated by an officer of the corporation and containing 4533 the officerâs certificate of compliance with the requirements of 4534 subsection (1) or subsection (2) must be filed with the 4535 department of State. 4536 Section 71.âSection 617.1407, Florida Statutes, is amended 4537 to read: 4538 617.1407âUnknown claims against dissolved corporation.â 4539 (1)âA dissolved corporation or successor entity may execute 4540 one of the following procedures to resolve payment of unknown 4541 claims: 4542 (a)âA dissolved corporation or successor entity may file 4543 notice of its dissolution with the department on the form 4544 prescribed by the department and request that persons with 4545 having claims against the corporation which are not known claims 4546 as defined in s. 617.1408(5) to the corporation or successor 4547 entity present them in accordance with the notice. The notice 4548 must: 4549 1.âState the name of the corporation that is the subject 4550 and the date of the dissolution; 4551 2.âState that the corporation is the subject of a 4552 dissolution and the effective date of the dissolution; 4553 3.âSpecify Describe the information that must be included 4554 in a claim; 4555 4.âState that a claim must be in writing and provide a 4556 mailing address to which the claim may be sent; and 4557 5.3.âState that a claim against the corporation under this 4558 subsection will be is barred unless a proceeding to enforce the 4559 claim is commenced within 4 years after the date of the filing 4560 of the notice. 4561 (b)âA dissolved corporation or successor entity may, within 4562 10 days after filing articles of dissolution with the 4563 department, publish a âNotice of Corporate Dissolution.â The 4564 notice must appear once a week for 2 consecutive weeks in a 4565 newspaper of general circulation in the county in the state in 4566 which the corporation has its principal office, if any, or, if 4567 none, in a county in the state in which the corporation owns 4568 real or personal property. Such newspaper shall meet the 4569 requirements as are prescribed by law for such purposes. The 4570 notice must: 4571 1.âState the name of the corporation that is the subject 4572 and the date of the dissolution; 4573 2.âState that the corporation is the subject of a 4574 dissolution and the effective date of the dissolution; 4575 3.âSpecify Describe the information that must be included 4576 in a claim; 4577 4.âState that a claim must be in writing and provide a 4578 mailing address to which the claim may be sent; and 4579 5.3.âState that a claim against the corporation under this 4580 subsection will be is barred unless a proceeding to enforce the 4581 claim is commenced within 4 years after the filing date of the 4582 second consecutive weekly publication of the notice. 4583 (2)âIf the dissolved corporation or successor entity 4584 complies with paragraph (1)(a) or paragraph (1)(b), unless 4585 sooner barred by another statute limiting actions, the claim of 4586 each of the following claimants is barred unless the claimant 4587 commences a proceeding to enforce the claim against the 4588 dissolved corporation within 4 years after the date of filing 4589 the notice with the department or the date of the second 4590 consecutive weekly publication, as applicable: 4591 (a)âA claimant who was not given did not receive written 4592 notice under s. 617.1408;(9), or whose claim is not provided for 4593 under s. 617.1408(10), regardless of whether such claim is based 4594 on an event occurring before or after the effective date of 4595 dissolution. 4596 (b)âA claimant whose claim was timely sent to the dissolved 4597 corporation but on which no action was taken; or. 4598 (c)âA claimant whose claim was excluded as a known claim as 4599 defined in s. 617.1408(5)(b). 4600 (3)âThis section does not preclude or relieve the 4601 corporation from its notification to claimants otherwise set 4602 forth in this chapter A claim may be entered under this section: 4603 (a)âAgainst the dissolved corporation, to the extent of its 4604 undistributed assets; or 4605 (b)âIf the assets have been distributed in liquidation, 4606 against a member of the dissolved corporation to the extent of 4607 such memberâs pro rata share of the claim or the corporate 4608 assets distributed to such member in liquidation, whichever is 4609 less; however, the aggregate liability of any member of a 4610 dissolved corporation may not exceed the amount distributed to 4611 the member in dissolution. 4612 Section 72.âSection 617.1408, Florida Statutes, is amended 4613 to read: 4614 (Substantial rewording of section. 4615 See s. 617.1408, F.S., for present text.) 4616 617.1408âKnown claims against dissolved corporation. 4617 (1)âA dissolved corporation or a successor entity may 4618 dispose of the known claims against it by giving written notice 4619 that satisfies the requirements of subsection (2) to its known 4620 claimants of the dissolution at any time after the effective 4621 date of the dissolution, but no later than the date that is 270 4622 days before the date which is 3 years after the effective date 4623 of the dissolution. 4624 (2)âThe written notice must: 4625 (a)âState the name of the corporation that is the subject 4626 of the dissolution; 4627 (b)âState that the corporation is the subject of a 4628 dissolution and the effective date of the dissolution; 4629 (c)âSpecify the information that must be included in a 4630 claim; 4631 (d)âState that a claim must be in writing and provide a 4632 mailing address where a claim may be sent; 4633 (e)âState the deadline, which may not be less than 120 days 4634 after the date of the written notice is received by the 4635 claimant, by which the dissolved corporation must receive the 4636 claim; 4637 (f)âState that the claim will be barred if not received by 4638 the deadline; 4639 (g)âState that the dissolved corporation or successor 4640 entity may make distributions thereafter to other claimants and 4641 the members of the corporation or persons interested as having 4642 been such claimants without further notice; and 4643 (h)âBe accompanied by a copy of ss. 617.1405-617.14091. 4644 (3)âA dissolved corporation or successor entity may reject, 4645 in whole or in part, a claim submitted by a claimant and 4646 received before the deadline specified in the written notice 4647 pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) by mailing notice of the 4648 rejection to the claimant, on or before the date that is the 4649 earlier of 90 days after the dissolved corporation receives the 4650 claim, or the date that is at least 150 days before the date 4651 which is 3 years after the effective date of the dissolution. A 4652 rejection notice sent by the dissolved corporation pursuant to 4653 this subsection must state that the claim will be barred unless 4654 the claimant, not later than 120 days after the claimant 4655 receives the rejection notice, commences an action in the 4656 circuit court in the applicable county against the dissolved 4657 corporation to enforce the claim. 4658 (4)âA claim against a dissolved corporation is barred: 4659 (a)âIf a claimant who is given written notice pursuant to 4660 this section does not deliver the claim to the dissolved 4661 corporation by the specified deadline; or 4662 (b)âIf the claim was timely received by the dissolved 4663 corporation but was timely rejected by the dissolved corporation 4664 under subsection (3) and the claimant does not commence the 4665 required action in the applicable county within 120 days after 4666 the claimant receives the rejection notice. 4667 (5)(a)âFor purposes of this chapter, âknown claimâ means 4668 any claim or liability that, as of the date of the giving of 4669 written notice described in subsections (1) and (2) above: 4670 1.âHas matured sufficiently on or before the date of 4671 dissolution to be legally capable of assertion against the 4672 dissolved corporation; or 4673 2.âIs unmatured as of the date of dissolution but will 4674 mature in the future solely because of the passage of time. 4675 (b)âFor purposes of this chapter, âknown claimâ does not 4676 include a contingent liability or a claim based on an event 4677 occurring after the effective date of the dissolution. 4678 (6)âThe giving of any notice pursuant to this section does 4679 not revive any claim then barred or constitute acknowledgment by 4680 the dissolved corporation that any person to whom such notice is 4681 sent is a proper claimant and does not operate as a waiver of 4682 any defense or counterclaim in respect of any claim asserted by 4683 any person to whom such notice is sent. 4684 Section 73.âSection 617.1409, Florida Statutes, is created 4685 to read: 4686 617.1409âCourt proceedings.â 4687 (1)âA dissolved corporation that has filed a notice under 4688 s. 617.1407(1)(a) or published a notice under s. 617.1407(1)(b) 4689 may file an application with the circuit court in the applicable 4690 county for a determination of the amount and form of security to 4691 be provided for payment of claims that are not known claims as 4692 defined in s. 617.1408(5) but that, based on the facts known to 4693 the dissolved corporation, are reasonably estimated to arise 4694 after the effective date of dissolution. Provisions need not be 4695 made for any claim that is or is reasonably anticipated to be 4696 barred under s. 617.1407(2). 4697 (2)âWithin 10 days after the filing of the application 4698 pursuant to subsection (1), notice of the proceeding must be 4699 given by the dissolved corporation to each claimant holding a 4700 claim whose identity and contingent claim is known to the 4701 dissolved corporation. 4702 (3)âIn any proceeding under this section, the court may 4703 appoint a guardian ad litem to represent all claimants whose 4704 identities are unknown. The reasonable fees and expenses of such 4705 guardian ad litem, including all reasonable expert witness fees, 4706 must be paid by the dissolved corporation. 4707 (4)âProvisions by the dissolved corporation for security in 4708 the amount and the form ordered by the court under subsection 4709 (1) satisfies the dissolved corporationâs obligations with 4710 respect to claims that are contingent, have not been made known 4711 to the dissolved corporation, or are based on an event occurring 4712 after the effective date of dissolution, and such claims may not 4713 be enforced against a person who received assets in liquidation. 4714 Section 74.âSection 617.14091, Florida Statutes, is created 4715 to read: 4716 617.14091âLimitation on director liability for a dissolved 4717 corporation; claims against dissolved corporation; enforcement.â 4718 (1)âDirectors of a dissolved corporation or governing 4719 persons of a successor entity that has disposed of claims under 4720 s. 617.1407, s. 617.1408, or s. 617.1409 are not personally 4721 liable to the claimants of the dissolved corporation. 4722 (2)âA claim that is not barred by s. 617.1407, s. 617.1408, 4723 or by any other law limiting claims, may be enforced: 4724 (a)âAgainst the dissolved corporation, to the extent of its 4725 undistributed assets; or 4726 (b)âExcept as provided in s. 617.1409(4), if the assets 4727 have been distributed in liquidation, against a member of the 4728 dissolved corporation to the extent of the memberâs pro rata 4729 share of the claim or the corporate assets distributed to the 4730 member in liquidation, whichever is less, provided that the 4731 aggregate liability of any member of a dissolved corporation 4732 arising under s. 617.1408 or otherwise may not exceed the total 4733 amount distributed to the member in dissolution. 4734 Section 75.âSubsection (1) of section 617.1420, Florida 4735 Statutes, is amended, and subsections (3) and (4) are added to 4736 that section, to read: 4737 617.1420âGrounds for administrative dissolution.â 4738 (1)âThe department of State may commence a proceeding under 4739 s. 617.1421 to administratively dissolve a corporation if: 4740 (a)âThe corporation has failed to file its annual report 4741 and pay the annual report filing fee by 5 p.m. Eastern Time on 4742 the third Friday in September; 4743 (b)âThe corporation is without a registered agent or 4744 registered office in this state for 30 days or more; 4745 (c)âThe corporation does not notify the department of State 4746 within 30 days after its registered agent or registered office 4747 has been changed, after its registered agent has resigned, or 4748 after its registered office has been discontinued; 4749 (d)âThe corporation has failed to answer truthfully and 4750 fully, within the time prescribed by this chapter act, 4751 interrogatories propounded by the department of State; or 4752 (e)âThe corporationâs period of duration stated in its 4753 articles of incorporation has expired. 4754 (3)âIf the department determines that one or more grounds 4755 exist for administratively dissolving a corporation under 4756 paragraph (1)(a), paragraph (1)(b), paragraph (1)(c), or 4757 paragraph (1)(d), the department shall serve notice in a record 4758 to the corporation of its intent to administratively dissolve 4759 the corporation. Issuance of the notice may be made by 4760 electronic transmission to a corporation that has provided the 4761 department with an e-mail address. 4762 (4)âIf, within 60 days after sending the notice of intent 4763 to administratively dissolve pursuant to subsection (3), a 4764 corporation does not correct each ground for dissolution under 4765 paragraph (1)(a), paragraph (1)(b), paragraph (1)(c), or 4766 paragraph (1)(d), or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction 4767 of the department that each ground determined by the department 4768 does not exist, the department shall dissolve the corporation 4769 administratively and issue to the corporation a notice in a 4770 record of administrative dissolution that states the grounds for 4771 dissolution. Issuance of the notice of administrative 4772 dissolution may be made by electronic transmission to a 4773 corporation that has provided the department with an e-mail 4774 address. 4775 Section 76.âSubsections (1), (2), and (4) of section 4776 617.1421, Florida Statutes, are amended, and subsection (3) of 4777 that section is reenacted, to read: 4778 617.1421âProcedure for and effect of administrative 4779 dissolution.â 4780 (1)âIf the department of State determines that one or more 4781 grounds exist under s. 617.1420 for administratively dissolving 4782 a corporation, it shall serve the corporation with notice of its 4783 intent under s. 617.0504(2) to administratively dissolve the 4784 corporation. If the corporation has provided the department with 4785 an e-mail electronic mail address, such notice shall be by 4786 electronic transmission. Administrative dissolution for failure 4787 to file an annual report shall occur on the fourth Friday in 4788 September of each year. The department of State shall issue a 4789 certificate of dissolution to each dissolved corporation. 4790 Issuance of the certificate of dissolution may be by electronic 4791 transmission to any corporation that has provided the department 4792 with an e-mail electronic mail address. 4793 (2)âIf the corporation does not correct each ground for 4794 dissolution under s. 617.1420(1)(b), (c), (d), or (e) or 4795 demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the department of 4796 State that each ground determined by the department does not 4797 exist within 60 days after issuance of the notice, the 4798 department shall administratively dissolve the corporation by 4799 issuing a certificate of dissolution that recites the ground or 4800 grounds for dissolution and its effective date. Issuance of the 4801 certificate of dissolution may be by electronic transmission to 4802 any corporation that has provided the department with an e-mail 4803 electronic mail address. 4804 (3)âA corporation administratively dissolved continues its 4805 corporate existence but may not conduct any affairs except that 4806 necessary to wind up and liquidate its affairs under s. 617.1405 4807 and adopt a plan of distribution of assets pursuant to s. 4808 617.1406. 4809 (4)âA director, officer, or agent of a corporation 4810 dissolved pursuant to this section, purporting to act on behalf 4811 of the corporation, is not personally liable for the debts, 4812 obligations, and liabilities of the corporation arising from 4813 such action and incurred subsequent to the corporationâs 4814 administrative dissolution unless that officer, director, or 4815 agent only if he or she has actual notice of the administrative 4816 dissolution at the time such action is taken. Any; but such 4817 liability shall be terminated upon the ratification of such 4818 action by the corporationâs board of directors or members 4819 subsequent to the reinstatement of the corporation. 4820 Section 77.âSection 617.1430, Florida Statutes, is amended 4821 to read: 4822 617.1430âGrounds for judicial dissolution.âA circuit court 4823 may dissolve a corporation or order such other remedy as 4824 provided in s. 617.1432 or s. 617.1434: 4825 (1)(a)âIn a proceeding by the Department of Legal Affairs 4826 if it is established that: 4827 1.âThe corporation obtained its articles of incorporation 4828 through fraud; or 4829 2.âThe corporation has exceeded or abused, or is continuing 4830 to exceed or abuse continued to exceed or abuse the authority 4831 conferred upon it by law. 4832 (b)âThe enumeration in paragraph (a) of grounds for 4833 judicial dissolution does not exclude actions or special 4834 proceedings by the Department of Legal Affairs or any state 4835 official for the annulment or dissolution of a corporation for 4836 other causes as provided by law. 4837 (2)âIn a proceeding brought by at least 50 members or 4838 members holding at least 10 percent of the voting power, 4839 whichever is less, or by a member or group or percentage of 4840 members as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation 4841 or bylaws, or by a director or any person authorized in the 4842 articles of incorporation, if it is established that: 4843 (a)âThe directors are deadlocked in the management of the 4844 corporate affairs, the members are unable to break the deadlock, 4845 and irreparable injury to the corporation or its mission is 4846 threatened or being suffered because of the deadlock; 4847 (b)âThe members are deadlocked in voting power and have 4848 failed, for a period that includes at least two consecutive 4849 annual meeting dates, to elect successors to directors whose 4850 terms have expired or would have expired upon qualification of 4851 their successors; or 4852 (c)âThe corporate assets are being misapplied or wasted; 4853 (d)âThe directors or those in control of the corporation 4854 have acted, are acting, or are reasonably expected to act in a 4855 manner that is illegal or fraudulent; or 4856 (e)âThe corporation has insufficient assets to continue its 4857 activities and is no longer able to assemble a quorum of 4858 directors or members. 4859 (3)âIn a proceeding by a creditor if it is established 4860 that: 4861 (a)âThe creditorâs claim has been reduced to judgment, the 4862 execution on the judgment returned unsatisfied, and the 4863 corporation is insolvent; or 4864 (b)âThe corporation has admitted in writing that the 4865 creditorâs claim is due and owing and the corporation is 4866 insolvent. 4867 (4)âIn a proceeding by the corporation to have its 4868 voluntary dissolution continued under court supervision. 4869 Section 78.âSection 617.1431, Florida Statutes, is amended 4870 to read: 4871 617.1431âProcedure for judicial dissolution.â 4872 (1)âVenue for a proceeding brought under s. 617.1430 lies 4873 in the circuit court of the applicable county where the 4874 corporationâs principal office is or was last located, as shown 4875 by the records of the Department of State, or, if none in this 4876 state, where its registered office is or was last located. 4877 (2)âIt is not necessary to make members or directors 4878 parties to a proceeding to dissolve a corporation unless relief 4879 is sought against them individually. 4880 (3)âA court in a proceeding brought to dissolve a 4881 corporation may issue injunctions, appoint a receiver or 4882 custodian during the proceeding pendente lite with all powers 4883 and duties the court directs, take other action required to 4884 preserve the corporate assets wherever located, and carry on the 4885 affairs of the corporation until a full hearing can be held. 4886 (4)âIf the court determines that any party has commenced, 4887 continued, or participated in a proceeding under s. 617.1430, 4888 and has acted arbitrarily, frivolously, vexatiously, or in bad 4889 faith, the court may award reasonable attorney fees and costs to 4890 the other parties to the proceeding who have been affected 4891 adversely by such actions. 4892 Section 79.âSubsections (1) through (5) of section 4893 617.1432, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 4894 617.1432âReceivership or custodianship.â 4895 (1)âA court in a judicial proceeding brought under s. 4896 617.1430 to dissolve a corporation may appoint one or more 4897 receivers to wind up and liquidate, or one or more custodians to 4898 manage, the affairs of the corporation, except as otherwise 4899 provided herein. The court shall hold a hearing, after notifying 4900 all parties to the proceeding and any interested persons 4901 designated by the court, before appointing a receiver or 4902 custodian. The court appointing a receiver or custodian has 4903 exclusive jurisdiction over the corporation and all of its 4904 property wherever located. A court may not appoint a custodian 4905 or a receiver in a judicial proceeding brought under s. 4906 617.1430(2)(a) or s. 617.1430(2)(b) if the members, directors, 4907 or any person authorized in the articles of incorporation, by 4908 agreement or otherwise, or a court pursuant to s. 617.1435, have 4909 provided for the appointment of a provisional director or other 4910 means for the resolution of the deadlock, but the court may 4911 enforce the remedy so provided, if appropriate. 4912 (2)âThe court may appoint a natural person or an eligible 4913 entity a corporation authorized to act as a receiver or 4914 custodian. The eligible entity corporation may be a domestic 4915 corporation or a foreign eligible entity corporation authorized 4916 to transact business in this state. The court may require the 4917 receiver or custodian to post bond, with or without sureties, in 4918 an amount the court directs. 4919 (3)âThe court shall describe the powers and duties of the 4920 receiver or custodian in its appointing order, which may be 4921 amended from time to time. Among other powers: 4922 (a)âThe receiver: 4923 1.âMay dispose of all or any part of the assets of the 4924 corporation wherever located, at a public or private sale, if 4925 authorized by the court; and 4926 2.âMay sue and defend in the receiverâs his or her own name 4927 as receiver of the corporation in all courts of this state. 4928 (b)âThe custodian may exercise all of the powers of the 4929 corporation, through or in place of its board of directors or 4930 officers, to the extent necessary to manage the affairs of the 4931 corporation in the best interests of its members and creditors. 4932 (4)âThe court during a receivership may redesignate the 4933 receiver to act as a custodian, and during a custodianship may 4934 redesignate the custodian to act as a receiver, if doing so is 4935 consistent with the mission of the corporation and in the best 4936 interests of the corporation, and its members, if any, and 4937 creditors. The court may amend the order designating the 4938 receiver as custodian and custodian as receiver as the court 4939 deems appropriate. 4940 (5)âThe court from time to time during the receivership or 4941 custodianship may order compensation paid and expense 4942 disbursements or reimbursements made to the receiver or 4943 custodian and his or her counsel for the receiver or custodian 4944 from the assets of the corporation or proceeds from the sale of 4945 the assets. 4946 Section 80.âSection 617.1433, Florida Statutes, is amended 4947 to read: 4948 617.1433âJudgment of dissolution.â 4949 (1)âIf after a hearing in a proceeding under s. 617.1430 4950 the court determines that one or more grounds for judicial 4951 dissolution described in s. 617.1430 exist, it may enter a 4952 judgment dissolving the corporation and specifying the effective 4953 date of the dissolution, and the clerk of the court shall 4954 deliver a certified copy of the judgment to the department of 4955 State, which shall file it. 4956 (2)âAfter entering the judgment of dissolution, the court 4957 shall direct or oversee the winding up and liquidation of the 4958 corporationâs affairs in accordance with ss. 617.1405 and 4959 617.1406, and the notification of claimants in accordance with 4960 ss. 617.1407 and 617.1408, subject to the provisions of 4961 subsection (3). 4962 (3)âIn a proceeding for judicial dissolution, the court may 4963 require all creditors of the corporation to file with the clerk 4964 of the court or with the receiver, in such form as the court may 4965 prescribe, proofs under oath of their respective claims. If the 4966 court requires the filing of claims, it shall fix a date, which 4967 shall be not less than 4 months after the date of the order, as 4968 the last day for filing of claims. The court shall prescribe the 4969 method by which such notice for the deadline for filing claims 4970 that shall be given to creditors and claimants. Before Prior to 4971 the fixed date so fixed, the court may extend the time for the 4972 filing of claims by court order. Creditors and claimants failing 4973 to file proofs of claim on or before the fixed date so fixed may 4974 be barred, by order of court, from participating in the 4975 distribution of the assets of the corporation. Nothing in This 4976 section does not affect affects the enforceability of any 4977 recorded mortgage or lien or the perfected security interest or 4978 rights of a person in possession of real or personal property. 4979 Section 81.âSection 617.1434, Florida Statutes, is created 4980 to read: 4981 617.1434âAlternative remedies to judicial dissolution.â 4982 (1)âIn a proceeding under s. 617.1430, the court may, as an 4983 alternative to directing the dissolution of the corporation and 4984 upon a showing of sufficient merit to warrant such remedy: 4985 (a)âAppoint a receiver or a custodian during the proceeding 4986 as provided in s. 617.1432; 4987 (b)âAppoint a provisional director as provided in s. 4988 617.1435; or 4989 (c)âMake any order or grant any equitable relief other than 4990 dissolution as in its discretion it may deem appropriate. 4991 (2)âAlternative remedies, such as the appointment of a 4992 receiver or custodian, may also be ordered upon a showing of 4993 sufficient merit to warrant such remedy, in advance of directing 4994 the dissolution of the corporation or, after a judgment of 4995 dissolution is entered, to assist in facilitating the winding up 4996 of the corporation. 4997 Section 82.âSection 617.1435, Florida Statutes, is created 4998 to read: 4999 617.1435âProvisional director.â 5000 (1)(a)âIn a proceeding under s. 617.1430(2), the court may 5001 appoint a provisional director if it appears that such 5002 appointment will remedy the grounds alleged by the complaining 5003 members or director to support the jurisdiction of the court 5004 under s. 617.1430. A provisional director may be appointed 5005 notwithstanding the absence of a vacancy on the board of 5006 directors, and such director has all the rights and powers of a 5007 duly elected director, including the right to notice of and to 5008 vote at meetings of directors. 5009 (b)âA provisional director retains the rights described in 5010 paragraph (a) until such time as the provisional director is 5011 removed by order of the court or, unless otherwise ordered by a 5012 court, removed by a vote of the members or directors sufficient 5013 either to elect a majority of the board of directors or, if 5014 greater than majority voting is required by the articles of 5015 incorporation or the bylaws, to elect the requisite number of 5016 directors needed to take action. A provisional director shall be 5017 an impartial person who is neither a member nor a creditor of 5018 the corporation or of any subsidiary or affiliate of the 5019 corporation, and whose further qualifications, if any, may be 5020 determined by the court. 5021 (2)âThe provisional director shall report to the court as 5022 ordered by the court concerning the matter complained of, or the 5023 status of the deadlock, if any, and of the status of the 5024 corporationâs affairs, as the court shall direct. A provisional 5025 director is not liable for any action taken or decision made, 5026 except as directors may be liable under s. 617.0831. In 5027 addition, the provisional director must submit to the court, if 5028 so directed, recommendations as to the appropriate disposition 5029 of the action. Whenever a provisional director is appointed, any 5030 officer or director of the corporation may petition the court 5031 for instructions clarifying the duties and responsibilities of 5032 such officer or director. 5033 (3)âIn any proceeding under which a provisional director is 5034 appointed pursuant to this section, the court must allow 5035 reasonable compensation to the provisional director for services 5036 rendered and reimbursement or direct payment of reasonable costs 5037 and expenses, which amounts shall be paid by the corporation. 5038 Section 83.âSection 617.1440, Florida Statutes, is amended 5039 to read: 5040 617.1440âDeposit with Department of Financial Services. 5041 Unless otherwise provided in ss. 617.1407-617.1409, assets of a 5042 dissolved corporation that should be transferred to a creditor, 5043 claimant, member of the corporation, or other person who cannot 5044 be found or who is not competent to receive them must shall be 5045 deposited, or reduced to cash and deposited, as appropriate, 5046 within 6 months after the date fixed for the payment of the 5047 final liquidating distribution, with the Department of Financial 5048 Services for safekeeping, where such assets shall be held as 5049 abandoned property. When the creditor, claimant, member, or 5050 other person furnishes satisfactory proof of entitlement to the 5051 amount or assets deposited, the Department of Financial Services 5052 shall pay the creditor, claimant, member, or other person, or 5053 their him or her or his or her representative for that creditor, 5054 claimant, member or other person, that amount or those assets. 5055 Section 84.âSection 617.15015, Florida Statutes, is created 5056 to read: 5057 617.15015âForeign corporation governing law.â 5058 (1)âThe laws of this state or other jurisdiction under 5059 which a foreign corporation exists govern: 5060 (a)âThe organization and internal affairs of the foreign 5061 corporation; and 5062 (b)âThe interest holder liability of its members. 5063 (2)âA foreign corporation may not be denied a certificate 5064 of authority by reason of a difference between the laws of its 5065 jurisdiction of formation and the laws of this state. 5066 (3)âA certificate of authority does not authorize a foreign 5067 corporation to engage in any business or exercise any power that 5068 a corporation may not engage in or exercise in this state. 5069 Section 85.âSubsection (4) of section 617.1502, Florida 5070 Statutes, is amended, and subsections (6), (7), and (8) are 5071 added to that section, to read: 5072 617.1502âConsequences of conducting affairs without 5073 authority.â 5074 (4)âA foreign corporation which conducts its affairs in 5075 this state without authority to do so is shall be liable to this 5076 state for the years or parts thereof during which it conducted 5077 its affairs in this state without authority in an amount equal 5078 to all fees and taxes which would have been imposed by this 5079 chapter act upon such corporation had it duly applied for and 5080 received authority to conduct its affairs in this state as 5081 required by this chapter act. In addition to the payments thus 5082 prescribed in this subsection, such corporation is shall be 5083 liable for a civil penalty of not less than $500 or more than 5084 $1,000 for each year or part thereof during which it conducts 5085 its affairs in this state without a certificate of authority. 5086 The department of State may collect all penalties due under this 5087 subsection. 5088 (6)âA member, an officer, or a director of a foreign 5089 corporation is not liable for the debts, obligations, or other 5090 liabilities of the foreign corporation solely because the 5091 foreign corporation transacted business in this state without a 5092 certificate of authority. 5093 (7)âSection 617.15015(1) applies even if a foreign 5094 corporation fails to have a certificate of authority to transact 5095 business in this state. 5096 (8)âIf a foreign corporation transacts business in this 5097 state without a certificate of authority or cancels its 5098 certificate of authority, it appoints the Secretary of State as 5099 its agent for service of process in proceedings and actions 5100 arising out of the transaction of business in this state. 5101 Section 86.âSubsections (1) and (3) of section 617.1503, 5102 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 5103 617.1503âApplication for certificate of authority.â 5104 (1)âA foreign corporation may apply for a certificate of 5105 authority to conduct its affairs in this state by delivering an 5106 application to the department of State for filing. Such 5107 application must shall be made on forms prescribed and furnished 5108 by the department of State and must shall set forth: 5109 (a)âThe name of the foreign corporation or, if its name is 5110 unavailable for use in this state, a corporate name that 5111 satisfies the requirements of s. 617.1506; 5112 (b)âThe jurisdiction under the law of which it is 5113 incorporated; 5114 (c)âIts date of incorporation and period of duration; 5115 (d)âThe purpose or purposes which it intends to pursue in 5116 this state and a statement that it is authorized to pursue such 5117 purpose or purposes in the jurisdiction of its incorporation; 5118 (e)âThe street address of its principal office; 5119 (f)âThe address of its registered office in this state and 5120 the name of its registered agent at that office; 5121 (g)âThe names and usual business addresses of its current 5122 directors and officers; and 5123 (h)âSuch additional information as may be necessary or 5124 appropriate in order to enable the department of State to 5125 determine whether such corporation is entitled to file an 5126 application for authority to conduct its affairs in this state 5127 and to determine and assess the fees and taxes payable as 5128 prescribed in this chapter act. 5129 (3)âA foreign corporation may not be denied authority to 5130 conduct its affairs in this state by reason of the fact that the 5131 laws of the jurisdiction under which such corporation is 5132 organized governing its organization and internal affairs differ 5133 from the laws of this state. 5134 Section 87.âSection 617.1504, Florida Statutes, is amended 5135 to read: 5136 617.1504âAmended certificate of authority.â 5137 (1)âA foreign corporation authorized to conduct its affairs 5138 in this state shall make application to the department of State 5139 to obtain an amended certificate of authority if it changes: 5140 (a)âIts corporate name; 5141 (b)âThe period of its duration; 5142 (c)âThe purpose or purposes which it intends to pursue in 5143 this state; or 5144 (d)âThe jurisdiction of its incorporation; or 5145 (e)âThe name and street address in this state of the 5146 foreign corporationâs registered agent in this state, unless the 5147 change was timely made in accordance with s. 617.1508. 5148 (2)âSuch application must shall be made within 90 days 5149 after the occurrence of any change mentioned in subsection (1), 5150 shall be made on forms prescribed by the department, and must 5151 shall be executed and filed in the same manner as an original 5152 application for authority, and must shall set forth: 5153 (a)âThe name of the foreign corporation as it appears on 5154 the departmentâs records; 5155 (b)âThe jurisdiction of its incorporation; 5156 (c)âThe date it was authorized to conduct its affairs in 5157 this state; 5158 (d)âIf the name of the foreign corporation has changed, the 5159 name relinquished, the new name, a statement that the change of 5160 name has been effected under the laws of the jurisdiction of its 5161 incorporation, and the date the change was effected; 5162 (e)âIf the period of duration has changed, a statement of 5163 such change and the date the change was effected; 5164 (f)âIf the jurisdiction of incorporation has changed, a 5165 statement of such change and the date the change was effected; 5166 and 5167 (g)âIf the purposes that the foreign corporation intends to 5168 pursue in this state have changed, a statement of such new 5169 purposes, and a further statement that the foreign corporation 5170 is authorized to pursue such purposes in the jurisdiction of its 5171 incorporation. 5172 (3)âThe requirements of s. 617.1503 for obtaining an 5173 original certificate of authority apply to obtaining an amended 5174 certificate under this section unless the official having 5175 custody of the foreign corporationâs publicly filed records in 5176 its jurisdiction of incorporation did not require an amendment 5177 to effectuate the change on its records. 5178 (4)âSubject to subsection (3), a foreign corporation 5179 authorized to transact business in this state may make an 5180 application to the department to obtain an amended certificate 5181 of authority to add, remove, or change the name, title, 5182 capacity, or address of an officer or director of the foreign 5183 corporation. 5184 Section 88.âSection 617.1505, Florida Statutes, is amended 5185 to read: 5186 617.1505âEffect of certificate of authority.â 5187 (1)âUnless the department determines that an application 5188 for a certificate of authority does not comply with the filing 5189 requirements of this chapter, upon payment of all filing fees, a 5190 certificate of authority authorizes the foreign corporation to 5191 which it is issued to conduct its affairs in this state subject, 5192 however, to the right of the department of State to suspend or 5193 revoke the certificate as provided in this chapter act. 5194 (2)âA foreign corporation with a valid certificate of 5195 authority has the same but no greater rights and has the same 5196 but no greater privileges as, and except as otherwise provided 5197 by this chapter act is subject to the same duties, restrictions, 5198 penalties, and liabilities now or later imposed on, a domestic 5199 corporation of like character. 5200 (3)âThis act does not authorize this state to regulate the 5201 organization or internal affairs of a foreign corporation 5202 authorized to conduct its affairs in this state. 5203 Section 89.âSection 617.1506, Florida Statutes, is amended 5204 to read: 5205 617.1506âCorporate name of foreign corporation.â 5206 (1)âA foreign corporation whose name is unavailable under 5207 or whose name does not otherwise comply with s. 617.0401 must 5208 use an alternate name that complies with s. 617.0401 to transact 5209 business in this state. An alternate name adopted for use in 5210 this state must be cross-referenced to the actual name of the 5211 foreign corporation in the records of the Division of 5212 Corporations, provided that no cross-reference is required if 5213 the alternate name involves no more than adding the suffix 5214 âcorporationâ or âincorporatedâ or the abbreviation âCorp.,â or 5215 âInc.,â or the designation âCorpâ or âIncâ to the name; provided 5216 that the name of a foreign corporation may not contain the word 5217 âcompanyâ or the abbreviation âco.â If the actual name of the 5218 foreign corporation subsequently becomes available in this state 5219 and the foreign corporation elects to operate in this state 5220 under its actual name, or the foreign corporation chooses to 5221 change its alternate name, a record approving the election or 5222 change, as the case may be, by its board of directors or by its 5223 members if such members are entitled to vote on such a record, 5224 and signed as required pursuant to s. 617.01201, must be 5225 delivered to the department for filing may not file an 5226 application for a certificate of authority unless the corporate 5227 name of such corporation satisfies the requirements of s. 5228 617.0401. To obtain or maintain a certificate of authority to 5229 transact business in this state, the foreign corporation: 5230 (a)âMay add the word âcorporationâ or âincorporatedâ or the 5231 abbreviation âcorp.â or âinc.â or words of like import, which 5232 clearly indicate that it is a corporation instead of a natural 5233 person or partnership or other business entity; however, the 5234 name of a foreign corporation may not contain the word âcompanyâ 5235 or the abbreviation âco.â; or 5236 (b)âMay use an alternate name to transact business in this 5237 state if its real name is unavailable. Any alternate corporate 5238 name adopted for use in this state must be cross-referenced to 5239 the real corporate name in the records of the Division of 5240 Corporations. If the real corporate name of the corporation 5241 becomes available in this state or if the corporation chooses to 5242 change its alternate name, a copy of the resolution of its board 5243 of directors, changing or withdrawing the alternate name and 5244 executed as required by s. 617.01201, must be delivered for 5245 filing. 5246 (2)âThe corporate name, including the alternate name, of a 5247 foreign corporation must be distinguishable, within the records 5248 of the Division of Corporations, from: 5249 (a)âAny corporate name of a corporation for profit 5250 incorporated or authorized to transact business in this state. 5251 (b)âThe alternate name of another foreign corporation 5252 authorized to transact business in this state. 5253 (c)âThe corporate name of a nonprofit not-for-profit 5254 corporation incorporated or authorized to transact business in 5255 this state. 5256 (d)âThe names of all other entities or filings, except 5257 fictitious name registrations pursuant to s. 865.09, organized, 5258 or registered under the laws of this state, that are on file 5259 with the Division of Corporations. 5260 (3)âA foreign corporation that adopts an alternate name 5261 under subsection (1) and obtains a certificate of authority with 5262 the alternate name need not comply with s. 865.09 with respect 5263 to the alternate name. 5264 (4)âSo long as a foreign corporation maintains a 5265 certificate of authority with an alternate name, it may transact 5266 business in this state under the alternate name unless the 5267 foreign corporation is authorized under s. 865.09 to transact 5268 business in this state under another name. 5269 (5)âIf a foreign corporation authorized to transact 5270 business in this state changes its corporate name to one that 5271 does not satisfy the requirements of s. 617.0401, such 5272 corporation may not transact business in this state under the 5273 changed name until the corporation adopts a name satisfying the 5274 requirements of s. 617.0401 and obtains an amended certificate 5275 of authority under s. 617.1504. 5276 (6)âNotwithstanding this section, a foreign corporation may 5277 register under a name that is not otherwise distinguishable on 5278 the records of another entity registered with the department if: 5279 (a)âThe other entity consents to the use and submits an 5280 undertaking in a form satisfactory to the Secretary of State to 5281 change its name to a name that is distinguishable upon the 5282 records of the department from the name of the applying 5283 corporation; or 5284 (b)âThe applicant delivers to the department a certified 5285 copy of a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction 5286 establishing the applicantâs right to use the name applied for 5287 in this state. 5288 Section 90.âSubsections (2) and (3) of section 617.1507, 5289 Florida Statutes, are amended, and subsection (4), (5), and (6) 5290 are added to that section, to read: 5291 617.1507âRegistered office and registered agent of foreign 5292 corporation.â 5293 (2)âEach initial A registered agent, and each appointed 5294 pursuant to this section or a successor registered agent 5295 appointed pursuant to s. 617.1508 on whom process may be served 5296 shall each file a statement in writing with the department of 5297 State, in the such form and manner as shall be prescribed by the 5298 department, accepting the appointment as a registered agent 5299 while simultaneously with his or her being designated as the 5300 registered agent. Such statement of acceptance shall state that 5301 the registered agent is familiar with, and accepts, the 5302 obligations of that position. 5303 (3)âThe duties of a registered agent are: 5304 (a)âTo forward to the foreign corporation at the address 5305 most recently supplied to the registered agent by the foreign 5306 corporation, a process, notice, or demand pertaining to the 5307 foreign corporation which is served on or received by the 5308 registered agent; and 5309 (b)âIf the registered agent resigns, to provide the 5310 statement required under s. 617.1509 to the foreign corporation 5311 at the address most recently supplied to the registered agent by 5312 the foreign corporation For purposes of this section, 5313 âauthorized entityâ means: 5314 (a)âA corporation for profit; 5315 (b)âA limited liability company; 5316 (c)âA limited liability partnership; or 5317 (d)âA limited partnership, including a limited liability 5318 limited partnership. 5319 (4)âThe department shall maintain an accurate record of the 5320 registered agents and registered offices for service of process 5321 and promptly furnish any information disclosed thereby upon 5322 request and payment of the required fee. 5323 (5)âA foreign corporation may not prosecute or maintain any 5324 action in a court in this state until the foreign corporation 5325 complies with this section, pays to the department the amounts 5326 required by this chapter, and, to the extent ordered by a court 5327 of competent jurisdiction, pays to the department a penalty of 5328 $5 for each day it has failed to so comply, or $500, whichever 5329 is less. 5330 (6)âA court may stay a proceeding commenced by a foreign 5331 corporation until the corporation complies with this section. 5332 Section 91.âSection 617.1508, Florida Statutes, is amended 5333 to read: 5334 617.1508âChange of registered office and registered agent 5335 of foreign corporation.â 5336 (1)âA foreign corporation authorized to conduct its affairs 5337 in this state may change its registered office or registered 5338 agent by delivering to the department of State for filing a 5339 statement of change that sets forth: 5340 (a)âIts name; 5341 (b)âThe street address of its current registered office; 5342 (c)âIf the current registered office is to be changed, the 5343 street address of its new registered office; 5344 (d)âThe name of its current registered agent; and 5345 (e)âIf the current registered agent is to be changed, the 5346 name of its new registered agent and the new agentâs written 5347 consent described in s. 617.1507(3), (either on the statement or 5348 attached to it,) to the appointment; 5349 (f)âThat, after the change or changes are made, the street 5350 address of its registered office and the business office of its 5351 registered agent will be identical; and 5352 (g)âThat any such change was authorized by resolution duly 5353 adopted by its board of directors or by an officer of the 5354 corporation so authorized by the board of directors. 5355 (2)âA statement of change is effective when filed by the 5356 department. 5357 (3)âIf a registered agent changes the name or street 5358 address of the registered agentâs his or her business office, 5359 they he or she may change the name or street address of the 5360 registered office of any foreign corporation for which they are 5361 he or she is the registered agent by notifying the corporation 5362 in writing of the change and signing, (either manually or in 5363 facsimile,) and delivering to the department of State for filing 5364 a statement of change that complies with the requirements of 5365 paragraphs (1)(a)-(e) (1)(a)-(f) and recites that the 5366 corporation has been notified of the change. 5367 (4)âThe changes described in this section may also be made 5368 on the foreign corporationâs annual report or in an application 5369 for reinstatement filed with the department under s. 617.1422. 5370 Section 92.âSection 617.1509, Florida Statutes, is amended 5371 to read: 5372 617.1509âResignation of registered agent of foreign 5373 corporation.â 5374 (1)âThe registered agent of a foreign corporation may 5375 resign as agent his or her agency appointment by signing and 5376 delivering to the department of State for filing a statement of 5377 resignation and mailing a copy of such statement to the 5378 corporation at the corporationâs principal office address shown 5379 in its most recent annual report or, if none, shown in its 5380 application for a certificate of authority or other most 5381 recently filed document. After delivering the statement of 5382 resignation to the department for filing, the registered agent 5383 must promptly mail a copy to the foreign corporation at its 5384 current mailing address The statement of resignation must state 5385 that a copy of such statement has been mailed to the corporation 5386 at the address so stated. The statement of resignation may 5387 include a statement that the registered office is also 5388 discontinued. 5389 (2)âA registered agent is terminated upon the earlier of: 5390 (a)âThe 31st day after the department files the statement 5391 of resignation; or 5392 (b)âWhen a statement of change or other record designating 5393 a new registered agent is filed with the department The agency 5394 appointment is terminated as of the 31st day after the date on 5395 which the statement was filed and, unless otherwise provided in 5396 the statement, termination of the agency acts as a termination 5397 of the registered office. 5398 (3)âWhen a statement of resignation takes effect, the 5399 registered agent ceases to have responsibility for a matter 5400 thereafter tendered to them as agent for the foreign 5401 corporation. The resignation does not affect contractual rights 5402 that the foreign corporation has against the agent or that the 5403 agent has against the foreign corporation. 5404 (4)âA registered agent may resign from a foreign 5405 corporation regardless of whether the foreign corporation has 5406 active status. 5407 Section 93.âSection 617.15091, Florida Statutes, is created 5408 to read: 5409 617.15091âDelivery of notice or other communication.â 5410 (1)âExcept as otherwise provided in this chapter, 5411 permissible means of delivery of a notice or other communication 5412 includes delivery by hand, the United States Postal Service, a 5413 commercial delivery service, and electronic transmission, all as 5414 more particularly described in s. 617.0141. 5415 (2)âExcept as provided in subsection (3), delivery to the 5416 department is effective only when a notice or other 5417 communication is received by the department. 5418 (3)âIf a check is mailed to the department for payment of 5419 an annual report fee, the check is deemed to have been received 5420 by the department as of the postmark date appearing on the 5421 envelope or package transmitting the check if the envelope or 5422 the package is received by the department. 5423 Section 94.âSection 617.1520, Florida Statutes, is amended 5424 to read: 5425 (Substantial rewording of section. 5426 See s. 617.1520, F.S., for present text.) 5427 617.1520âWithdrawal and cancellation of certificate of 5428 authority for foreign corporation.â 5429 (1)âTo cancel its certificate of authority to conduct 5430 affairs in this state, a foreign corporation must deliver to the 5431 department for filing a notice of withdrawal of certificate of 5432 authority. The certificate of authority is canceled when the 5433 notice of withdrawal becomes effective pursuant to s. 617.0123. 5434 The notice of withdrawal of certificate of authority must be 5435 signed by an officer or a director and state all of the 5436 following: 5437 (a)âThe name of the foreign corporation as it appears on 5438 the records with the department. 5439 (b)âThe name of the foreign corporationâs jurisdiction of 5440 incorporation. 5441 (c)âThe date the foreign corporation was authorized to 5442 conduct affairs in this state. 5443 (d)âThat the foreign corporation is withdrawing its 5444 certificate of authority in this state. 5445 (e)âThat the foreign corporation revokes the authority of 5446 its registered agent to accept service on its behalf and 5447 appoints the Secretary of State as its agent for service of 5448 process based on a cause of action arising during the time it 5449 was authorized to conduct its affairs in this state. 5450 (f)âA mailing address and an e-mail address to which a 5451 party seeking to effectuate service of process may send a copy 5452 of any process served on the Secretary of State under paragraph 5453 (e). 5454 (g)âA commitment to notify the department in the future of 5455 any change in its mailing address or e-mail address. 5456 (2)âAfter the withdrawal of the foreign corporation is 5457 effective, service of process is on the Secretary of State using 5458 the procedures in s. 48.161 for service on the foreign 5459 corporation. 5460 Section 95.âSection 617.1521, Florida Statutes, is created 5461 to read: 5462 617.1521âWithdrawal of certificate of authority deemed on 5463 conversion to domestic filing entity.âA foreign corporation 5464 authorized to conduct affairs in this state that converts to a 5465 domestic corporation or another domestic eligible entity that is 5466 organized, incorporated, registered, or otherwise formed through 5467 the delivery of a record to the department for filing is deemed 5468 to have withdrawn its certificate of authority on the effective 5469 date of the conversion. 5470 Section 96.âSection 617.1522, Florida Statutes, is created 5471 to read: 5472 617.1522âWithdrawal on dissolution, merger, or conversion 5473 to certain non-filing entities.â 5474 (1)âA foreign corporation that is authorized to conduct 5475 affairs in this state that has dissolved and completed winding 5476 up, has merged into a foreign eligible entity that is not 5477 authorized to conduct affairs in this state, or has converted to 5478 a domestic or foreign eligible entity that is not organized, 5479 incorporated, registered, or otherwise formed through the public 5480 filing of a record, must deliver a notice of withdrawal of 5481 certificate of authority to the department for filing in 5482 accordance with s. 617.1520. 5483 (2)âAfter a withdrawal under this section of a foreign 5484 corporation that has converted to another type of entity is 5485 effective, service of process in any action or proceeding based 5486 on a cause of action arising during the time the foreign 5487 corporation was authorized to conduct affairs in this state may 5488 be made pursuant to s. 617.1510. 5489 Section 97.âSection 617.1523, Florida Statutes, is created 5490 to read: 5491 617.1523âAction against foreign corporation by Department 5492 of Legal Affairs.âThe Department of Legal Affairs may maintain 5493 an action to enjoin a foreign corporation from conducting 5494 affairs in this state in violation of this chapter. 5495 Section 98.âSection 617.1530, Florida Statutes, is amended 5496 to read: 5497 617.1530âGrounds for Revocation of certificate of authority 5498 to transact business.â 5499 (1)âA conduct affairs.âThe Department of State may commence 5500 a proceeding under s. 617.1531 to revoke the certificate of 5501 authority of a foreign corporation to transact business 5502 authorized to conduct its affairs in this state may be revoked 5503 by the department if: 5504 (a)(1)âThe foreign corporation does not deliver has failed 5505 to file its annual report to with the department of State by 5 5506 p.m. Eastern Time on the third Friday in September of each 5507 year;. 5508 (b)(2)âThe foreign corporation does not pay a fee or 5509 penalty due to, within the department under time required by 5510 this chapter; act, any fees, taxes, or penalties imposed by this 5511 act or other law. 5512 (c)(3)âThe foreign corporation does not appoint and 5513 maintain is without a registered agent as required by s. 5514 617.1507; or registered office in this state for 30 days or 5515 more. 5516 (4)âThe foreign corporation does not notify the Department 5517 of State under s. 617.1508 or s. 617.1509 that its registered 5518 agent has resigned or that its registered office has been 5519 discontinued within 30 days after the date of such resignation 5520 or discontinuance. 5521 (d)(5)âThe foreign corporation does not deliver for filing 5522 a statement of a change under s. 617.1508 within 30 days after 5523 the change in the name or address of the agent has occurred, 5524 unless, within 30 days after the change occurred, either: 5525 1.âThe registered agent files a statement of change under 5526 s. 617.1508; or 5527 2.âThe change was made in accordance with s. 617.1504(1)(e) 5528 or s. 617.1508(4); 5529 (e)âThe foreign corporation has failed to amend its 5530 certificate of authority to reflect a change in its name on the 5531 records of the department or its jurisdiction of incorporation; 5532 (f)âThe foreign corporationâs period of duration stated in 5533 its articles of incorporation has expired; 5534 (g)âAn incorporator, director, officer, or agent of the 5535 foreign corporation signs signed a document that he or she knew 5536 was false in a any material respect with the intent that the 5537 document be delivered to the department of State for filing;. 5538 (h)(6)âThe department receives a duly authenticated 5539 certificate from the secretary of state or other official having 5540 custody of corporate records in the jurisdiction under the law 5541 of which the foreign corporation is incorporated stating that it 5542 has been dissolved or is no longer active on the officialâs 5543 record; or disappeared as the result of a merger. 5544 (i)(7)âThe foreign corporation has failed to answer 5545 truthfully and fully, within the time prescribed by this chapter 5546 act, interrogatories propounded by the department of State. 5547 (2)âRevocation of a foreign corporationâs certificate of 5548 authority for failure to file an annual report shall occur on 5549 the fourth Friday in September of each year. The department 5550 shall issue a notice in a record of the revocation to the 5551 revoked foreign corporation. Issuance of the notice may be made 5552 by electronic transmission to a foreign corporation that has 5553 provided the department with an e-mail address. 5554 (3)âIf the department determines that one or more grounds 5555 exist under paragraph (1)(b) for revoking a foreign 5556 corporationâs certificate of authority, the department shall 5557 issue a notice in a record to the foreign corporation of the 5558 departmentâs intent to revoke the certificate of authority. 5559 Issuance of the notice may be made by electronic transmission to 5560 a foreign corporation that has provided the department with an 5561 e-mail address. 5562 (4)âIf, within 60 days after the department sends the 5563 notice of intent to revoke in accordance with subsection (3), 5564 and the foreign corporation does not correct each ground for 5565 revocation or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the 5566 department that each ground determined by the department does 5567 not exist, the department shall revoke the foreign corporationâs 5568 authority to transact business in this state and issue a notice 5569 in a record of revocation which states the grounds for 5570 revocation. Issuance of the notice may be made by electronic 5571 transmission to a foreign corporation that has provided the 5572 department with an e-mail address. 5573 (5)âRevocation of a foreign corporationâs certificate of 5574 authority does not terminate the authority of the registered 5575 agent of the corporation. 5576 Section 99.âSection 617.15315, Florida Statutes, is created 5577 to read: 5578 617.15315âReinstatement following revocation.â 5579 (1)âA foreign corporation whose certificate of authority 5580 has been revoked pursuant to s. 617.1530 or former s. 617.1531 5581 may apply to the department for reinstatement at any time after 5582 the effective date of revocation of authority. The foreign 5583 corporation applying for reinstatement must submit all fees and 5584 penalties then owed by the foreign corporation at rates provided 5585 by law at the time the foreign corporation applies for 5586 reinstatement, together with an application for reinstatement 5587 prescribed and furnished by the department, which is signed by 5588 both the registered agent and an officer or director of the 5589 foreign corporation and states: 5590 (a)âThe name under which the foreign corporation is 5591 authorized to conduct affairs in this state. 5592 (b)âThe street address of the foreign corporationâs 5593 principal office and mailing address. 5594 (c)âThe jurisdiction of the foreign corporationâs formation 5595 and the date on which it became qualified to conduct affairs in 5596 this state. 5597 (d)âThe foreign corporationâs federal employer 5598 identification number or, if none, whether one has been applied 5599 for. 5600 (e)âThe name, title or capacity, and address of at least 5601 one officer or director of the foreign corporation. 5602 (f)âAdditional information that is necessary or appropriate 5603 to enable the department to carry out this chapter. 5604 (2)âIn lieu of the requirement to file an application for 5605 reinstatement as described in subsection (1), a foreign 5606 corporation whose certificate of authority has been revoked may 5607 submit all fees and penalties owed by the corporation at the 5608 rates provided by law at the time the corporation applies for 5609 reinstatement, together with a current annual report, signed by 5610 both the registered agent and an officer or director of the 5611 corporation, which contains the information described in 5612 subsection (1). 5613 (3)âIf the department determines that an application for 5614 reinstatement contains the information required under subsection 5615 (1) or subsection (2) and that the information is correct, upon 5616 payment of all required fees and penalties, the department shall 5617 reinstate the foreign corporationâs certificate of authority. 5618 (4)âWhen a reinstatement becomes effective, it relates back 5619 to and takes effect as of the effective date of the revocation 5620 of authority, and the foreign corporation may operate in this 5621 state as if the revocation of authority had never occurred. 5622 (5)âThe name of the foreign corporation whose certificate 5623 of authority has been revoked is not available for assumption or 5624 use by another eligible entity until 1 year after the effective 5625 date of revocation of authority unless the corporation provides 5626 the department with a record signed as required by s. 617.01201, 5627 which authorizes the immediate assumption or use of the name by 5628 another eligible entity. 5629 (6)âIf the name of the foreign corporation applying for 5630 reinstatement has been lawfully assumed in this state by another 5631 eligible entity, the department must require the foreign 5632 corporation to comply with s. 617.1506 before accepting its 5633 application for reinstatement. 5634 Section 100.âSection 617.1532, Florida Statutes, is amended 5635 to read: 5636 (Substantial rewording of section. 5637 See s. 617.1532, F.S., for present text.) 5638 617.1532âJudicial review of denial of reinstatement.â 5639 (1)âIf the department denies a foreign corporationâs 5640 application for reinstatement after revocation of its 5641 certificate of authority, the department shall serve the foreign 5642 corporation pursuant to s. 617.1510 with a written notice that 5643 explains the reasons for the denial. 5644 (2)âWithin 30 days after service of a notice of denial of 5645 reinstatement, a foreign corporation may appeal the departmentâs 5646 denial by petitioning the Circuit Court of Leon County to set 5647 aside the revocation. The petition must be served on the 5648 department and contain a copy of the departmentâs notice of 5649 revocation, the foreign corporationâs application for 5650 reinstatement, and the departmentâs notice of denial. 5651 (3)âThe circuit court may order the department to reinstate 5652 the certificate of authority of the foreign corporation or take 5653 other action the court considers appropriate. 5654 (4)âThe circuit courtâs final decision may be appealed as 5655 in other civil proceedings. 5656 Section 101.âSection 617.1601, Florida Statutes, is amended 5657 to read: 5658 617.1601âCorporate records.â 5659 (1)âA corporation shall maintain the following records: 5660 (a)âIts articles of incorporation, as currently in effect. 5661 (b)âIts bylaws, as currently in effect. 5662 (c)âIf the corporation has members, the minutes of all 5663 membersâ meetings and records of all actions taken by members 5664 without a meeting for the past 3 years. 5665 (d)âThe minutes of all meetings of its board of directors, 5666 a record of all actions taken by the board of directors without 5667 a meeting, and a record of all actions taken by a committee of 5668 the board of directors in place of the board of directors on 5669 behalf of the corporation. 5670 (e)âIf the corporation has members, all written 5671 communications within the past 3 years to members generally or 5672 to members of a class, including the financial statements 5673 furnished for the past 3 years under s. 617.1605. 5674 (f)âA list of the names and business street addresses, or 5675 the home street addresses if there is no business street 5676 address, of its current directors and officers. 5677 (g)âIts most recent annual report delivered to the 5678 department under s. 617.1622 keep as records minutes of all 5679 meetings of its members and board of directors, a record of all 5680 actions taken by the members or board of directors without a 5681 meeting, and a record of all actions taken by a committee of the 5682 board of directors in place of the board of directors on behalf 5683 of the corporation. 5684 (2)âA corporation shall maintain accurate accounting 5685 records in a form that permits preparation of its financial 5686 statements as required by s. 617.1605. 5687 (3)âIf a corporation has members, a corporation or its 5688 agent must shall maintain a record of its members in a form that 5689 permits preparation of a list of the names and addresses, which 5690 may be an e-mail address or other electronic contact 5691 information, of all members in alphabetical order by class of 5692 voting members. This subsection does not require the corporation 5693 to include the e-mail address or other electronic contact 5694 information of a member in such record. 5695 (4)âA corporation shall maintain the its records specified 5696 in this section in a manner that allows them to be made 5697 available for inspection written form or in another form capable 5698 of conversion into written form within a reasonable time. 5699 (5)âA corporation shall keep a copy of the following 5700 records: 5701 (a)âIts articles of incorporation or restated articles of 5702 incorporation and all amendments to them currently in effect. 5703 (b)âIts bylaws or restated bylaws and all amendments to 5704 them currently in effect. 5705 (c)âThe minutes of all membersâ meetings and records of all 5706 action taken by members without a meeting for the past 3 years. 5707 (d)âWritten communications to all members generally or all 5708 members of a class within the past 3 years, including the 5709 financial statements furnished for the past 3 years under s. 5710 617.1605. 5711 (e)âA list of the names and business street, or home if 5712 there is no business street, addresses of its current directors 5713 and officers. 5714 (f)âIts most recent annual report delivered to the 5715 Department of State under s. 617.1622. 5716 Section 102.âSection 617.1602, Florida Statutes, is amended 5717 to read: 5718 617.1602âInspection of records by members.â 5719 (1)âA member of a corporation is entitled to inspect and 5720 copy, during regular business hours at the corporationâs 5721 principal office or at a reasonable location specified by the 5722 corporation, any of the records of the corporation described in 5723 s. 617.1601(1) s. 617.1601(5), excluding minutes of meetings of, 5724 and records of actions taken without a meeting by, the 5725 corporationâs board of directors and any committee of the 5726 corporation, if the member delivers to gives the corporation 5727 written notice of the memberâs his or her demand at least 5 10 5728 business days before the date on which the member he or she 5729 wishes to inspect and copy. 5730 (2)âA member of a corporation is entitled to inspect and 5731 copy, during regular business hours at a reasonable location 5732 specified by the corporation, any of the following records of 5733 the corporation if the member meets the requirements of 5734 subsection (3) and gives the corporation written notice of the 5735 memberâs his or her demand at least 5 10 business days before 5736 the date on which the member he or she wishes to inspect and 5737 copy: 5738 (a)âExcerpts from minutes of any meeting of, or records of 5739 any actions taken without a meeting by, the corporationâs board 5740 of directors and board committees of the corporation maintained 5741 in accordance with s. 617.1601(1)(d);, records of any action of 5742 a committee of the board of directors while acting in place of 5743 the board of directors on behalf of the corporation, minutes of 5744 any meeting of the members, and records of action taken by the 5745 members or board of directors without a meeting, to the extent 5746 not subject to inspection under subsection (1). 5747 (b)âAccounting records of the corporation;. 5748 (c)âThe record of members maintained in accordance with s. 5749 617.1601(3); and. 5750 (d)âAny other books and records. 5751 (3)âA member may inspect and copy the records described in 5752 subsection (2) only if: 5753 (a)âThe memberâs demand is made in good faith and for a 5754 proper purpose; 5755 (b)âThe memberâs demand member describes with reasonable 5756 particularity the memberâs his or her purpose and the records 5757 the member he or she desires to inspect; and 5758 (c)âThe records are directly connected with the memberâs 5759 purpose. 5760 (4)âThe corporation may impose reasonable restrictions on 5761 the disclosure, use, or distribution of, and reasonable 5762 obligations to maintain the confidentiality of, records 5763 described in subsection (2). 5764 (5)âFor any meeting of members for which the record date 5765 for determining members entitled to vote at the meeting is 5766 different than the record date for notice of the meeting, any 5767 person who becomes a member after the record date for notice of 5768 the meeting and is entitled to vote at the meeting is entitled 5769 to obtain from the corporation upon request the notice and any 5770 other information provided by the corporation to members in 5771 connection with the meeting, unless the corporation has made 5772 such information generally available to members by posting it on 5773 its website or by other generally recognized means. Failure of a 5774 corporation to provide such information does not affect the 5775 validity of action taken at the meeting. 5776 (6)âThe right of inspection granted by this section may not 5777 be abolished or limited by a corporationâs articles of 5778 incorporation or bylaws. 5779 (7)(4)âThis section does not affect: 5780 (a)âThe right of a member in litigation with the 5781 corporation to inspect and copy records to the same extent as 5782 any other litigant; or. 5783 (b)âThe power of a court, independently of this chapter, to 5784 compel the production of corporate records for examination and 5785 to impose reasonable restrictions as provided in s. 617.1604(3), 5786 provided that, in the case of production of records described in 5787 subsection (2) at the request of the member, the member has met 5788 the requirements of subsection (3). 5789 (8)(5)âA corporation may deny any demand for inspection 5790 made pursuant to subsection (2) if the demand was made for an 5791 improper purpose, or if the demanding member has within 2 years 5792 preceding the memberâs his or her demand sold or offered for 5793 sale any list of members of the corporation or any other 5794 corporation, has aided or abetted any person in procuring any 5795 list of members for any such purpose, or has improperly used any 5796 information secured through any prior examination of the records 5797 of the corporation or any other corporation. 5798 (9)âA member may not sell or otherwise distribute any 5799 information or records inspected under this section, except to 5800 the extent that such use is for a proper purpose. 5801 (10)âWithout consent of the board of directors, a 5802 membership list or any part thereof may not be obtained or used 5803 by any person for any purpose unrelated to a memberâs interest 5804 as a member. Without limiting the foregoing, without the consent 5805 of the board, a membership list or any part thereof may not be: 5806 (a)âUsed to solicit money or property unless the money or 5807 property will be used solely to solicit the votes of the 5808 members; 5809 (b)âUsed for any commercial purpose; or 5810 (c)âSold to or purchased by any person. 5811 (11)(6)âFor purposes of this section, the term âmemberâ 5812 includes a beneficial owner whose beneficial interest is shares 5813 are held in a voting trust or by a nominee on the individualâs 5814 his or her behalf. 5815 (12)(7)âFor purposes of this section, a âproper purposeâ 5816 means a purpose reasonably related to such personâs interest as 5817 a member. 5818 (13)âThe rights of a member to obtain records under 5819 subsections (1) and (2) apply to the records of subsidiaries of 5820 the corporation. 5821 Section 103.âSection 617.1603, Florida Statutes, is amended 5822 to read: 5823 617.1603âScope of inspection right.â 5824 (1)âA memberâs agent or attorney has the same inspection 5825 and copying rights as the member he or she represents. 5826 (2)âThe corporation may, if deemed reasonable, satisfy the 5827 right of a member to copy records under s. 617.1602 by 5828 furnishing to the member copies by such means as are chosen by 5829 the corporation, including furnishing copies through electronic 5830 delivery The right to copy records under s. 617.1602 includes, 5831 if reasonable, the right to receive copies made by photographic, 5832 xerographic, or other means. 5833 (3)âThe corporation may impose a reasonable charge, 5834 covering the costs of labor and material, for copies of any 5835 documents provided to the member. The charge may not exceed the 5836 estimated cost of production or reproduction of the records. If 5837 the records are kept in other than written form, the corporation 5838 must shall convert such records into written form upon the 5839 request of any person entitled to inspect the same. The 5840 corporation shall bear the reasonable costs of converting any 5841 records described in s. 617.1601(1) s. 617.1601(5). The 5842 requesting member shall bear the costs, including the cost of 5843 compiling the information requested, incurred to convert any 5844 records described in s. 617.1602(2). 5845 (4)âIf requested by a member, the corporation shall comply 5846 with a memberâs demand to inspect the records of members under 5847 s. 617.1602(2)(c) by providing the member him or her with a list 5848 of its members of the nature described in s. 617.1601(3). Such a 5849 list must shall be compiled as of the last record date for which 5850 it has been compiled or as of a subsequent date if specified by 5851 the member. 5852 Section 104.âSection 617.1604, Florida Statutes, is amended 5853 to read: 5854 617.1604âCourt-ordered inspection.â 5855 (1)âIf a corporation does not, within a reasonable time, 5856 allow a member who complies with s. 617.1602 to inspect and copy 5857 any record, and the member complies with any prerequisites to 5858 inspection and copying imposed by this section, the member may 5859 apply to the circuit court in the county where the corporationâs 5860 principal office, or, if none in this state, its registered 5861 office, is located for an order to permit inspection and copying 5862 of the records demanded. The court shall dispose of an 5863 application under this subsection on an expedited summary basis. 5864 (2)âIf the court orders inspection or copying of the 5865 records demanded, it shall also order the corporation and the 5866 custodian of the particular records demanded to pay the memberâs 5867 costs, including reasonable attorney attorneyâs fees, reasonably 5868 incurred to obtain the order and enforce its rights under this 5869 section unless the corporation establishes that the corporation, 5870 or the officer, director, or agent, as the case may be, provides 5871 that it or he or she refused inspection in good faith because it 5872 or he or she had: 5873 (a)âA reasonable basis for doubt about the right of the 5874 member to inspect or copy the records demanded; or 5875 (b)âRequired reasonable restrictions on the disclosure, 5876 use, or distribution of, and reasonable obligations to maintain 5877 the confidentiality of, such records demanded to which the 5878 demanding member had been unwilling to agree. 5879 (3)âIf the court orders inspection or copying of the 5880 records demanded, it may impose reasonable restrictions on their 5881 confidentiality and the use or distribution of the records by 5882 the demanding member. 5883 Section 105.âSection 617.1605, Florida Statutes, is amended 5884 to read: 5885 617.1605âFinancial reports for members.â 5886 (1)âA corporation, upon a memberâs written demand, shall 5887 furnish that member its latest annual financial statements, 5888 which may be consolidated or combined statements of the 5889 corporation and one or more of its subsidiaries or affiliates, 5890 as appropriate, and which include a balance sheet as of the end 5891 of the fiscal year and a statement of operations for that year. 5892 If financial statements are prepared for the corporation on the 5893 basis of generally accepted accounting principles, the annual 5894 financial statements must also be prepared on such basis. 5895 (2)âA corporation must deliver or make available the latest 5896 annual financial statements to such member within 5 business 5897 days after the request if the annual financial statements have 5898 already been prepared and are available. If the annual financial 5899 statements have not been prepared for the fiscal year requested, 5900 the corporation must notify the member within 5 business days 5901 that the annual financial statements have not yet been prepared 5902 and must deliver or make available such annual financial 5903 statements to the member within 60 days after the corporation 5904 receives the request, or within such additional time thereafter 5905 as is reasonably necessary to enable the corporation to prepare 5906 its annual financial statements if, for reasons beyond the 5907 corporationâs control, it is unable to prepare its annual 5908 financial statements within the prescribed period. 5909 (3)âA corporation may fulfill its responsibilities under 5910 this section by delivering the specified annual financial 5911 statements by posting the specified annual financial statements 5912 on its website or by any other generally recognized means. 5913 (4)âNotwithstanding subsections (1), (2), and (3): 5914 (a)âAs a condition to delivering or making available annual 5915 financial statements to any requesting member, the corporation 5916 may require the requesting member to agree to reasonable 5917 restrictions on the confidentiality, use, and distribution of 5918 such annual financial statements; and 5919 (b)âThe corporation may, if it reasonably determines that 5920 the memberâs request is not made in good faith or for a proper 5921 purpose, decline to deliver or make available such annual 5922 financial statements to that member. 5923 (5)âIf a corporation does not respond to a memberâs request 5924 for annual financial statements pursuant to this section within 5925 the applicable period specified in subsection (2), all of the 5926 following apply: 5927 (a)âThe requesting member may apply to the circuit court in 5928 the applicable county for an order requiring delivery of or 5929 access to the requested annual financial statements. The court 5930 shall dispose of an application under this subsection on an 5931 expedited basis. 5932 (b)âIf the court orders delivery or access to the requested 5933 annual financial statements, it may impose reasonable 5934 restrictions on their confidentiality, use, or distribution. 5935 (c)âIn such proceeding, if the corporation has declined to 5936 deliver or make available such annual financial statements 5937 because the member had been unwilling to agree to restrictions 5938 proposed by the corporation on the confidentiality, use, and 5939 distribution of such financial statements, the corporation has 5940 the burden of demonstrating that the restrictions proposed by 5941 the corporation were reasonable. 5942 (d)âIn such a proceeding, if the corporation has declined 5943 to deliver or make available such annual financial statements 5944 pursuant to this section, the corporation has the burden of 5945 demonstrating that it reasonably determined that the memberâs 5946 request was not made in good faith or for a proper purpose. 5947 (6)âIf the court orders delivery or access to the requested 5948 annual financial statements, it shall order the corporation to 5949 pay the memberâs expenses, including reasonable attorney fees, 5950 incurred to obtain such order unless the corporation establishes 5951 that it had refused delivery or access to the requested annual 5952 financial statements because the member had refused to agree to 5953 reasonable restrictions on the confidentiality, use, or 5954 distribution of the annual financial statements or that the 5955 corporation had reasonably determined that the memberâs request 5956 was not made in good faith or for a proper purpose. 5957 Section 106.âSection 617.16051, Florida Statutes, is 5958 created to read: 5959 617.16051âInspection rights of directors.â 5960 (1)âA director of a corporation is entitled to inspect and 5961 copy the books, records, and documents of the corporation at any 5962 reasonable time to the extent reasonably related to the 5963 performance of the directorâs duties as a director, including 5964 duties as a member of a board committee, but not for any other 5965 purpose or in any manner that would violate any duty to the 5966 corporation, attorney-client privilege, or work-product 5967 privilege of the corporation. 5968 (2)âThe circuit court of the applicable county may order 5969 inspection and copying of the books, records, and documents at 5970 the corporationâs expense, upon application of a director who 5971 has been refused such inspection rights, unless the corporation 5972 establishes that the director is not entitled to such inspection 5973 rights. The court shall dispose of an application under this 5974 subsection on an expedited basis. 5975 (3)âIf an order is issued, the court may include provisions 5976 protecting the corporation from undue burden or expense and 5977 prohibiting the director from using information obtained upon 5978 exercise of the inspection rights in a manner that would violate 5979 a duty to the corporation and may also order the corporation to 5980 reimburse the director for the directorâs costs, including 5981 reasonable attorney fees, incurred in connection with the 5982 application. 5983 Section 107.âSection 617.1622, Florida Statutes, is amended 5984 to read: 5985 617.1622âAnnual report for department of State.â 5986 (1)âEach domestic corporation and each foreign corporation 5987 authorized to transact business conduct its affairs in this 5988 state shall deliver to the department of State for filing an a 5989 sworn annual report, on such form as the Department of State 5990 prescribes, that states the following sets forth: 5991 (a)âThe name of the corporation or, if a foreign 5992 corporation, the name under which the foreign corporation is 5993 authorized to transact business in this state and the state or 5994 country under the law of which it is incorporated; 5995 (b)âThe date of its incorporation and or, if a foreign 5996 corporation, the jurisdiction of its incorporation and the date 5997 on which it became qualified to transact business was admitted 5998 to conduct its affairs in this state; 5999 (c)âThe street address of its the principal office and the 6000 mailing address of the corporation; 6001 (d)âThe corporationâs or foreign corporationâs federal 6002 employer identification number, if any, or, if none, whether one 6003 has been applied for; 6004 (e)âThe names and business street addresses of its 6005 directors and principal officers; and 6006 (f)âThe street address of its registered office in this 6007 state and the name of its registered agent at that office; and 6008 (g)âAny such additional information that the department has 6009 identified as may be necessary or appropriate to enable the 6010 department of State to carry out the provisions of this chapter 6011 act. 6012 (2)âIf an annual report contains the name and address of a 6013 registered agent which differs from the information shown in the 6014 records of the department immediately before the annual report 6015 becomes effective, the differing information in the annual 6016 report is considered a statement of change under s. 617.0502 or 6017 s. 617.1508, as the case may be The deposit of such report, on 6018 or before May 1, in the United States mail in a sealed envelope, 6019 properly addressed with postage prepaid, constitutes compliance 6020 with subsection (1). 6021 (3)âIf an annual report does not contain the information 6022 required by this section subsection (1), the department of State 6023 shall promptly notify the reporting domestic corporation or 6024 foreign corporation in writing and return the report to it for 6025 correction. If the report is corrected to contain the 6026 information required by this section subsection (1) and 6027 delivered to the department of State within 30 days after the 6028 effective date of notice, it will is deemed to be considered 6029 timely delivered filed. 6030 (4)âEach annual report must be executed by the corporation 6031 by an officer or director or, if the corporation is in the hands 6032 of a receiver or trustee, must be executed on behalf of the 6033 corporation by such receiver or trustee, and the signing of the 6034 annual report shall have the same legal effect as if made under 6035 oath, without the necessity of appending such oath thereto. 6036 (5)âThe first annual report must be delivered to the department 6037 of State between January 1 and May 1 of the year following the 6038 calendar year in which a domestic corporationâs articles of 6039 incorporation became effective or a foreign corporation obtained 6040 its certificate of authority to transact business in this state 6041 corporation was incorporated or a foreign corporation was 6042 authorized to conduct affairs. Subsequent annual reports must be 6043 delivered to the department of State between January 1 and May 1 6044 of each the subsequent calendar year thereafter. If one or more 6045 forms of annual report are submitted for a calendar year, the 6046 department shall file each of them and make the information 6047 contained in them part of the official record. The first form of 6048 annual report filed in a calendar year shall be considered the 6049 annual report for that calendar year, and each report filed 6050 after that one in the same calendar year shall be treated as an 6051 amended report for that calendar year years. 6052 (5)(6)âInformation in the annual report must be current as 6053 of the date the annual report is delivered to the department for 6054 filing executed on behalf of the corporation. 6055 (7)âIf an additional report is received, the department 6056 shall file the document and make the information contained 6057 therein part of the official record. 6058 (6)(8)âAny domestic corporation or foreign corporation that 6059 fails to file an annual report that which complies with the 6060 requirements of this section may not prosecute or maintain or 6061 defend any action in any court of this state until the such 6062 report is filed and all fees and penalties taxes due under this 6063 chapter act are paid, and such corporation is subject to 6064 dissolution or cancellation of its certificate of authority to 6065 transact business conduct its affairs as provided in this 6066 chapter act. 6067 (7)(9)âThe department shall prescribe the forms, which may 6068 be in an electronic format, on which to make the annual report 6069 called for in this section and may substitute the uniform 6070 business report, pursuant to s. 606.06, as a means of satisfying 6071 the requirement of this chapter section. 6072 (8)âAs a condition of a merger under s. 617.1101, each 6073 party to a merger which exists under the laws of this state, and 6074 each party to a merger which exists under the laws of another 6075 jurisdiction and has a certificate of authority to transact 6076 business or conduct its affairs in this state, must be active 6077 and current in filing its annual reports in the records of the 6078 department through December 31 of the calendar year in which the 6079 articles of merger are submitted to the department for filing. 6080 (9)âAs a condition of a conversion of an entity to a 6081 corporation under s. 617.1804, the entity, if it exists under 6082 the laws of this state or if it exists under the laws of another 6083 jurisdiction and has a certificate of authority to transact 6084 business or conduct its affairs in this state, must be active 6085 and current in filing its annual reports in the records of the 6086 department through December 31 of the calendar year in which the 6087 articles of conversion are submitted to the department for 6088 filing. 6089 (10)âAs a condition of a conversion of a domestic 6090 corporation to another type of entity under s. 617.1804, the 6091 domestic corporation converting to the other type of entity must 6092 be active and current in filing its annual reports in the 6093 records of the department through December 31 of the calendar 6094 year in which the articles of conversion are submitted to the 6095 department for filing. 6096 (11)âAs a condition of domestication of a domestic 6097 corporation into a foreign jurisdiction under s. 617.180301, the 6098 domestic corporation domesticating into a foreign jurisdiction 6099 must be active and current in filing its annual reports in the 6100 records of the department through December 31 of the calendar 6101 year in which the articles of domestication are submitted to the 6102 department for filing. 6103 Section 108.âSection 617.180301, Florida Statutes, is 6104 created to read: 6105 617.180301âDomestication.â 6106 (1)âBy complying with this section and ss. 617.18031 6107 617.18034, as applicable, a foreign corporation may become a 6108 domestic corporation if the domestication is permitted by the 6109 organic law of the foreign corporation. 6110 (2)âBy complying with this section and ss. 617.18031 6111 617.18034, as applicable, a domestic corporation may become a 6112 foreign corporation pursuant to a plan of domestication if the 6113 domestication is permitted by the organic law of the foreign 6114 corporation. 6115 (3)âIn a domestication under subsection (2), the 6116 domesticating corporation must enter into a plan of 6117 domestication. The plan of domestication must include: 6118 (a)âThe name of the domesticating corporation; 6119 (b)âThe name and governing jurisdiction of the domesticated 6120 corporation; 6121 (c)âThe manner and basis of canceling or converting the 6122 eligible interests or other rights of the domesticating 6123 corporation into other eligible interests, other rights, 6124 obligations, rights to acquire eligible interests, cash, other 6125 property, other rights, or any combination of the foregoing of 6126 the domesticated corporation; 6127 (d)âThe proposed organic rules of the domesticated 6128 corporation, which must be in writing; and 6129 (e)âThe other terms and conditions of the domestication. 6130 (4)âIn addition to the requirements of subsection (3), a 6131 plan of domestication may contain any other provision not 6132 prohibited by law. 6133 (5)âThe terms of a plan of domestication may be made 6134 dependent upon facts objectively ascertainable outside the plan 6135 in accordance with s. 617.01201(10). 6136 (6)âIf a protected agreement of a domesticating corporation 6137 in effect immediately before the domestication becomes effective 6138 contains a provision applying to a merger of the corporation and 6139 the agreement does not refer to a domestication of the 6140 corporation, the provision applies to a domestication of the 6141 corporation as if the domestication were a merger until such 6142 time as the provision is first amended after July 1, 2026. 6143 Section 109.âSection 617.18031, Florida Statutes, is 6144 created to read: 6145 617.18031âAction on a plan of domestication.âIn the case of 6146 a domestication of a domestic corporation into a foreign 6147 jurisdiction, the plan of domestication must be adopted in the 6148 following manner: 6149 (1)âExcept as otherwise provided in the articles of 6150 incorporation or bylaws, the plan of domestication must first be 6151 adopted by the board of directors of such domestic corporation. 6152 If the domesticating corporation does not have any members 6153 entitled to vote on the domestication, a plan of domestication 6154 is adopted by the corporation when it has been adopted by the 6155 board of directors pursuant to this section. 6156 (2)âIf the domesticating corporation has members entitled 6157 to vote on the domestication, the plan of domestication must be 6158 approved by such members. In submitting the plan of 6159 domestication to the members for approval, the board of 6160 directors shall recommend that the members approve the plan, 6161 unless the board of directors makes a determination that because 6162 of conflicts of interest or other special circumstances it 6163 should not make such a recommendation, in which case the board 6164 of directors must inform the members of the basis for its so 6165 proceeding without such recommendation. 6166 (3)âThe board of directors may set conditions for approval 6167 of the plan of domestication by the members or the effectiveness 6168 of the plan of domestication. 6169 (4)âIf the plan of domestication is required to be approved 6170 by the members, and if the approval of the members is to be 6171 given at a meeting, the corporation must notify each member 6172 entitled to vote on the domestication of the meeting of members 6173 at which the plan of domestication is to be submitted for 6174 approval. The notice must state that the purpose, or one of the 6175 purposes, of the meeting is to consider the plan of 6176 domestication and must contain or be accompanied by a copy of 6177 the plan. The notice must include or be accompanied by a written 6178 copy of the organic rules of the domesticated corporation as 6179 they will be in effect immediately after the domestication. 6180 (5)âUnless this chapter, the articles of incorporation, the 6181 bylaws, or the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection 6182 (3) require a greater vote or a greater quorum in the respective 6183 case, approval of the plan of domestication requires: 6184 (a)âThe approval of the members entitled to vote on the 6185 domestication at a meeting at which a quorum exists consisting 6186 of a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the plan; and 6187 (b)âIf any class of members is entitled to vote as a 6188 separate group on the plan of domestication, the approval of 6189 each class of members voting as a separate voting group at a 6190 meeting at which a quorum of the voting group exists consisting 6191 of a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the plan by 6192 that voting group. 6193 (6)âThe articles of incorporation may expressly limit or 6194 eliminate the separate voting rights provided in paragraph 6195 (5)(b) as to any class of members, except when the public 6196 organic rules of the foreign corporation resulting from the 6197 domestication include what would be in effect an amendment that 6198 would entitle the class to vote as a separate voting group if it 6199 were a proposed amendment of the articles of incorporation of a 6200 domestic domesticating corporation. 6201 (7)âIf, as a result of a domestication, one or more members 6202 of a domestic domesticating corporation would become subject to 6203 interest holder liability, approval of the plan of domestication 6204 must require the signing in connection with the domestication, 6205 by each such member, of a separate written consent to become 6206 subject to such interest holder liability, unless in the case of 6207 a member that already has interest holder liability with respect 6208 to the domesticating corporation, the terms and conditions of 6209 the interest holder liability with respect to the domesticated 6210 corporation are substantially identical to those of the existing 6211 interest holder liability, other than for changes that eliminate 6212 or reduce such interest holder liability. 6213 (8)âIn addition to the adoption and approval of the plan of 6214 domestication by the board of directors and any members entitled 6215 to vote on the domestication as required by this section, the 6216 plan of domestication must be approved in writing by any person 6217 or group of persons whose approval is required under the 6218 articles of incorporation or bylaws or whose approval is 6219 required to amend the articles of incorporation or bylaws. 6220 Section 110.âSection 617.18032, Florida Statutes, is 6221 created to read: 6222 617.18032âArticles of incorporation; effectiveness.â 6223 (1)âArticles of domestication must be signed by the 6224 domesticating corporation after: 6225 (a)âA plan of domestication of a domestic corporation has 6226 been adopted and approved as required by this chapter; or 6227 (b)âA foreign corporation that is the domesticating 6228 corporation has approved a domestication as required by this 6229 chapter and under the foreign corporationâs organic law. 6230 (2)âArticles of domestication must set forth: 6231 (a)âThe name of the domesticating corporation and its 6232 governing jurisdiction; 6233 (b)âThe name and governing jurisdiction of the domesticated 6234 corporation; and 6235 (c)1.âIf the domesticating corporation is a domestic 6236 corporation, a statement that the plan of domestication was 6237 approved in accordance with this chapter; or 6238 2.âIf the domesticating corporation is a foreign 6239 corporation, a statement that the domestication was approved in 6240 accordance with its organic law. 6241 (3)âIf the domesticated corporation is to be a domestic 6242 corporation, articles of incorporation of the domesticated 6243 corporation that satisfy the requirements of s. 617.0202 must be 6244 attached to the articles of domestication. Provisions that would 6245 not be required to be included in restated articles of 6246 incorporation may be omitted from the articles of incorporation 6247 attached to the articles of domestication. 6248 (4)âThe articles of domestication shall be delivered to the 6249 department for filing and shall take effect on the effective 6250 date determined in accordance with s. 617.0123. 6251 (5)(a)âIf the domesticated corporation is a domestic 6252 corporation, the domestication becomes effective when the 6253 articles of domestication are effective. 6254 (b)âIf the domesticated corporation is a foreign 6255 corporation, the domestication becomes effective on the later of 6256 the date and time provided by the organic law of the 6257 domesticated corporation or when the articles of domestication 6258 are effective. 6259 (6)âIf the domesticating corporation is a foreign 6260 corporation that is qualified to transact business in this state 6261 under ss. 617.1501-617.1532, its certificate of authority is 6262 automatically canceled when the domestication becomes effective. 6263 (7)âA copy of the articles of domestication, certified by 6264 the department, may be filed in the official records of any 6265 county in this state in which the domesticating corporation 6266 holds an interest in real property. 6267 Section 111.âSection 617.18033, Florida Statutes, is 6268 created to read: 6269 617.18033âAmendment of a plan of domestication; 6270 abandonment.â 6271 (1)âExcept as otherwise provided in the plan of 6272 domestication and before the articles of domestication have 6273 taken effect, a plan of domestication of a domestic corporation 6274 adopted under s. 617.180301(3) may be amended: 6275 (a)âIn the same manner as the plan of domestication was 6276 approved, if the plan does not provide for the manner in which 6277 it may be amended; or 6278 (b)âIn the manner provided in the plan of domestication, 6279 except that an interest holder who was entitled to vote on or 6280 consent to approval of the plan is entitled to vote on or 6281 consent to any amendment of the plan which will change: 6282 1.âThe amount or kind of eligible interests or other 6283 rights, obligations, rights to acquire eligible interests, cash, 6284 other property, other rights, or any combination of the 6285 foregoing, to be received by any of the interest holders of the 6286 domesticating corporation under the plan; 6287 2.âThe organic rules of the domesticated corporation that 6288 are to be in writing and that will be in effect immediately 6289 after the domestication becomes effective, except for changes 6290 that do not require approval of the interest holder of the 6291 domesticated corporation under its proposed organic rules as set 6292 forth in the plan of domestication; or 6293 3.âAny of the other terms or conditions of the plan, if the 6294 change would adversely affect the interest holder in any 6295 material respect. 6296 (2)âAfter a plan of domestication has been adopted and 6297 approved by a domestic corporation as required by this chapter, 6298 and before the articles of domestication have become effective, 6299 the plan may be abandoned by the corporation in the same manner 6300 as the plan was approved by the corporation without action by 6301 its interest holders in accordance with any procedures set forth 6302 in the plan or, if no such procedures are set forth in the plan, 6303 in the manner determined by the board of directors of the 6304 domestic corporation. 6305 (3)âIf a domestication is abandoned after the articles of 6306 domestication have been delivered to the department for filing 6307 but before the articles of domestication become effective, a 6308 statement of abandonment signed by the domesticating corporation 6309 must be delivered to the department for filing before the 6310 articles of domestication become effective. The statement shall 6311 take effect upon filing, and the domestication shall be deemed 6312 abandoned and may not become effective. The statement of 6313 abandonment must contain: 6314 (a)âThe name of the domesticating corporation; 6315 (b)âThe date on which the articles of domestication were 6316 filed by the department; and 6317 (c)âA statement that the domestication has been abandoned 6318 in accordance with this section. 6319 Section 112.âSection 617.18034, Florida Statutes, is 6320 created to read: 6321 617.18034âEffect of domestication.â 6322 (1)âWhen a domestication becomes effective: 6323 (a)âAll real property and other property owned by the 6324 domesticating corporation, including any interests therein and 6325 all title thereto, and every contract right and other right 6326 possessed by the domesticating corporation, are the property, 6327 contract rights, and other rights of the domesticated 6328 corporation without transfer, reversion, or impairment; 6329 (b)âAll debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the 6330 domesticating corporation are the debts, obligations, and other 6331 liabilities of the domesticated corporation; 6332 (c)âThe name of the domesticated corporation may be, but 6333 need not be, substituted for the name of the domesticating 6334 corporation in any pending action or proceeding; 6335 (d)âThe organic rules of the domesticated corporation 6336 become effective; 6337 (e)âThe eligible interests or other rights of the 6338 domesticating corporation are cancelled or reclassified into 6339 eligible interests or other rights, obligations, rights to 6340 acquire eligible interests, cash, other property, or any 6341 combination of the foregoing, in accordance with the terms of 6342 the domestication, and the interest holders of the domesticating 6343 corporation are entitled only to the rights provided to them by 6344 those terms; and 6345 (f)âThe domesticated corporation is: 6346 1.âIncorporated under and subject to the organic law of the 6347 domesticated corporation; 6348 2.âThe same corporation, without interruption, as the 6349 domesticating corporation; and 6350 3.âDeemed to have been incorporated on the date the 6351 domesticating corporation was originally incorporated. 6352 (2)âExcept as otherwise provided in the organic law or 6353 organic rules of a domesticating foreign corporation, the 6354 interest holder liability of an interest holder in a foreign 6355 corporation that is domesticated into this state who had 6356 interest holder liability with respect to such domesticating 6357 corporation before the domestication becomes effective must be 6358 as follows: 6359 (a)âThe domestication does not discharge that prior 6360 interest holder liability with respect to any interest holder 6361 liabilities that arose before the domestication becomes 6362 effective. 6363 (b)âThe organic law of the domesticating corporation must 6364 continue to apply to the collection or discharge of any interest 6365 holder liabilities preserved by paragraph (a) as if the 6366 domestication had not occurred. 6367 (c)âThe interest holder shall have such rights of 6368 contribution from other persons as are provided by the organic 6369 law of the domesticating corporation with respect to any 6370 interest holder liabilities preserved by paragraph (a) as if the 6371 domestication had not occurred. 6372 (d)âThe interest holder may not, by reason of such prior 6373 interest holder liability, have interest holder liability with 6374 respect to any interest holder liabilities that are incurred 6375 after the domestication becomes effective. 6376 (3)âAn interest holder who becomes subject to interest 6377 holder liability in respect of the domesticated corporation as a 6378 result of the domestication has such interest holder liability 6379 only with respect to interest holder liabilities that arise 6380 after the domestication becomes effective. 6381 (4)âA domestication does not constitute or cause the 6382 dissolution of the domesticating corporation. 6383 (5)âProperty held in trust or otherwise dedicated to a 6384 charitable purpose and held by a domestic or foreign corporation 6385 immediately before a domestication becomes effective may not, as 6386 a result of the domestication, be diverted from the purposes for 6387 which it was donated, granted, devised, or otherwise transferred 6388 except pursuant to the laws of this state addressing cy pres or 6389 dealing with nondiversion of charitable assets. 6390 (6)âA bequest, devise, gift, grant, or promise contained in 6391 a will or other instrument of donation, subscription, or 6392 conveyance which is made to the domesticating corporation, and 6393 which takes effect or remains payable after the domestication 6394 inures to the domesticated corporation. 6395 (7)âA trust obligation that would govern property if 6396 transferred to the domesticating corporation applies to property 6397 that is to be transferred to the domesticated corporation after 6398 the domestication takes effect. 6399 Section 113.âSection 617.1804, Florida Statutes, is created 6400 to read: 6401 617.1804âConversion.â 6402 (1)âBy complying with this chapter, including being 6403 eligible under s. 617.18041, adopting a plan of conversion in 6404 accordance with s. 617.18042, and complying with s. 617.18043, a 6405 domestic corporation may become: 6406 (a)âA domestic eligible entity, other than a domestic 6407 corporation; or 6408 (b)âIf the conversion is permitted by the organic law of 6409 the foreign eligible entity, a foreign eligible entity. 6410 (2)âBy complying with this section and ss. 617.18042 6411 617.18046, as applicable, and applicable provisions of its 6412 organic law, a domestic eligible entity other than a domestic 6413 corporation may become a domestic corporation. 6414 (3)âBy complying with this section and ss. 617.18042 6415 617.18046, as applicable, and by complying with the applicable 6416 provisions of its organic law, a foreign eligible entity may 6417 become a domestic corporation, but only if the organic law of 6418 the foreign eligible entity permits it to become a nonprofit 6419 corporation in another jurisdiction. 6420 (4)âIf a protected agreement of a domestic converting 6421 corporation in effect immediately before the conversion becomes 6422 effective contains a provision applying to a merger of the 6423 corporation that is a converting corporation and the agreement 6424 does not refer to a conversion of the corporation, the provision 6425 applies to a conversion of the corporation as if the conversion 6426 were a merger, until such time as the provision is first amended 6427 after July 1, 2026. 6428 Section 114.âSection 617.18041, Florida Statutes, is 6429 created to read: 6430 617.18041âLimitation on conversion.âA domestic corporation 6431 that holds property for a charitable purpose is prohibited from 6432 becoming a domestic eligible entity or a foreign eligible 6433 entity, except by domestication to become a foreign corporation. 6434 Section 115.âSection 617.18042, Florida Statutes, is 6435 created to read: 6436 617.18042âPlan of conversion.â 6437 (1)âA domestic corporation may convert to a domestic or 6438 foreign eligible entity under this chapter by approving a plan 6439 of conversion. The plan of conversion must include all of the 6440 following: 6441 (a)âThe name of the domestic converting corporation. 6442 (b)âThe name, governing jurisdiction, and type of entity of 6443 the converted eligible entity. 6444 (c)âThe manner and basis of canceling or converting the 6445 eligible interests or other rights of the domestic corporation; 6446 or the rights to acquire eligible interests, obligations, other 6447 rights, or any combination of the foregoing of the domestic 6448 corporation, into: 6449 1.âShares. 6450 2.âOther securities. 6451 3.âEligible interests. 6452 4.âObligations. 6453 5.âRights to acquire shares, other securities, or eligible 6454 interests. 6455 6.âCash. 6456 7.âOther property. 6457 8.âOther rights. 6458 (d)âThe other terms and conditions of the conversion. 6459 (e)âThe full text, as it will be in effect immediately 6460 after the conversion becomes effective, of the organic rules of 6461 the converted eligible entity, which are to be in writing. 6462 (2)âIn addition to the requirements of subsection (1), a 6463 plan of conversion may contain any other provision not 6464 prohibited by law. 6465 (3)âThe terms of a plan of conversion may be made dependent 6466 upon facts objectively ascertainable outside the plan in 6467 accordance with s. 617.01201(10). 6468 Section 116.âSection 617.18043, Florida Statutes, is 6469 created to read: 6470 617.18043âAction on a plan of conversion.âIn the case of a 6471 conversion of a domestic corporation to a domestic or foreign 6472 eligible entity other than a domestic corporation, the plan of 6473 conversion must be adopted in the following manner: 6474 (1)âExcept as provided in the articles of incorporation or 6475 bylaws, the plan of conversion must first be adopted by the 6476 board of directors of such domestic corporation. If the 6477 converting corporation does not have any members entitled to 6478 vote on the conversion, a plan of conversion is adopted by the 6479 corporation when it has been adopted by the board of directors 6480 pursuant to this section. 6481 (2)(a)âIf the converting corporation has members entitled 6482 to vote on the conversion, the plan of conversion must then be 6483 approved by such members. 6484 (b)âIn submitting the plan of conversion to the members for 6485 approval, the board of directors must recommend that the members 6486 approve the plan of conversion, unless the board of directors 6487 makes a determination that because of conflicts of interest or 6488 other special circumstances it should not make such a 6489 recommendation, in which case the board of directors must inform 6490 the members of the basis for proceeding without such 6491 recommendation. 6492 (3)âThe board of directors may set conditions for approval 6493 of the plan of conversion by the members or the effectiveness of 6494 the plan of conversion. 6495 (4)âIf a plan of conversion is required to be approved by 6496 the members, and if the approval of the members is to be given 6497 at a meeting, the corporation must notify each member entitled 6498 to vote on the conversion of the meeting of members at which the 6499 plan of conversion is to be submitted for approval. The notice 6500 must state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the 6501 meeting is to consider the plan of conversion and must contain 6502 or be accompanied by a copy of the plan. The notice must include 6503 or be accompanied by a written copy of the organic rules of the 6504 converted eligible entity as they will be in effect immediately 6505 after the conversion. 6506 (5)âUnless this chapter, the articles of incorporation, 6507 bylaws, or the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection 6508 (3) require a greater vote or a greater quorum in the respective 6509 case, approval of the plan of conversion requires: 6510 (a)âThe approval of the members entitled to vote on the 6511 conversion at a meeting at which a quorum exists consisting of a 6512 majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the plan; and 6513 (b)âIf any class of members is entitled to vote as a 6514 separate group on the plan of conversion, the approval of each 6515 class of members voting as a separate voting group at a meeting 6516 at which a quorum of the voting group exists consisting of a 6517 majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the plan by that 6518 voting group. 6519 (6)âIf, as a result of the conversion, one or more members 6520 of the converting domestic corporation would become subject to 6521 interest holder liability, approval of the plan of conversion 6522 must require the signing in connection with the conversion, by 6523 each such member, of a separate written consent to become 6524 subject to such interest holder liability, unless in the case of 6525 a member that already has interest holder liability with respect 6526 to the converting corporation, the terms and conditions of the 6527 interest holder liability with respect to the converted entity 6528 are substantially identical to those of the existing interest 6529 holder liability, other than for changes that eliminate or 6530 reduce such interest holder liability. 6531 (7)âIf the converted eligible entity is a partnership or 6532 limited partnership, a member of the converting domestic 6533 corporation may not, as a result of the conversion, become a 6534 general partner of the partnership or limited partnership, 6535 unless such member specifically consents in writing to becoming 6536 a general partner of such partnership or limited partnership, 6537 and, unless such written consent is obtained from each such 6538 member, such conversion may not become effective under s. 6539 617.18044. Any member providing such consent in writing is 6540 deemed to have voted in favor of the plan of conversion pursuant 6541 to which the member became a general partner. 6542 (8)âIn addition to the adoption and approval of the plan of 6543 conversion by the board of directors and any members entitled to 6544 vote on the conversion as required by this section, the plan of 6545 conversion must also be approved in writing by any person or 6546 group of persons whose approval is required under the articles 6547 of incorporation or bylaws or whose approval is required to 6548 amend the articles of incorporation or bylaws. 6549 Section 117.âSection 617.18044, Florida Statutes, is 6550 created to read: 6551 617.18044âArticles of conversion; effectiveness.â 6552 (1)âAfter a plan of conversion of a domestic corporation 6553 has been adopted and approved as required by this chapter, or a 6554 domestic or foreign eligible entity, other than a domestic 6555 corporation, that is the converting eligible entity has approved 6556 a conversion as required by its organic law, articles of 6557 conversion must be signed by the converting eligible entity as 6558 required by s. 617.01201 and must: 6559 (a)âState the name, governing jurisdiction, and type of 6560 entity of the converting eligible entity; 6561 (b)âState the name, governing jurisdiction, and type of 6562 entity of the converted eligible entity; 6563 (c)âIf the converting eligible entity is: 6564 1.âA domestic corporation, state that the plan of 6565 conversion was approved in accordance with this chapter; or 6566 2.âA domestic or foreign eligible entity other than a 6567 domestic corporation, state that the conversion was approved by 6568 the eligible entity in accordance with its organic law; and 6569 (d)âIf the converted eligible entity is: 6570 1.âA domestic corporation or a domestic or foreign eligible 6571 entity that is not a domestic corporation, attach the public 6572 organic record of the converted eligible entity, except that 6573 provisions that would not be required to be included in a 6574 restated public organic record may be omitted; or 6575 2.âA domestic limited liability partnership, attach the 6576 filing or filings required to become a domestic limited 6577 liability partnership. 6578 (2)âIf the converted eligible entity is a domestic 6579 corporation, its articles of incorporation must satisfy the 6580 requirements of s. 617.0202, except that provisions that would 6581 not be required to be included in restated articles of 6582 incorporation may be omitted from the articles of incorporation. 6583 If the converted eligible entity is a domestic eligible entity 6584 that is not a domestic corporation, its public organic record, 6585 if any, must satisfy the applicable requirements of the organic 6586 law of this state, except that the public organic record does 6587 not need to be signed. 6588 (3)âThe articles of conversion must be delivered to the 6589 department for filing and shall take effect on the effective 6590 date determined in accordance with s. 617.0123. 6591 (4)(a)âIf the converted eligible entity is a domestic 6592 eligible entity, the conversion becomes effective when the 6593 articles of conversion are effective. 6594 (b)âIf the converted eligible entity is a foreign eligible 6595 entity, the conversion becomes effective at the later of: 6596 1.âThe date and time provided by the organic law of that 6597 eligible entity; or 6598 2.âWhen the articles of conversion take effect. 6599 (5)âArticles of conversion required to be filed under this 6600 section may be combined with any filing required under the 6601 organic law of a domestic eligible entity that is the converting 6602 eligible entity or the converted eligible entity if the combined 6603 filing satisfies the requirements of both this section and the 6604 other organic law. 6605 (6)âIf the converting eligible entity is a foreign eligible 6606 entity that is authorized to transact business in this state 6607 under a law similar to ss. 617.1501-617.1532, its foreign 6608 qualification is canceled automatically on the effective date of 6609 its conversion. 6610 (7)âA copy of the articles of conversion, certified by the 6611 department, may be filed in the official records of any county 6612 in this state in which the converting eligible entity holds an 6613 interest in real property. 6614 Section 118.âSection 617.18045, Florida Statutes, is 6615 created to read: 6616 617.18045âAmendment to a plan of conversion; abandonment.â 6617 (1)âExcept as otherwise provided in the plan of conversion 6618 and before the articles of conversion have taken effect, a plan 6619 of conversion of a converting eligible entity that is a domestic 6620 corporation may be amended: 6621 (a)âIn the same manner as the plan of conversion was 6622 approved, if the plan does not provide for the manner in which 6623 it may be amended; or 6624 (b)âIn the manner provided in the plan of conversion, 6625 except that an interest holder that was entitled to vote on or 6626 consent to approval of the plan is entitled to vote on or 6627 consent to any amendment of the plan which will change: 6628 1.âThe amount or kind of interests; obligations; rights to 6629 acquire other interests; cash; other property; or any 6630 combination of the foregoing, to be received by any of the 6631 interest holders of the converting corporation under the plan; 6632 2.âThe organic rules of the converted eligible entity which 6633 will be in effect immediately after the conversion becomes 6634 effective, except for changes that do not require approval of 6635 the eligible interest holders of the converted eligible entity 6636 under its organic law or organic rules; or 6637 3.âAny other terms or conditions of the plan, if the change 6638 would adversely affect such interest holders in any material 6639 respect. 6640 (2)âAfter a plan of conversion has been adopted and 6641 approved by a converting eligible entity that is a domestic 6642 corporation in the manner required by this chapter and before 6643 the articles of conversion become effective, the plan may be 6644 abandoned by the domestic corporation without action by its 6645 interest holders in accordance with any procedures set forth in 6646 the plan or, if no such procedures are set forth in the plan, in 6647 the manner determined by the board of directors of the domestic 6648 corporation. 6649 (3)âIf a conversion is abandoned after the articles of 6650 conversion have been delivered to the department for filing but 6651 before the articles of conversion have become effective, a 6652 statement of abandonment signed by the converting eligible 6653 entity must be delivered to the department for filing before the 6654 articles of conversion become effective. The statement takes 6655 effect upon filing, and the conversion is deemed abandoned and 6656 may not become effective. The statement of abandonment must 6657 contain: 6658 (a)âThe name of the converting eligible entity; 6659 (b)âThe date on which the articles of conversion were filed 6660 by the department; and 6661 (c)âA statement that the conversion has been abandoned in 6662 accordance with this section. 6663 Section 119.âSection 617.18046, Florida Statutes, is 6664 created to read: 6665 617.18046âEffect of conversion.â 6666 (1)âWhen a conversion becomes effective: 6667 (a)âAll real property and other property owned by the 6668 converting eligible entity, including any interest therein and 6669 all title thereto, and every contract right and other right 6670 possessed by the converting eligible entity remain the property, 6671 contract rights, and other rights of the converted eligible 6672 entity without transfer, reversion, or impairment; 6673 (b)âAll debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the 6674 converting eligible entity remain the debts, obligations, and 6675 other liabilities of the converted eligible entity; 6676 (c)âThe name of the converted eligible entity may be 6677 substituted for the name of the converting eligible entity in 6678 any pending action or proceeding; 6679 (d)âIf the converted eligible entity is a filing entity, a 6680 domestic corporation, or a domestic or foreign corporation, its 6681 public organic record and its private organic rules become 6682 effective; 6683 (e)âIf the converted eligible entity is a nonfiling entity, 6684 its private organic rules become effective; 6685 (f)âIf the converted eligible entity is a limited liability 6686 partnership, the filing required to become a limited liability 6687 partnership and its private organic rules become effective; 6688 (g)âThe shares; obligations; eligible interests; other 6689 securities; and rights to acquire shares, obligations, eligible 6690 interests, or other securities of the converting eligible entity 6691 are reclassified into shares; obligations; eligible interests; 6692 other securities; and rights to acquire shares, obligations, 6693 eligible interests, or other securities; or eligible interests, 6694 cash; other property; or any combination of the foregoing, in 6695 accordance with the terms of the conversion, and the members or 6696 interest holders of the converting eligible entity are entitled 6697 only to the rights provided to them by those terms or under the 6698 organic law of the converting eligible entity; and 6699 (h)âThe converted eligible entity is: 6700 1.âDeemed to be incorporated or organized under and subject 6701 to the organic law of the converted eligible entity; 6702 2.âDeemed to be the same entity without interruption as the 6703 converting eligible entity; and 6704 3.âDeemed to have been incorporated or otherwise organized 6705 on the date that the converting eligible entity was originally 6706 incorporated or organized. 6707 (2)âExcept as otherwise provided in the articles of 6708 incorporation or bylaws of a domestic corporation or the organic 6709 law or organic rules of a domestic or foreign eligible entity 6710 other than a domestic corporation, a member or eligible interest 6711 holder who becomes subject to interest holder liability in 6712 respect of a domestic corporation or domestic or foreign 6713 eligible entity other than a domestic corporation as a result of 6714 the conversion shall have such interest holder liability only in 6715 respect of interest holder liabilities that arise after the 6716 conversion becomes effective. 6717 (3)âExcept as otherwise provided in the organic law or the 6718 organic rules of the domestic or foreign eligible entity, the 6719 interest holder liability of an interest holder in a converting 6720 eligible entity that converts to a domestic corporation who had 6721 interest holder liability in respect of such converting eligible 6722 entity before the conversion becomes effective is as follows: 6723 (a)âThe conversion does not discharge that prior interest 6724 holder liability with respect to any interest holder liabilities 6725 that arose before the conversion became effective. 6726 (b)âThe organic law of the eligible entity continues to 6727 apply to the collection or discharge of any interest holder 6728 liabilities preserved by paragraph (a), as if the conversion had 6729 not occurred. 6730 (c)âThe eligible interest holder has such rights of 6731 contribution from other persons as are provided by the organic 6732 law of the eligible entity with respect to any interest holder 6733 liabilities preserved by paragraph (a), as if the conversion had 6734 not occurred. 6735 (d)âThe eligible interest holder may not, by reason of such 6736 prior interest holder liability, have interest holder liability 6737 with respect to any interest holder liabilities that arise after 6738 the conversion becomes effective. 6739 (4)âA conversion does not require the converting eligible 6740 entity to wind up its affairs and does not constitute or cause 6741 the dissolution or termination of the entity. 6742 (5)âProperty held for charitable purposes under the laws of 6743 this state by a domestic or foreign eligible entity immediately 6744 before a conversion becomes effective may not, as a result of 6745 the conversion, be diverted from the purposes for which it was 6746 donated, granted, devised, or otherwise transferred except and 6747 to the extent permitted by or pursuant to the laws of this state 6748 addressing cy pres or dealing with nondiversion of charitable 6749 assets. 6750 (6)âAny bequest, devise, gift, grant, or promise contained 6751 in a will or other instrument of donation, subscription, or 6752 conveyance which is made to the converting eligible entity and 6753 which takes effect or remains payable after the conversion 6754 inures to the converted eligible entity. 6755 (7)âA trust obligation that would govern property if 6756 transferred to the converting eligible entity applies to 6757 property that is to be transferred to the converted eligible 6758 entity after the conversion becomes effective. 6759 Section 120.âSection 617.2005, Florida Statutes, is amended 6760 to read: 6761 617.2005âExtinct churches and religious societies; 6762 dissolution.âAny church or religious society in this state which 6763 has ceased or failed to maintain religious worship or service, 6764 or to use its property for religious worship or services 6765 according to the tenets, usages, and customs of a church of the 6766 denomination of which it is a member in this state for the space 6767 of 2 consecutive years, or whose membership has so diminished in 6768 numbers or in financial strength as to render it impossible for 6769 such church or society to maintain religious worship or 6770 services, or to protect its property from exposure to waste and 6771 dilapidation for a period of 2 years, shall be extinct. Upon an 6772 action filed by a member of the church or religious society, the 6773 facts being established to the satisfaction of the circuit court 6774 in and for the county in which such church or society has been 6775 situated, an order of such court may be made dissolving the 6776 church or religious society and the property of such church or 6777 society, or the property which may be held in trust for such 6778 church or society, may by court order be transferred to and the 6779 title and possession thereof vested in the denomination of which 6780 such church or society was a member. A copy of the decree of 6781 dissolution must shall be filed with the department of State. 6782 Section 121.âSection 617.2006, Florida Statutes, is amended 6783 to read: 6784 617.2006âIncorporation of labor unions or bodies.â 6785 (1)âAny group or combination of groups of workers or wage 6786 earners, bearing the name labor, organized labor, federation of 6787 labor, brotherhood of labor, union labor, union labor committee, 6788 trade union, trades union, union labor council, building trades 6789 council, building trades union, allied trades union, central 6790 labor body, central labor union, federated trades council, local 6791 union, state union, national union, international union, 6792 district labor council, district labor union, American 6793 Federation of Labor, Florida Federation of Labor, or any 6794 component parts or significant words of such terms, whether the 6795 same be used in juxtaposition or with interspace, may be 6796 incorporated under this chapter act. 6797 (2)(1)âIn addition to the requirements of ss. 617.02011 and 6798 617.0202, the articles of incorporation for a labor union or 6799 body must shall set forth the necessity for the incorporation, 6800 shall be subscribed to by not less than five persons, and shall 6801 be acknowledged by all of the subscribers, who shall also make 6802 and subscribe to an oath, to be endorsed on the articles of 6803 incorporation, that it is intended in good faith to carry out 6804 the purposes and objects set forth in the articles of 6805 incorporation. The articles of incorporation shall be filed in 6806 the office of the clerk of the circuit court of the county in 6807 which the labor union or body is organized, and the approval of 6808 the judge of the circuit court shall be obtained. 6809 (2)âThe subscribers of the articles of incorporation shall 6810 give notice of their intention to obtain approval thereof by the 6811 circuit judge. Such notice shall state the name of the judge, 6812 the date the articles of incorporation will be presented, and 6813 the general nature and necessity of the articles of 6814 incorporation. Notice shall be published in a newspaper of 6815 general circulation in the county in which the labor union or 6816 body is organized at least once, or posted at the courthouse 6817 door in counties having no newspapers, at least 10 days prior to 6818 the date the articles of incorporation will be presented to the 6819 judge. 6820 (3)âWhen presented to the judge, the articles of 6821 incorporation shall be accompanied by a petition, signed and 6822 sworn to by the subscribers, stating fully the aims and purposes 6823 of such organization and the necessity therefor. 6824 (4)âUpon the filing of the articles of incorporation and 6825 the petition, and the giving of such notice, the circuit judge 6826 to whom such petition may be addressed shall, upon the date 6827 stated in such notice, take testimony and inquire into the 6828 admissions and purposes of such organization and the necessity 6829 therefor, and upon such hearing, if the circuit judge shall be 6830 satisfied that the allegations set forth in the petition and 6831 articles of incorporation have been substantiated, and shall 6832 find that such organization will not be harmful to the community 6833 in which it proposes to operate, or to the state, and that it is 6834 intended in good faith to carry out the purposes and objects set 6835 forth in the articles of incorporation, and that there is a 6836 necessity therefor, the judge shall approve the articles of 6837 incorporation and endorse his or her approval thereon. Upon the 6838 filing of the articles of incorporation with its endorsements 6839 thereupon with the Department of State and payment of the filing 6840 fees specified in s. 617.0122, the subscribers and their 6841 associates and successors shall be a corporation by the name 6842 given. 6843 (5)âAny person may intervene by filing an answer to the 6844 petition stating his or her reasons, if any, and be heard 6845 thereon, why the circuit judge shall not approve the articles of 6846 incorporation. 6847 (6)âThe existence, amendment of the articles of 6848 incorporation, and dissolution of any such corporation shall be 6849 in accordance with this act. 6850 Section 122.âSubsection (7) of section 39.8298, Florida 6851 Statutes, is amended to read: 6852 39.8298âGuardian ad Litem direct-support organization.â 6853 (7)âLIMITS ON DIRECT-SUPPORT ORGANIZATION.âThe direct 6854 support organization shall not exercise any power under s. 6855 617.0302(11) or (15) s. 617.0302(12) or (16). No state employee 6856 shall receive compensation from the direct-support organization 6857 for service on the board of directors or for services rendered 6858 to the direct-support organization. 6859 Section 123.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 6860 381.00316, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 6861 381.00316âDiscrimination by governmental and business 6862 entities based on health care choices; prohibition.â 6863 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 6864 (a)ââBusiness entityâ has the same meaning as in s. 606.03. 6865 The term also includes a charitable organization as defined in 6866 s. 496.404, a nonprofit corporation not for profit as defined in 6867 s. 617.01401, or any other business operating in this state. 6868 Section 124.âSubsection (6) of section 605.1025, Florida 6869 Statutes, is amended to read: 6870 605.1025âArticles of merger.â 6871 (6)âA limited liability company is not required to deliver 6872 articles of merger for filing pursuant to subsection (1) if the 6873 limited liability company is named as a merging entity or 6874 surviving entity in articles of merger or a certificate of 6875 merger filed for the same merger in accordance with s. 607.1105, 6876 s. 617.1108, s. 620.2108(3), or s. 620.8918(3), and if such 6877 articles of merger or certificate of merger substantially comply 6878 with the requirements of this section. In such a case, the other 6879 articles of merger or certificate of merger may also be used for 6880 purposes of subsection (5). 6881 Section 125.âSection 617.0102, Florida Statutes, is amended 6882 to read: 6883 617.0102âReservation of power to amend or repeal.âThe 6884 Legislature has the power to amend or repeal all or part of this 6885 chapter act at any time, and all domestic and foreign 6886 corporations subject to this chapter act shall be governed by 6887 the amendment or repeal. 6888 Section 126.âSection 617.0121, Florida Statutes, is amended 6889 to read: 6890 617.0121âForms.â 6891 (1)âThe department of State may prescribe and furnish on 6892 request forms for: 6893 (a)âAn application for certificate of status, 6894 (b)âA foreign corporationâs application for certificate of 6895 authority to conduct its affairs in the state, 6896 (c)âA foreign corporationâs application for certificate of 6897 withdrawal, and 6898 (d)âThe annual report, for which the department may 6899 prescribe the use of the uniform business report, pursuant to s. 6900 606.06. 6901 6902 If the department of State so requires, the use of these forms 6903 are shall be mandatory. 6904 (2)âThe department of State may prescribe and furnish on 6905 request forms for other documents required or permitted to be 6906 filed by this chapter act, but their use may shall not be 6907 mandatory. 6908 Section 127.âSection 617.0122, Florida Statutes, is amended 6909 to read: 6910 617.0122âFees for filing documents and issuing 6911 certificates.âThe department of State shall collect the 6912 following fees on documents delivered to the department for 6913 filing: 6914 (1)âArticles of incorporation: $35. 6915 (2)âApplication for registered name: $87.50. 6916 (3)âApplication for renewal of registered name: $87.50. 6917 (4)âCorporationâs statement of change of registered agent 6918 or registered office or both if not included on the annual 6919 report: $35. 6920 (5)âDesignation of and acceptance by registered agent: $35. 6921 (6)âAgentâs statement of resignation from a corporation 6922 that has not been dissolved: $87.50. 6923 (7)âAgentâs statement of resignation from a dissolved 6924 corporation or a composite statement of resignation from two or 6925 more dissolved corporations pursuant to s. 617.05021(1)(b) s. 6926 617.0502(2)(b): $35. 6927 (8)âAmendment of articles of incorporation: $35. 6928 (9)âRestatement of articles of incorporation with amendment 6929 of articles: $35. 6930 (10)âArticles of merger for each party thereto: $35. 6931 (11)âArticles of dissolution: $35. 6932 (12)âArticles of revocation of dissolution: $35. 6933 (13)âApplication for reinstatement following administrative 6934 dissolution: $175. 6935 (14)âApplication for certificate of authority to transact 6936 business in this state by a foreign corporation: $35. 6937 (15)âApplication for amended certificate of authority: $35. 6938 (16)âApplication for certificate of withdrawal by a foreign 6939 corporation: $35. 6940 (17)âAnnual report: $61.25. 6941 (18)âArticles of correction: $35. 6942 (19)âApplication for certificate of status: $8.75. 6943 (20)âCertified copy of document: $52.50. 6944 (21)âServing as agent for substitute service of process: 6945 $87.50. 6946 (22)âCertificate of conversion of a limited agricultural 6947 association to a domestic corporation: $35. 6948 (23)âAny other document required or permitted to be filed 6949 by this chapter: $35. 6950 6951 Any citizen support organization that is required by rule of the 6952 Department of Environmental Protection to be formed as a 6953 nonprofit organization and is under contract with the Department 6954 of Environmental Protection department is exempt from any fees 6955 required for incorporation as a nonprofit organization, and the 6956 Secretary of State may not assess any such fees if the citizen 6957 support organization is certified by the Department of 6958 Environmental Protection to the Secretary of State as being 6959 under contract with the Department of Environmental Protection. 6960 Section 128.âSection 617.0125, Florida Statutes, is amended 6961 to read: 6962 617.0125âFiling duties of the department of State.â 6963 (1)âIf a document delivered to the department for filing 6964 satisfies the requirements of s. 617.01201, the department shall 6965 file it. 6966 (2)âThe department files a document by stamping or 6967 otherwise endorsing âfiled,â together with the Secretary of 6968 Stateâs official title and the date and time of receipt. After 6969 filing a document, the department shall send a notice of the 6970 filing to the electronic mail address on file for the domestic 6971 or foreign corporation or its representative or send a copy of 6972 the document to the mailing address of such corporation or its 6973 representative. If the record changes the electronic mail 6974 address of the domestic or foreign corporation, the department 6975 must send such notice to the new electronic mail address and to 6976 the most recent prior electronic mail address. If the record 6977 changes the mailing address of the domestic or foreign 6978 corporation, the department must send such notice to the new 6979 mailing address and to the most recent prior mailing address. 6980 (3)âIf the department refuses to file a document, it shall 6981 return it to the domestic or foreign corporation or its 6982 representative within 15 days after the document was received 6983 for filing, together with a brief, written explanation of the 6984 reason for refusal. 6985 (4)âThe departmentâs duty to file documents under this 6986 section is ministerial. The filing or refusing to file a 6987 document does not: 6988 (a)âAffect the validity or invalidity of the document in 6989 whole or part; 6990 (b)âRelate to the correctness or incorrectness of 6991 information contained in the document; or 6992 (c)âCreate a presumption that the document is valid or 6993 invalid or that information contained in the document is correct 6994 or incorrect. 6995 (5)âIf not otherwise provided by law and the provisions of 6996 this chapter act, the department shall determine, by rule, the 6997 appropriate format for, number of copies of, manner of execution 6998 of, method of electronic transmission of, and amount of and 6999 method of payment of fees for, any document placed under its 7000 jurisdiction. 7001 Section 129.âSection 617.02011, Florida Statutes, is 7002 amended to read: 7003 617.02011âIncorporators.âOne or more persons may act as the 7004 incorporator or incorporators of a corporation by delivering 7005 articles of incorporation to the department of State for filing. 7006 Section 130.âSubsection (2) of section 617.0203, Florida 7007 Statutes, is amended to read: 7008 617.0203âIncorporation.â 7009 (2)âThe departmentâs Department of Stateâs filing of the 7010 articles of incorporation, and the original recorded charter or 7011 certified copy of the charter of a corporation which has not 7012 been reincorporated under s. 617.0901, is conclusive proof that 7013 the incorporators satisfied all conditions precedent to 7014 incorporation and that the corporation has been incorporated 7015 under this chapter act, except in a proceeding by the state to 7016 cancel or revoke the incorporation or involuntarily dissolve the 7017 corporation. 7018 Section 131.âSubsection (2) of section 617.0205, Florida 7019 Statutes, is amended to read: 7020 617.0205âOrganizational meeting of directors.â 7021 (2)âAction required or permitted by this chapter act to be 7022 taken by incorporators or directors at an organizational meeting 7023 may be taken without a meeting if the action taken is evidenced 7024 by one or more written consents describing the action taken and 7025 signed by each incorporator or director. 7026 Section 132.âSection 617.0301, Florida Statutes, is amended 7027 to read: 7028 617.0301âPurposes and application.âCorporations may be 7029 organized under this chapter act for any lawful purpose or 7030 purposes not for pecuniary profit and not specifically 7031 prohibited to corporations under other laws of this state. Such 7032 purposes include, without limitation, charitable, benevolent, 7033 eleemosynary, educational, historical, civic, patriotic, 7034 political, religious, social, fraternal, literary, cultural, 7035 athletic, scientific, agricultural, horticultural, animal 7036 husbandry, and professional, commercial, industrial, or trade 7037 association purposes. If special provisions are made, by law, 7038 for the organization of designated classes of nonprofit 7039 corporations not for profit, such corporations must shall be 7040 formed under such provisions and not under this chapter act. 7041 Section 133.âSubsection (2) of section 617.0504, Florida 7042 Statutes, is amended to read: 7043 617.0504âServing process, giving notice, or making a demand 7044 on a corporation.â 7045 (2)âAny notice to or demand on a corporation made pursuant 7046 to this chapter act may be made to the chair of the board, the 7047 president, any vice president, the secretary, the treasurer, the 7048 registered agent of the corporation at the registered office of 7049 the corporation in this state, or any address in this state that 7050 is in fact the principal office of the corporation in this 7051 state. 7052 Section 134.âSection 617.0806, Florida Statutes, is amended 7053 to read: 7054 617.0806âStaggered terms for directors.âThe articles of 7055 incorporation or bylaws may provide that directors be divided 7056 into classes. Each director shall hold office for the term to 7057 which such director he or she is elected or appointed and until 7058 such directorâs his or her successor has been elected or 7059 appointed and qualified or until such directorâs his or her 7060 earlier resignation, removal from office, or death. 7061 Section 135.âSubsection (4) of section 617.0824, Florida 7062 Statutes, is amended to read: 7063 617.0824âQuorum and voting.â 7064 (4)âA director of a corporation who is present at a meeting 7065 of the board of directors or a committee of the board of 7066 directors when corporate action is taken is deemed to have 7067 assented to the action taken unless: 7068 (a)âThe director objects, at the beginning of the meeting 7069 or promptly upon such directorâs his or her arrival, to holding 7070 the meeting or transacting specified affairs at the meeting; or 7071 (b)âThe director votes against or abstains from the action 7072 taken. 7073 Section 136.âSubsections (3), (4), and (7) of section 7074 617.0825, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 7075 617.0825âBoard committees and advisory committees.â 7076 (3)âTo the extent provided by the board of directors in a 7077 resolution or in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws of 7078 the corporation, each such committee has shall have and may 7079 exercise powers and authority of the board of directors, except 7080 that no such committee does not shall have the power or 7081 authority to: 7082 (a)âApprove or recommend to members actions or proposals 7083 required by this chapter act to be approved by members. 7084 (b)âFill vacancies on the board of directors or any 7085 committee thereof. 7086 (c)âAdopt, amend, or repeal the bylaws. 7087 (4)âUnless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws 7088 provide otherwise, ss. 617.0820, 617.0823, and 617.0824 ss. 7089 617.0820, 617.0822, 617.0823, and 617.0824, which govern 7090 meetings, notice and waiver of notice, and quorum and voting 7091 requirements of the board of directors, apply to committees and 7092 their members as well. 7093 (7)âNeither The designation of any such committee, the 7094 delegation thereto of authority, or nor action by such committee 7095 pursuant to such authority does not shall alone constitute 7096 compliance by any member of the board of directors not a member 7097 of the committee in question with such memberâs his or her 7098 responsibility to act in good faith, in a manner such member he 7099 or she reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the 7100 corporation, and with such care as an ordinarily prudent person 7101 in a like position would use under similar circumstances. 7102 Section 137.âSection 617.0831, Florida Statutes, is amended 7103 to read: 7104 617.0831âIndemnification and liability of officers, 7105 directors, employees, and agents.â Sections Except as provided 7106 in s. 617.0834, s. 607.0831 and ss. 607.0850-607.0859 apply to a 7107 corporation organized under this chapter act and a rural 7108 electric cooperative organized under chapter 425. Any reference 7109 to âdirectorsâ in those sections includes the directors, 7110 managers, or trustees of a corporation organized under this 7111 chapter act or of a rural electric cooperative organized under 7112 chapter 425. However, the term âdirectorâ as used in s. 607.0831 7113 and ss. 607.0850-607.0859 does not include a director appointed 7114 by the developer to the board of directors of a condominium 7115 association under chapter 718, a cooperative association under 7116 chapter 719, a homeownersâ association defined in s. 720.301, or 7117 a timeshare managing entity under chapter 721. Any reference to 7118 âshareholdersâ in those sections includes members of a 7119 corporation organized under this chapter act and members of a 7120 rural electric cooperative organized under chapter 425. 7121 Section 138.âSection 617.0901, Florida Statutes, is amended 7122 to read: 7123 617.0901âReincorporation.â 7124 (1)âAny corporation which has a charter approved by a 7125 circuit judge under former chapter 617, Florida Statutes (1989), 7126 or a charter granted by the Legislature of this state, on or 7127 prior to September 1, 1959, the effective date of chapter 59 7128 427, Laws of Florida, may reincorporate under this chapter act 7129 by filing with the department of State a copy of its charter and 7130 all amendments thereto, certified by the clerk of the circuit 7131 court of the county wherein recorded, as to charters and 7132 amendments granted by circuit judges, and by the department of 7133 State, as to legislative charters, together with a certificate 7134 containing the provisions required in original articles of 7135 incorporation by s. 617.0202, and accepting the provisions of 7136 this chapter act. 7137 (2)âA certificate of reincorporation must be executed in 7138 accordance with s. 617.01201, and it must show that its issuance 7139 was duly authorized by a meeting of its members regularly 7140 called, or if there are no members entitled to vote on 7141 reincorporation, by a meeting of its board of directors. Upon 7142 the filing of a certificate of reincorporation in accordance 7143 with s. 617.01201, the corporation is shall be deemed to be 7144 incorporated under this chapter act and the certificate 7145 constitutes shall constitute its articles of incorporation. 7146 (3)âThe corporation shall then be entitled to and be 7147 possessed of all the privileges, franchises, and powers as if 7148 originally incorporated under this chapter act, and all the 7149 properties, rights, and privileges belonging to the corporation 7150 before prior to reincorporation, which were acquired by gift, 7151 grant, conveyance, assignment, or otherwise are hereby ratified, 7152 approved, confirmed, and assured to the corporation with like 7153 effect and to all intents and purposes as if they had been 7154 originally acquired pursuant to incorporation under this chapter 7155 act. However, any corporation reincorporating under this chapter 7156 is act shall be subject to all the contracts, duties, and 7157 obligations resting upon the corporation before prior to 7158 reincorporation or to which the corporation is shall then be in 7159 any way liable. 7160 Section 139.âSubsection (2) of section 617.1008, Florida 7161 Statutes, is amended to read: 7162 617.1008âAmendment pursuant to reorganization.â 7163 (2)âThe individual or individuals designated by the court 7164 shall deliver to the department of State for filing articles of 7165 amendment setting forth: 7166 (a)âThe name of the corporation; 7167 (b)âThe text of each amendment approved by the court; 7168 (c)âThe date of the courtâs order or decree approving the 7169 articles of amendment; 7170 (d)âThe title of the reorganization proceeding in which the 7171 order or decree was entered; and 7172 (e)âA statement that the court had jurisdiction of the 7173 proceeding under federal or state law. 7174 Section 140.âSection 617.1009, Florida Statutes, is amended 7175 to read: 7176 617.1009âEffect of amendment.âAn amendment to articles of 7177 incorporation does not affect a cause of action existing against 7178 or in favor of the corporation, a proceeding to which the 7179 corporation is a party, or the existing rights of persons other 7180 than members of the corporation. An amendment changing a 7181 corporationâs name does not affect abate a proceeding brought by 7182 or against the corporation in its former name. 7183 Section 141.âSubsection (3) of section 617.1404, Florida 7184 Statutes, is amended to read: 7185 617.1404âRevocation of dissolution.â 7186 (3)âAfter the revocation of dissolution is authorized, the 7187 corporation may revoke the dissolution by delivering to the 7188 department of State for filing articles of revocation of 7189 dissolution, together with a copy of its articles of 7190 dissolution, that set forth: 7191 (a)âThe name of the corporation; 7192 (b)âThe effective date of the dissolution that was revoked; 7193 (c)âThe date that the revocation of dissolution was 7194 authorized; 7195 (d)âIf the corporationâs board of directors revoked a 7196 dissolution authorized by the members, a statement that 7197 revocation was permitted by action by the board of directors 7198 alone pursuant to that authorization; and 7199 (e)âIf member action was required to revoke the 7200 dissolution, the information required by s. 617.1403(1)(b) or 7201 (c), whichever is applicable. 7202 Section 142.âSubsection (1) of section 617.1422, Florida 7203 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (4) of that section is 7204 reenacted, to read: 7205 617.1422âReinstatement following administrative 7206 dissolution.â 7207 (1)âA corporation administratively dissolved under s. 7208 617.1421 may apply to the department for reinstatement at any 7209 time after the effective date of dissolution. The corporation 7210 must submit a reinstatement form prescribed and furnished by the 7211 department or a current uniform business annual report signed by 7212 a registered agent and an officer or director and submit all 7213 fees owed by the corporation and computed at the rate provided 7214 by law at the time the corporation applies for reinstatement. 7215 (4)âThe name of the dissolved corporation is not available 7216 for assumption or use by another corporation until 1 year after 7217 the effective date of dissolution unless the dissolved 7218 corporation provides the department with an affidavit executed 7219 pursuant to s. 617.01201 authorizing the immediate assumption or 7220 use of the name by another corporation. 7221 Section 143.âSubsections (2) and (3) of section 617.1423, 7222 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 7223 617.1423âAppeal from denial of reinstatement.â 7224 (2)âAfter exhaustion of administrative remedies, the 7225 corporation may appeal the denial of reinstatement to the 7226 appropriate court as provided in s. 120.68 within 30 days after 7227 service of the notice of denial is perfected. The corporation 7228 appeals by petitioning the court to set aside the dissolution 7229 and attaching to the petition copies of the departmentâs 7230 department of Stateâs certificate of dissolution, the 7231 corporationâs application for reinstatement, and the 7232 departmentâs notice of denial. 7233 (3)âThe court may summarily order the department of State 7234 to reinstate the dissolved corporation or may take other action 7235 the court considers appropriate. 7236 Section 144.âSubsection (1) of section 617.1501, Florida 7237 Statutes, is amended to read: 7238 617.1501âAuthority of foreign corporation to conduct 7239 affairs required.â 7240 (1)âA foreign corporation may not conduct its affairs in 7241 this state until it obtains a certificate of authority from the 7242 department of State. 7243 Section 145.âSubsection (2) of section 617.1510, Florida 7244 Statutes, is amended to read: 7245 617.1510âServing process, giving notice, or making a demand 7246 on a foreign corporation.â 7247 (2)âAny notice to or demand on a foreign corporation made 7248 pursuant to this chapter act may be made in accordance with the 7249 procedures for notice to or demand on domestic corporations 7250 under s. 617.0504. 7251 Section 146.âSection 617.1606, Florida Statutes, is amended 7252 to read: 7253 617.1606âAccess to records.âSections 617.1601-617.16051 7254 617.1601-617.1605 do not apply to a corporation that is an 7255 association, as defined in s. 720.301, or a corporation 7256 regulated under chapter 718 or chapter 719. 7257 Section 147.âParagraphs (a), (b), (d), and (e) of 7258 subsection (1) of section 617.1623, Florida Statutes, are 7259 amended, to read: 7260 617.1623âCorporate information available to the public; 7261 application to corporations incorporated by circuit courts and 7262 by special act of the Legislature.â 7263 (1)(a)âEach corporation incorporated in this state shall 7264 maintain a registered agent and registered office in accordance 7265 with s. 617.0501, and current information regarding the 7266 corporations incorporated in this state must shall be readily 7267 available to the public. At a minimum, such information must 7268 include the text of the charter or articles of incorporation and 7269 all amendments thereto, the name of the corporation, the date of 7270 incorporation, the street address of the principal office of the 7271 corporation, the corporationâs federal employer identification 7272 number, the name and business street address of each officer, 7273 the name and business street address of each director, the name 7274 of its registered agent, and the street address of its 7275 registered office. 7276 (b)âAny corporation which has a charter approved by a 7277 circuit judge under former chapter 617, Florida Statutes 1989, 7278 or a charter granted by the Legislature on or before September 7279 1, 1959, the effective date of chapter 59-427, Laws of Florida, 7280 must file with the department of State, not later than July 1, 7281 1992, a copy of its charter and all amendments thereto, 7282 certified by the clerk of the circuit court of the county 7283 wherein recorded, together with a registration containing the 7284 provisions required in paragraph (a), as to charters and 7285 amendments granted by circuit judges, and by the department of 7286 State, as to legislative charters, and the corporation 7287 thereafter is shall be subject to the requirements of ss. 7288 617.0501 and 617.1622. 7289 (d)âAny corporation dissolved pursuant to paragraph (c) 7290 shall be reinstated upon application to the department of State, 7291 signed by an officer or director thereof, accompanied by a copy 7292 of its charter and all amendments thereto, certified by the 7293 clerk of the circuit court of the county wherein recorded, as to 7294 charters and amendments granted by circuit judges, and by the 7295 department of State, as to legislative charters, together with a 7296 registration containing the provisions required in paragraph 7297 (a), and the payment of all fees due from the time of 7298 dissolution computed at the rate provided by law at the time the 7299 corporation applies for reinstatement. 7300 (e)âWhenever the application for reinstatement is approved 7301 and filed by the department of State, the corporate existence is 7302 shall be deemed to have continued without interruption from the 7303 date of dissolution. The reinstatement terminates any personal 7304 liability of the directors, officers, or agents of the 7305 corporation incurred on account of actions taken during the 7306 period between dissolution and reinstatement. Upon 7307 reinstatement, the corporation is shall be subject to the 7308 requirements of ss. 617.0501 and 617.1622. 7309 Section 148.âSection 617.1701, Florida Statutes, is amended 7310 to read: 7311 617.1701âApplication to existing domestic corporation.âThis 7312 chapter act applies to all domestic corporations in existence on 7313 July 1, 1991, that were incorporated under any general statute 7314 of this state providing for incorporation of nonprofit 7315 corporations not for profit if power to amend or repeal the 7316 statute under which the corporation was incorporated was 7317 reserved. 7318 Section 149.âSection 617.1702, Florida Statutes, is amended 7319 to read: 7320 617.1702âApplication to qualified foreign corporations.âA 7321 foreign corporation authorized to conduct its affairs in this 7322 state on July 1, 1991, is subject to this chapter act but is not 7323 required to obtain a new certificate of authority to conduct its 7324 affairs under this chapter act. 7325 Section 150.âSubsection (2) of section 617.1703, Florida 7326 Statutes, is amended to read: 7327 617.1703âApplication of chapter.â 7328 (2)âSections The provisions of ss. 617.0605-617.0608 do not 7329 apply to corporations regulated by any of the foregoing chapters 7330 or to any other corporation where membership in the corporation 7331 is required pursuant to a document recorded in the countyâs 7332 official county property records. 7333 Section 151.âSection 617.1711, Florida Statutes, is amended 7334 to read: 7335 617.1711âApplication to foreign and interstate commerce. 7336 The provisions of This chapter applies act apply to commerce 7337 with foreign nations and among the several states only insofar 7338 as such commerce may be permitted under the Constitution and 7339 laws of the United States. 7340 Section 152.âSection 617.1808, Florida Statutes, is amended 7341 to read: 7342 617.1808âApplication of chapter act to corporation 7343 converted to nonprofit corporation not for profit.âAll the 7344 provisions of This chapter act relating to corporations not for 7345 profit, except insofar as they are inconsistent with ss. 7346 617.1804-617.18046, applies ss. 617.1805, 617.1806, and 7347 617.1807, shall be applicable to any for profit corporation 7348 whose character has been changed under ss. 617.1804-617.18046 7349 ss. 617.1805, 617.1806, and 617.1807 and shall henceforth govern 7350 such corporation. 7351 Section 153.âSection 617.1809, Florida Statutes, is amended 7352 to read: 7353 617.1809âLimited agricultural association; conversion to a 7354 domestic corporation not for profit.â 7355 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âlimited agricultural 7356 associationâ or âassociationâ means a limited agricultural 7357 association formed under ss. 604.09-604.14. 7358 (2)âA limited agricultural association may convert to a 7359 domestic corporation not for profit by filing the following 7360 documents with the department in accordance with s. 617.01201: 7361 (a)âA certificate of conversion, which must be executed by 7362 a person authorized in s. 617.01201(6) and such other persons 7363 that may be required in the associationâs articles of 7364 association or bylaws. 7365 (b)âArticles of incorporation, which must comply with s. 7366 617.0202 and be executed by a person authorized in s. 7367 617.01201(6). 7368 (3)âThe certificate of conversion must include: 7369 (a)âThe date upon which the association was initially 7370 formed under ss. 604.09-604.14. 7371 (b)âThe name of the association immediately before filing 7372 the certificate of conversion. 7373 (c)âThe name of the domestic corporation as set forth in 7374 its articles of incorporation. 7375 (d)âThe effective date of the conversion. If the conversion 7376 does not take effect upon filing the certificate of conversion 7377 and articles of incorporation, the delayed effective date for 7378 the conversion, subject to the limitation in s. 617.0123(1) s. 7379 617.0123(2), must be a date certain and the same as the 7380 effective date of the articles of incorporation. 7381 (4)âWhen the certificate of conversion and articles of 7382 incorporation are filed with the department, or upon the delayed 7383 effective date, the association is converted to the domestic 7384 corporation, and the corporation becomes subject to this 7385 chapter. However, notwithstanding s. 617.0123, the existence of 7386 the corporation is deemed to have commenced when the association 7387 was initially formed under ss. 604.09-604.14. 7388 (5)âConversion of a limited agricultural association to a 7389 domestic corporation does not affect any obligation or liability 7390 of the association that was incurred before the conversion. 7391 (6)âWhen a conversion takes effect under this section, all 7392 rights, privileges, and powers of the converting association, 7393 all property, real, personal, and mixed, and all debts due to 7394 the association, as well as all other assets and causes of 7395 action belonging to the association, are vested in the domestic 7396 corporation to which the association is converted and are the 7397 property of the corporation as they were of the association. The 7398 title to any real property that is vested by deed or otherwise 7399 in the converting association does not revert and is not 7400 impaired by the operation of this chapter, but all rights of 7401 creditors and all liens upon any property of the association are 7402 preserved unimpaired, and all debts, liabilities, and duties of 7403 the association attach to the domestic corporation and are 7404 enforceable against it to the same extent as if the debts, 7405 liabilities, and duties had been incurred or contracted by the 7406 corporation. 7407 (7)âThe limited agricultural association is not required to 7408 wind up its affairs or pay its liabilities and distribute its 7409 assets. Conversion does not constitute a dissolution of the 7410 association but is a continuation of the associationâs existence 7411 in the form of the domestic corporation. 7412 (8)âBefore a limited agricultural association may file a 7413 certificate of conversion with the department, unless otherwise 7414 specified in the associationâs articles of association or 7415 bylaws, the conversion must be approved by a majority vote of 7416 the associationâs members, and the articles of incorporation 7417 must be approved by the same authorization required for approval 7418 of the conversion. As part of the approval, the converting 7419 association may provide a plan or other record of conversion 7420 which describes the manner and basis of converting the 7421 membership interests in the association into membership 7422 interests in the domestic corporation. The plan or other record 7423 may also contain other provisions relating to the conversion, 7424 including, but not limited to, the right of the converting 7425 association to abandon the proposed conversion or an effective 7426 date for the conversion that is consistent with paragraph 7427 (3)(d). 7428 Section 154.âSection 617.1904, Florida Statutes, is amended 7429 to read: 7430 617.1904âEstoppel.âA No body of persons acting as a 7431 corporation may not shall be permitted to set up the lack of 7432 legal organization as a defense to an action against them as a 7433 corporation, nor may shall any person sued on a contract made 7434 with the corporation or sued for an injury to its property or a 7435 wrong done to its interests be permitted to set up the lack of 7436 such legal organization in such personâs his or her defense. 7437 Section 155.âSubsection (2) of section 617.1907, Florida 7438 Statutes, is amended to read: 7439 617.1907âEffect of repeal or amendment of prior acts.â 7440 (2)âIf a penalty or punishment imposed for violation of a 7441 statute repealed or amended by this chapter is reduced by this 7442 chapter act, the penalty or punishment if not already imposed 7443 shall be imposed in accordance with this chapter. 7444 Section 156.âSection 617.1908, Florida Statutes, is amended 7445 to read: 7446 617.1908âApplicability of Florida Business Corporation 7447 Act.âExcept as made applicable by specific reference in any 7448 other section of this chapter, part I of chapter 607, the 7449 Florida Business Corporation Act, does not apply to any 7450 nonprofit corporations not for profit. 7451 Section 157.âSection 617.2001, Florida Statutes, is amended 7452 to read: 7453 617.2001âCorporations which may be incorporated hereunder; 7454 incorporation of certain medical services corporations.â 7455 (1)âCorporations may be organized and incorporated under 7456 this chapter act for any one or more lawful purposes not for 7457 pecuniary profit. However, nonprofit corporations not for profit 7458 which may be incorporated under any other law of this state 7459 governing particular types of corporations may not be 7460 incorporated under this chapter act. 7461 (2)âA nonprofit corporation not for profit organized before 7462 prior to December 1, 1987, pursuant to the provisions of chapter 7463 85-56, Laws of Florida, or to the provisions of s. 2, chapter 7464 87-296, Laws of Florida, may conduct the practice of medicine, 7465 conduct programs of medical education, and carry on major 7466 medical research efforts. 7467 Section 158.âSection 617.2002, Florida Statutes, is amended 7468 to read: 7469 617.2002âNonprofit corporation not for profit organized 7470 pursuant to s. 2, ch. 87-296; requirements.âA nonprofit 7471 corporation not for profit organized pursuant to the provisions 7472 of s. 2, chapter 87-296, Laws of Florida, must meet the 7473 following requirements: 7474 (1)âAt least 25 percent of its physicians must have a full 7475 time contract for the provision of medical services with the 7476 corporation, be currently certified as specialists by the 7477 appropriate American specialty boards accredited by the Council 7478 on Medical Education of the American Medical Association, and 7479 have clinical privileges at one or more hospitals in this state. 7480 (2)âA hospital owned by a corporation organized pursuant to 7481 s. 2, chapter 87-296, Laws of Florida, must provide Medicaid and 7482 charity care. 7483 Section 159.âSection 617.2003, Florida Statutes, is amended 7484 to read: 7485 617.2003âProceedings to revoke articles of incorporation or 7486 charter or prevent its use.âIf any member or citizen complains 7487 to the Department of Legal Affairs that any corporation 7488 organized under this chapter act was organized or is being used 7489 as a cover to evade any of the laws against crime, or for 7490 purposes inconsistent with those stated in its articles of 7491 incorporation or charter, or that an officer or director of a 7492 corporation has participated in a sale or transaction that is 7493 affected by a conflict of interest or from which the officer or 7494 director he or she derived an improper personal benefit, either 7495 directly or indirectly, and submits shall submit prima facie 7496 evidence to sustain such charge, together with sufficient money 7497 to cover court costs and expenses, the department shall 7498 institute and in due course prosecute to final judgment such 7499 legal or equitable proceedings as may be considered advisable 7500 either to revoke the articles of incorporation or charter, to 7501 prevent its improper use, or to recover on behalf of the 7502 corporation or its unknown beneficiaries any profits improperly 7503 received by the corporation or its officers or directors. 7504 Section 160.âSection 617.2007, Florida Statutes, is amended 7505 to read: 7506 617.2007âSponge packing and marketing corporations.âPersons 7507 engaged in the business of buying, selling, packing, and 7508 marketing commercial sponges may incorporate under this chapter 7509 act to aid in facilitating the orderly cooperative buying, 7510 selling, packing, and marketing of commercial sponges. Such 7511 association is not a combination in restraint of trade or an 7512 illegal monopoly or an attempt to lessen competition or fix 7513 prices arbitrarily, and any marketing contract or agreement by 7514 the corporation and its members, or the exercise of any power 7515 granted by this chapter act is not illegal or in restraint of 7516 trade. 7517 Section 161.âSection 617.2101, Florida Statutes, is amended 7518 to read: 7519 617.2101âCorporation authorized to act as trustee.âAny 7520 corporation, organized under this chapter act, may act as 7521 trustee of property whenever the corporation has either a 7522 beneficial, contingent, or remainder interest in such property. 7523 Any corporation may accept and hold the legal title to property, 7524 the beneficial interest of which is owned by any other 7525 eleemosynary institution or nonprofit corporation or fraternal, 7526 benevolent, charitable, or religious society or association. 7527 Section 162.âSubsection (1) of section 617.221, Florida 7528 Statutes, is amended to read: 7529 617.221âMembership associations.â 7530 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âmembership 7531 associationâ means a nonprofit not-for-profit corporation, 7532 including a department or division of such corporation, the 7533 majority of whose board members are constitutional officers who, 7534 pursuant to s. 1001.32(2), operate, control, and supervise 7535 public entities that receive annual state appropriations through 7536 a statutorily defined formulaic allocation that is funded and 7537 prescribed annually in the General Appropriations Act or the 7538 substantive bill implementing the annual appropriations act. The 7539 term does not include a labor organization as defined in s. 7540 447.02 or an entity funded through the Justice Administrative 7541 Commission. 7542 Section 163.âSubsection (3) of section 620.2108, Florida 7543 Statutes, is amended to read: 7544 620.2108âFilings required for merger; effective date.â 7545 (3)âEach constituent limited partnership shall deliver the 7546 certificate of merger for filing in the Department of State 7547 unless the constituent limited partnership is named as a party 7548 or constituent organization in articles of merger or a 7549 certificate of merger filed for the same merger in accordance 7550 with s. 605.1025, s. 607.1105, s. 617.1108, or s. 620.8918(1) 7551 and (2) and such articles of merger or certificate of merger 7552 substantially complies with the requirements of this section. In 7553 such a case, the other articles of merger or certificate of 7554 merger may also be used for purposes of s. 620.2109(3). 7555 Section 164.âSubsection (3) of section 620.8918, Florida 7556 Statutes, is amended to read: 7557 620.8918âFilings required for merger; effective date.â 7558 (3)âEach domestic constituent partnership shall deliver the 7559 certificate of merger for filing with the Department of State, 7560 unless the domestic constituent partnership is named as a party 7561 or constituent organization in articles of merger or a 7562 certificate of merger filed for the same merger in accordance 7563 with s. 605.1025, s. 607.1105, s. 617.1108, or s. 620.2108(3). 7564 The articles of merger or certificate of merger must 7565 substantially comply with the requirements of this section. In 7566 such a case, the other articles of merger or certificate of 7567 merger may also be used for purposes of s. 620.8919(3). Each 7568 domestic constituent partnership in the merger shall also file a 7569 registration statement in accordance with s. 620.8105(1) if it 7570 does not have a currently effective registration statement filed 7571 with the Department of State. 7572 Section 165.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) and 7573 subsections (5), (8), and (9) of section 628.910, Florida 7574 Statutes, are amended to read: 7575 628.910âIncorporation options and requirements.â 7576 (1)âA pure captive insurance company may be: 7577 (b)âIncorporated as a public benefit, mutual benefit, or 7578 religious nonprofit corporation with members in accordance with 7579 the Florida Nonprofit Not For Profit Corporation Act. 7580 (5)âThe articles of incorporation, the certificate issued 7581 pursuant to this section, and the organization fees required by 7582 the Florida Business Corporation Act or the Florida Nonprofit 7583 Not For Profit Corporation Act, as applicable, must be 7584 transmitted to the Secretary of State, who must record the 7585 articles of incorporation and the certificate. 7586 (8)âA captive insurance company formed as a corporation or 7587 a nonprofit corporation, pursuant to the provisions of this 7588 chapter, has the privileges and is subject to the provisions of 7589 the general corporation law, including the Florida Nonprofit Not 7590 For Profit Corporation Act for nonprofit corporations, as 7591 applicable, as well as the applicable provisions contained in 7592 this chapter. If a conflict occurs between a provision of the 7593 general corporation law, including the Florida Nonprofit Not For 7594 Profit Corporation Act for nonprofit corporations, as 7595 applicable, and a provision of this chapter, the latter 7596 controls. The provisions of this title pertaining to mergers, 7597 consolidations, conversions, mutualizations, and 7598 redomestications apply in determining the procedures to be 7599 followed by a captive insurance company in carrying out any of 7600 the transactions described in such provisions, except that the 7601 office may waive or modify the requirements for public notice 7602 and hearing in accordance with rules the office may adopt 7603 addressing categories of transactions. If a notice of public 7604 hearing is required, but no one requests a hearing, the office 7605 may cancel the hearing. 7606 (9)âThe articles of incorporation or bylaws of a captive 7607 insurance company may authorize a quorum of a board of directors 7608 to consist of no fewer than one-third of the fixed or prescribed 7609 number of directors as provided for by the Florida Business 7610 Corporation Act or the Florida Nonprofit Not For Profit 7611 Corporation Act. 7612 Section 166.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 7613 768.38, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 7614 768.38âLiability protections for COVID-19-related claims.â 7615 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 7616 (a)ââBusiness entityâ has the same meaning as provided in 7617 s. 606.03. The term also includes a charitable organization as 7618 defined in s. 496.404 and a nonprofit corporation not for profit 7619 as defined in s. 617.01401. 7620 Section 167.âParagraph (f) of subsection (15) of section 7621 893.055, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 7622 893.055âPrescription drug monitoring program.â 7623 (15)âThe department may establish a direct-support 7624 organization to provide assistance, funding, and promotional 7625 support for the activities authorized for the prescription drug 7626 monitoring program. 7627 (f)âThe direct-support organization may not exercise any 7628 power under s. 617.0302(11) or (15) s. 617.0302(12) or (16). 7629 Section 168.âSection 617.07401, Florida Statutes, is 7630 repealed. 7631 Section 169.âSection 617.0822, Florida Statutes, is 7632 repealed. 7633 Section 170.âSection 617.1108, Florida Statutes, is 7634 repealed. 7635 Section 171.âSection 617.1301, Florida Statutes, is 7636 repealed. 7637 Section 172.âSection 617.1302, Florida Statutes, is 7638 repealed. 7639 Section 173.âSection 617.1531, Florida Statutes, is 7640 repealed. 7641 Section 174.âSection 617.1533, Florida Statutes, is 7642 repealed. 7643 Section 175.âSection 617.1803, Florida Statutes, is 7644 repealed. 7645 Section 176.âSection 617.1805, Florida Statutes, is 7646 repealed. 7647 Section 177.âSection 617.1806, Florida Statutes, is 7648 repealed. 7649 Section 178.âSection 617.1807, Florida Statutes, is 7650 repealed. 7651 Section 179.âSection 617.2102, Florida Statutes, is 7652 repealed. 7653 Section 180.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 7654 made by this act to sections 617.01201 and 617.1006, Florida 7655 Statutes, in references thereto, subsection (3) of section 7656 617.1007, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 7657 617.1007âRestated articles of incorporation.â 7658 (3)âA corporation restating its articles of incorporation 7659 shall deliver to the department for filing articles of 7660 restatement, executed in accordance with s. 617.01201, setting 7661 forth the name of the corporation and the text of the restated 7662 articles of incorporation together with a certificate setting 7663 forth: 7664 (a)âWhether the restatement contains an amendment to the 7665 articles of incorporation requiring member approval and, if it 7666 does not, that the board of directors adopted the restatement; 7667 or 7668 (b)âIf the restatement contains an amendment to the 7669 articles of incorporation requiring member approval, the 7670 information required by s. 617.1006. 7671 Section 181.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 7672 made by this act to section 617.0302, Florida Statutes, in a 7673 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of section 7674 295.21, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 7675 295.21âFlorida Is For Veterans, Inc.â 7676 (5)âPOWERS.âIn addition to the powers and duties prescribed 7677 in chapter 617 and the articles and bylaws adopted thereunder, 7678 the board of directors may: 7679 (a)âMake and enter into contracts and other instruments 7680 necessary or convenient for the exercise of its powers and 7681 functions. However, notwithstanding s. 617.0302, the corporation 7682 may not issue bonds. 7683 7684 The credit of the State of Florida may not be pledged on behalf 7685 of the corporation. 7686 Section 182.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 7687 made by this act to section 617.0830, Florida Statutes, in a 7688 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 7689 409.987, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 7690 409.987âLead agency procurement; boards; conflicts of 7691 interest.â 7692 (4)âIn order to serve as a lead agency, an entity must: 7693 (b)âBe governed by a board of directors or a board 7694 committee composed of board members. Board members shall provide 7695 oversight and ensure accountability and transparency for the 7696 system of care. The board of directors shall provide fiduciary 7697 oversight to prevent conflicts of interest, promote 7698 accountability and transparency, and protect state and federal 7699 funding from misuse. The board of directors shall act in 7700 accordance with s. 617.0830. The membership of the board of 7701 directors or board committee must be described in the bylaws or 7702 articles of incorporation of each lead agency, which must 7703 provide that at least 75 percent of the membership of the board 7704 of directors or board committee must be composed of persons 7705 residing in this state, and at least 51 percent of the state 7706 residents on the board of directors must reside within the 7707 service area of the lead agency. The lead agency shall ensure 7708 that board members participate in annual training related to 7709 their responsibilities. The department shall set forth minimum 7710 training criteria in the contracts with the lead agencies. 7711 However, for procurements of lead agency contracts initiated on 7712 or after July 1, 2014: 7713 1.âAt least 75 percent of the membership of the board of 7714 directors must be composed of persons residing in this state, 7715 and at least 51 percent of the membership of the board of 7716 directors must be composed of persons residing within the 7717 service area of the lead agency. If a board committee governs 7718 the lead agency, 100 percent of its membership must be composed 7719 of persons residing within the service area of the lead agency. 7720 2.âThe powers of the board of directors or board committee 7721 include, but are not limited to, approving the lead agencyâs 7722 budget and setting the lead agencyâs operational policy and 7723 procedures. A board of directors must additionally have the 7724 power to hire the lead agencyâs executive director, unless a 7725 board committee governs the lead agency, in which case the board 7726 committee must have the power to confirm the selection of the 7727 lead agencyâs executive director. 7728 Section 183.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 7729 made by this act to section 617.0830, Florida Statutes, in a 7730 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 718.1265, Florida 7731 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 7732 718.1265âAssociation emergency powers.â 7733 (1)âTo the extent allowed by law, unless specifically 7734 prohibited by the declaration of condominium, the articles, or 7735 the bylaws of an association, and consistent with s. 617.0830, 7736 the board of administration, in response to damage or injury 7737 caused by or anticipated in connection with an emergency, as 7738 defined in s. 252.34(4), for which a state of emergency is 7739 declared pursuant to s. 252.36 in the locale in which the 7740 condominium is located, may exercise the following powers: 7741 (a)âConduct board meetings, committee meetings, elections, 7742 and membership meetings, in whole or in part, by telephone, 7743 real-time videoconferencing, or similar real-time electronic or 7744 video communication with notice given as is practicable. Such 7745 notice may be given in any practicable manner, including 7746 publication, radio, United States mail, the Internet, electronic 7747 transmission, public service announcements, and conspicuous 7748 posting on the condominium property or association property or 7749 any other means the board deems reasonable under the 7750 circumstances. Notice of decisions also may be communicated as 7751 provided in this paragraph. 7752 (b)âCancel and reschedule any association meeting. 7753 (c)âName as assistant officers persons who are not 7754 directors, which assistant officers shall have the same 7755 authority as the executive officers to whom they are assistants 7756 during the state of emergency to accommodate the incapacity or 7757 unavailability of any officer of the association. 7758 (d)âRelocate the associationâs principal office or 7759 designate alternative principal offices. 7760 (e)âEnter into agreements with local counties and 7761 municipalities to assist counties and municipalities with debris 7762 removal. 7763 (f)âImplement a disaster plan or an emergency plan before, 7764 during, or following the event for which a state of emergency is 7765 declared which may include, but is not limited to, shutting down 7766 or off elevators; electricity; water, sewer, or security 7767 systems; or air conditioners. 7768 (g)âBased upon advice of emergency management officials or 7769 public health officials, or upon the advice of licensed 7770 professionals retained by or otherwise available to the board, 7771 determine any portion of the condominium property or association 7772 property unavailable for entry or occupancy by unit owners, 7773 family members, tenants, guests, agents, or invitees to protect 7774 the health, safety, or welfare of such persons. 7775 (h)âRequire the evacuation of the condominium property in 7776 the event of an evacuation order in the locale in which the 7777 condominium is located. If a unit owner or other occupant of a 7778 condominium fails or refuses to evacuate the condominium 7779 property or association property for which the board has 7780 required evacuation, the association is immune from liability or 7781 injury to persons or property arising from such failure or 7782 refusal. 7783 (i)âBased upon advice of emergency management officials or 7784 public health officials, or upon the advice of licensed 7785 professionals retained by or otherwise available to the board, 7786 determine whether the condominium property, association 7787 property, or any portion thereof can be safely inhabited, 7788 accessed, or occupied. However, such determination is not 7789 conclusive as to any determination of habitability pursuant to 7790 the declaration. 7791 (j)âMitigate further damage, injury, or contagion, 7792 including taking action to contract for the removal of debris 7793 and to prevent or mitigate the spread of fungus or contagion, 7794 including, but not limited to, mold or mildew, by removing and 7795 disposing of wet drywall, insulation, carpet, cabinetry, or 7796 other fixtures on or within the condominium property, even if 7797 the unit owner is obligated by the declaration or law to insure 7798 or replace those fixtures and to remove personal property from a 7799 unit. 7800 (k)âContract, on behalf of any unit owner or owners, for 7801 items or services for which the owners are otherwise 7802 individually responsible, but which are necessary to prevent 7803 further injury, contagion, or damage to the condominium property 7804 or association property. In such event, the unit owner or owners 7805 on whose behalf the board has contracted are responsible for 7806 reimbursing the association for the actual costs of the items or 7807 services, and the association may use its lien authority 7808 provided by s. 718.116 to enforce collection of the charges. 7809 Without limitation, such items or services may include the 7810 drying of units, the boarding of broken windows or doors, the 7811 replacement of damaged air conditioners or air handlers to 7812 provide climate control in the units or other portions of the 7813 property, and the sanitizing of the condominium property or 7814 association property, as applicable. 7815 (l)âRegardless of any provision to the contrary and even if 7816 such authority does not specifically appear in the declaration 7817 of condominium, articles, or bylaws of the association, levy 7818 special assessments without a vote of the owners. 7819 (m)âWithout unit ownersâ approval, borrow money and pledge 7820 association assets as collateral to fund emergency repairs and 7821 carry out the duties of the association when operating funds are 7822 insufficient. This paragraph does not limit the general 7823 authority of the association to borrow money, subject to such 7824 restrictions as are contained in the declaration of condominium, 7825 articles, or bylaws of the association. 7826 Section 184.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 7827 made by this act to section 617.0830, Florida Statutes, in a 7828 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 719.128, Florida 7829 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 7830 719.128âAssociation emergency powers.â 7831 (1)âTo the extent allowed by law, unless specifically 7832 prohibited by the cooperative documents, and consistent with s. 7833 617.0830, the board of administration, in response to damage or 7834 injury caused by or anticipated in connection with an emergency, 7835 as defined in s. 252.34(4), for which a state of emergency is 7836 declared pursuant to s. 252.36 in the area encompassed by the 7837 cooperative, may exercise the following powers: 7838 (a)âConduct board meetings, committee meetings, elections, 7839 or membership meetings, in whole or in part, by telephone, real 7840 time videoconferencing, or similar real-time electronic or video 7841 communication after notice of the meetings and board decisions 7842 is provided in as practicable a manner as possible, including 7843 via publication, radio, United States mail, the Internet, 7844 electronic transmission, public service announcements, 7845 conspicuous posting on the cooperative property, or any other 7846 means the board deems appropriate under the circumstances. 7847 Notice of decisions may also be communicated as provided in this 7848 paragraph. 7849 (b)âCancel and reschedule an association meeting. 7850 (c)âDesignate assistant officers who are not directors. If 7851 the executive officer is incapacitated or unavailable, the 7852 assistant officer has the same authority during the state of 7853 emergency as the executive officer he or she assists. 7854 (d)âRelocate the associationâs principal office or 7855 designate an alternative principal office. 7856 (e)âEnter into agreements with counties and municipalities 7857 to assist counties and municipalities with debris removal. 7858 (f)âImplement a disaster or an emergency plan before, 7859 during, or following the event for which a state of emergency is 7860 declared, which may include turning on or shutting off 7861 elevators; electricity; water, sewer, or security systems; or 7862 air conditioners for association buildings. 7863 (g)âBased upon the advice of emergency management officials 7864 or public health officials, or upon the advice of licensed 7865 professionals retained by or otherwise available to the board of 7866 administration, determine any portion of the cooperative 7867 property unavailable for entry or occupancy by unit owners or 7868 their family members, tenants, guests, agents, or invitees to 7869 protect their health, safety, or welfare. 7870 (h)âBased upon the advice of emergency management officials 7871 or public health officials, or upon the advice of licensed 7872 professionals retained by or otherwise available to the board of 7873 administration, determine whether the cooperative property or 7874 any portion thereof can be safely inhabited or occupied. 7875 However, such determination is not conclusive as to any 7876 determination of habitability pursuant to the cooperative 7877 documents. 7878 (i)âRequire the evacuation of the cooperative property in 7879 the event of an evacuation order in the area in which the 7880 cooperative is located or prohibit or restrict access to the 7881 cooperative property in the event of a public health threat. If 7882 a unit owner or other occupant of a cooperative fails or refuses 7883 to evacuate the cooperative property for which the board has 7884 required evacuation, the association is immune from liability 7885 for injury to persons or property arising from such failure or 7886 refusal. 7887 (j)âMitigate further damage, injury, or contagion, 7888 including taking action to contract for the removal of debris 7889 and to prevent or mitigate the spread of fungus, including mold 7890 or mildew, by removing and disposing of wet drywall, insulation, 7891 carpet, cabinetry, or other fixtures on or within the 7892 cooperative property, regardless of whether the unit owner is 7893 obligated by the cooperative documents or law to insure or 7894 replace those fixtures and to remove personal property from a 7895 unit or to sanitize the cooperative property. 7896 (k)âContract, on behalf of a unit owner, for items or 7897 services for which the owner is otherwise individually 7898 responsible, but which are necessary to prevent further injury, 7899 contagion, or damage to the cooperative property. In such event, 7900 the unit owner on whose behalf the board has contracted is 7901 responsible for reimbursing the association for the actual costs 7902 of the items or services, and the association may use its lien 7903 authority provided by s. 719.108 to enforce collection of the 7904 charges. Such items or services may include the drying of the 7905 unit, the boarding of broken windows or doors, the replacement 7906 of a damaged air conditioner or air handler to provide climate 7907 control in the unit or other portions of the property, and the 7908 sanitizing of the cooperative property. 7909 (l)âNotwithstanding a provision to the contrary, and 7910 regardless of whether such authority does not specifically 7911 appear in the cooperative documents, levy special assessments 7912 without a vote of the owners. 7913 (m)âWithout unit ownersâ approval, borrow money and pledge 7914 association assets as collateral to fund emergency repairs and 7915 carry out the duties of the association if operating funds are 7916 insufficient. This paragraph does not limit the general 7917 authority of the association to borrow money, subject to such 7918 restrictions contained in the cooperative documents. 7919 Section 185.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 7920 made by this act to section 617.0830, Florida Statutes, in a 7921 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 720.316, Florida 7922 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 7923 720.316âAssociation emergency powers.â 7924 (1)âTo the extent allowed by law, unless specifically 7925 prohibited by the declaration or other recorded governing 7926 documents, and consistent with s. 617.0830, the board of 7927 directors, in response to damage or injury caused by or 7928 anticipated in connection with an emergency, as defined in s. 7929 252.34(4), for which a state of emergency is declared pursuant 7930 to s. 252.36 in the area encompassed by the association, may 7931 exercise the following powers: 7932 (a)âConduct board meetings, committee meetings, elections, 7933 or membership meetings, in whole or in part, by telephone, real 7934 time videoconferencing, or similar real-time electronic or video 7935 communication after notice of the meetings and board decisions 7936 is provided in as practicable a manner as possible, including 7937 via publication, radio, United States mail, the Internet, 7938 electronic transmission, public service announcements, 7939 conspicuous posting on the common area, or any other means the 7940 board deems appropriate under the circumstances. Notice of 7941 decisions may also be communicated as provided in this 7942 paragraph. 7943 (b)âCancel and reschedule an association meeting. 7944 (c)âDesignate assistant officers who are not directors. If 7945 the executive officer is incapacitated or unavailable, the 7946 assistant officer has the same authority during the state of 7947 emergency as the executive officer he or she assists. 7948 (d)âRelocate the associationâs principal office or 7949 designate an alternative principal office. 7950 (e)âEnter into agreements with counties and municipalities 7951 to assist counties and municipalities with debris removal. 7952 (f)âImplement a disaster or an emergency plan before, 7953 during, or following the event for which a state of emergency is 7954 declared, which may include, but is not limited to, turning on 7955 or shutting off elevators; electricity; water, sewer, or 7956 security systems; or air conditioners for association buildings. 7957 (g)âBased upon the advice of emergency management officials 7958 or public health officials, or upon the advice of licensed 7959 professionals retained by or otherwise available to the board, 7960 determine any portion of the common areas or facilities 7961 unavailable for entry or occupancy by owners or their family 7962 members, tenants, guests, agents, or invitees to protect their 7963 health, safety, or welfare. 7964 (h)âBased upon the advice of emergency management officials 7965 or public health officials or upon the advice of licensed 7966 professionals retained by or otherwise available to the board, 7967 determine whether the common areas or facilities can be safely 7968 inhabited, accessed, or occupied. However, such determination is 7969 not conclusive as to any determination of habitability pursuant 7970 to the declaration. 7971 (i)âMitigate further damage, injury, or contagion, 7972 including taking action to contract for the removal of debris 7973 and to prevent or mitigate the spread of fungus, including mold 7974 or mildew, by removing and disposing of wet drywall, insulation, 7975 carpet, cabinetry, or other fixtures on or within the common 7976 areas or facilities or sanitizing the common areas or 7977 facilities. 7978 (j)âNotwithstanding a provision to the contrary, and 7979 regardless of whether such authority does not specifically 7980 appear in the declaration or other recorded governing documents, 7981 levy special assessments without a vote of the owners. 7982 (k)âWithout ownersâ approval, borrow money and pledge 7983 association assets as collateral to fund emergency repairs and 7984 carry out the duties of the association if operating funds are 7985 insufficient. This paragraph does not limit the general 7986 authority of the association to borrow money, subject to such 7987 restrictions contained in the declaration or other recorded 7988 governing documents. 7989 Section 186.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 7990 made by this act to section 617.0832, Florida Statutes, in 7991 references thereto, subsections (2) and (5) of section 718.3027, 7992 Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read: 7993 718.3027âConflicts of interest.â 7994 (2)âIf a director or an officer, or a relative of a 7995 director or an officer, proposes to engage in an activity that 7996 is a conflict of interest, as described in subsection (1), the 7997 proposed activity must be listed on, and all contracts and 7998 transactional documents related to the proposed activity must be 7999 attached to, the meeting agenda. The association shall comply 8000 with the requirements of s. 617.0832, and the disclosures 8001 required by s. 617.0832 shall be entered into the written 8002 minutes of the meeting. Approval of the contract or other 8003 transaction requires an affirmative vote of two-thirds of all 8004 other directors present. At the next regular or special meeting 8005 of the members, the existence of the contract or other 8006 transaction shall be disclosed to the members. Upon motion of 8007 any member, the contract or transaction shall be brought up for 8008 a vote and may be canceled by a majority vote of the members 8009 present. If the contract is canceled, the association is only 8010 liable for the reasonable value of the goods and services 8011 provided up to the time of cancellation and is not liable for 8012 any termination fee, liquidated damages, or other form of 8013 penalty for such cancellation. 8014 (5)âA contract entered into between a director or an 8015 officer, or a relative of a director or an officer, and the 8016 association, which is not a timeshare condominium association, 8017 that has not been properly disclosed as a conflict of interest 8018 or potential conflict of interest as required by this section or 8019 s. 617.0832 is voidable and terminates upon the filing of a 8020 written notice terminating the contract with the board of 8021 directors which contains the consent of at least 20 percent of 8022 the voting interests of the association. 8023 Section 187.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 8024 made by this act to sections 617.0832 and 617.0834, Florida 8025 Statutes, in references thereto, paragraphs (a) and (b) of 8026 subsection (2) and subsection (3) of section 720.3033, Florida 8027 Statutes, are reenacted to read: 8028 720.3033âOfficers and directors.â 8029 (2)âIf the association enters into a contract or other 8030 transaction with any of its directors or a corporation, firm, 8031 association that is not an affiliated homeownersâ association, 8032 or other entity in which an association director is also a 8033 director or officer or is financially interested, the board 8034 must: 8035 (a)âComply with the requirements of s. 617.0832. 8036 (b)âEnter the disclosures required by s. 617.0832 into the 8037 written minutes of the meeting. 8038 (3)âAn officer, a director, or a manager may not solicit, 8039 offer to accept, or accept a kickback. As used in this 8040 subsection, the term âkickbackâ means any thing or service of 8041 value for which consideration has not been provided for an 8042 officerâs, a directorâs, or a managerâs benefit or for the 8043 benefit of a member of his or her immediate family from any 8044 person providing or proposing to provide goods or services to 8045 the association. An officer, a director, or a manager who 8046 knowingly solicits, offers to accept, or accepts a kickback 8047 commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in 8048 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, and is subject to 8049 monetary damages under s. 617.0834. If the board finds that an 8050 officer or a director has violated this subsection, the board 8051 must immediately remove the officer or director from office. The 8052 vacancy shall be filled according to law until the end of the 8053 officerâs or directorâs term of office. However, an officer, a 8054 director, or a manager may accept food to be consumed at a 8055 business meeting with a value of less than $25 per individual or 8056 a service or good received in connection with trade fairs or 8057 education programs. 8058 Section 188.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 8059 made by this act to section 617.0834, Florida Statutes, in a 8060 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (13) of section 8061 721.13, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 8062 721.13âManagement.â 8063 (13)(a)âNotwithstanding any provisions of chapter 607, 8064 chapter 617, or chapter 718, an officer, director, or agent of 8065 an ownersâ association, including a timeshare management firm 8066 and any individual licensed under part VIII of chapter 468 8067 employed by the timeshare management firm, shall discharge its 8068 duties in good faith, with the care an ordinarily prudent person 8069 in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances, 8070 and in a manner it reasonably believes to be in the interests of 8071 the ownersâ association. An officer, director, or agent of an 8072 ownersâ association, including a timeshare management firm and 8073 any individual licensed under part VIII of chapter 468 employed 8074 by the timeshare management firm, is exempt from liability for 8075 monetary damages in the same manner as provided in s. 617.0834 8076 unless such officer, director, agent, or firm breached or failed 8077 to perform its duties and the breach of, or failure to perform, 8078 its duties constitutes a violation of criminal law as provided 8079 in s. 617.0834; constitutes a transaction from which the officer 8080 or director derived an improper personal benefit, either 8081 directly or indirectly; or constitutes recklessness or an act or 8082 omission that was in bad faith, with malicious purpose, or in a 8083 manner exhibiting wanton and willful disregard of human rights, 8084 safety, or property. 8085 Section 189.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 8086 made by this act to sections 617.0830 and 617.0834, Florida 8087 Statutes, in references thereto, paragraph (d) of subsection (1) 8088 of section 718.111, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 8089 718.111âThe association.â 8090 (1)âCORPORATE ENTITY.â 8091 (d)âAs required by s. 617.0830, an officer, director, or 8092 agent shall discharge his or her duties in good faith, with the 8093 care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would 8094 exercise under similar circumstances, and in a manner he or she 8095 reasonably believes to be in the interests of the association. 8096 An officer, director, or agent shall be liable for monetary 8097 damages as provided in s. 617.0834 if such officer, director, or 8098 agent breached or failed to perform his or her duties and the 8099 breach of, or failure to perform, his or her duties constitutes 8100 a violation of criminal law as provided in s. 617.0834; 8101 constitutes a transaction from which the officer or director 8102 derived an improper personal benefit, either directly or 8103 indirectly; or constitutes recklessness or an act or omission 8104 that was in bad faith, with malicious purpose, or in a manner 8105 exhibiting wanton and willful disregard of human rights, safety, 8106 or property. Forgery of a ballot envelope or voting certificate 8107 used in a condominium association election is punishable as 8108 provided in s. 831.01, the theft or embezzlement of funds of a 8109 condominium association is punishable as provided in s. 812.014, 8110 and the destruction of or the refusal to allow inspection or 8111 copying of an official record of a condominium association that 8112 is accessible to unit owners within the time periods required by 8113 general law in furtherance of any crime is punishable as 8114 tampering with physical evidence as provided in s. 918.13 or as 8115 obstruction of justice as provided in chapter 843. An officer or 8116 director charged by information or indictment with a crime 8117 referenced in this paragraph must be removed from office, and 8118 the vacancy shall be filled as provided in s. 718.112(2)(d)2. 8119 until the end of the officerâs or directorâs period of 8120 suspension or the end of his or her term of office, whichever 8121 occurs first. If a criminal charge is pending against the 8122 officer or director, he or she may not be appointed or elected 8123 to a position as an officer or a director of any association and 8124 may not have access to the official records of any association, 8125 except pursuant to a court order. However, if the charges are 8126 resolved without a finding of guilt, the officer or director 8127 must be reinstated for the remainder of his or her term of 8128 office, if any. 8129 Section 190.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.